THE DEERSLAYER.
CHAPTER I.
There is a pleasure in the pathless woods,
There is a rapture on the lonely shore,
There is society where none intrudes,
By the deep sea, and music in its roar:
I love not man the less, but nature more,
From these our interviews, in which I steal,
From all I may be, or have been before,
To mingle with the universe, and feel
What I can ne'er express, yet cannot all conceal.
Childe Harold
.
On
the human imagination, events produce the effects
of time. Thus, he who has travelled far and seen much,
is apt to fancy that he has lived long; and the history that
most abounds in important incidents, soonest assumes the
aspect of antiquity. In no other way can we account for
the venerable air that is already gathering around American
annals. When the mind reverts to the earliest days of
colonial
history, the period seems remote and obscure, the
thousand changes that thicken along the links of
recollections
,
throwing back the origin of the nation to a day so
distant as seemingly to reach the mists of time; and yet
four lives of ordinary duration would suffice to transmit,
from mouth to mouth, in the form of tradition, all that
civilized man has achieved within the limits of the
republic
.
Although New York, alone, possesses a population
materially exceeding that of either of the four smallest
kingdoms of Europe, or materially exceeding that of the
entire Swiss Confederation, it is little more than two
centuries
since the Dutch commenced their settlement, rescuing
the region from the savage state. Thus, what seems
venerable
by an accumulation of changes, is reduced to
familiarity
when we come seriously to consider it solely in
connection with time.
This glance into the perspective of the past, will prepare
the reader to look at the pictures we are about to sketch,
with less surprise than he might otherwise feel; and a few
additional explanations may carry him back in imagination,
to the precise condition of society that we desire to
delineate
.
It is matter of history that the settlements on the
eastern shores of the Hudson, such as Claverack,
Kinderhook
,
and even Poughkeepsie, were not regarded as safe
from Indian incursions a century since; and there is still
standing on the banks of the same river, and within
musket-shot
of the wharves of Albany, a residence of a younger
branch of the Van Rensselaers, that has loop-holes
constructed
for defence against the same crafty enemy, although
it dates from a period scarcely so distant. Other similar
memorials of the infancy of the country are to be found,
scattered through what is now deemed the very centre of
American civilization, affording the plainest proofs that all
we possess of security from invasion and hostile violence,
is the growth of but little more than the time that is
frequently
filled by a single human life.
The incidents of this tale occurred between the years
1740 and 1745, when the settled portions of the colony of
New York were confined to the four Atlantic counties, a
narrow belt of country on each side of the Hudson,
extending
from its mouth to the falls near its head, and to a
few advanced neighbourhoods on the Mohawk and the
Schoharie. Broad belts of the virgin wilderness, not only
reached the shores of the first river, but they even crossed
it, stretching away into New England, and affording forest
covers to the noiseless moccasin of the native warrior, as
he trod the secret and bloody war-path. A bird's-eye view
of the whole region east of the Mississippi, must then have
offered one vast expanse of woods, relieved by a
comparatively
narrow fringe of cultivation along the sea, dotted
by the glittering surfaces of lakes, and intersected by the
waving lines of rivers. In such a vast picture of solemn
solitude, the district of country we design to paint sinks into
insignificance, though we feel encouraged to proceed by the
conviction that, with slight and immaterial distinctions, he
who succeeds in giving an accurate idea of any portion of
this wild region, must necessarily convey a tolerably
correct
notion of the whole.
Whatever may be the changes produced by man, the
eternal round of the seasons is unbroken. Summer and
winter, seed-time and harvest, return in their stated order,
with a sublime precision, affording to man one of the
noblest
of all the occasions he enjoys of proving the high
powers of his far-reaching mind, in compassing the laws
that control their exact uniformity, and in calculating their
never-ending revolutions. Centuries of summer suns had
warmed the tops of the same noble oaks and pines, sending
their heats even to the tenacious roots, when voices were
heard calling to each other, in the depths of a forest, of
which the leafy surface lay bathed in the brilliant light of a
cloudless day in June, while the trunks of the trees rose in
gloomy grandeur in the shades beneath. The calls were
in different tones, evidently proceeding from two men who
had lost their way, and were searching in different
directions
for their path. At length a shout proclaimed success,
and presently a man broke out of the tangled labyrinth
of a small swamp, emerging into an opening that appeared
to have been formed partly by the ravages of the wind,
and partly by those of fire. This little area, which afforded
a good view of the sky, although it was pretty well filled
with dead trees, lay on the side of one of the high hills,
or low mountains, into which nearly the whole surface of
the adjacent country was broken.
Here is room to breathe in! exclaimed the liberated
forester, as soon as he found himself under a clear sky,
shaking his huge frame like a mastiff that has just escaped
from a snow-bank; Hurrah! Deerslayer; here is
day-light
,
at last, and yonder is the lake.
These words were scarcely uttered when the second
forester dashed aside the bushes of the swamp, and
appeared
in the area. After making a hurried adjustment of
his arms and disordered dress, he joined his companion,
who had already begun his dispositions for a halt.
Do you know this spot? demanded the one called
Deerslayer, or do you shout at the sight of the sun?
Both, lad, both; I know the spot, and am not sorry to
see so useful a friend as the sun. Now we have got the
p'ints of the compass in our minds, once more, and 't will
be our own faults if we let any thing turn them
topsy-turvy
ag'in, as has just happened. My name is not Hurry
Harry, if this be not the very spot where the land-hunters
'camped the last summer, and passed a week. See, yonder
are the dead bushes of their bower, and here is the spring.
Much as I like the sun, boy, I've no occasion for it to tell
me it is noon; this stomach of mine is as good a
time-piece
as is to be found in the colony, and it already p'ints
to half past twelve. So open the wallet, and let us wind
up for another six hours' run.
At this suggestion, both set themselves about making the
preparations necessary for their usual frugal, but hearty,
meal. We will profit by this pause in the discourse to give
the reader some idea of the appearance of the men, both
of whom are destined to enact no insignificant parts in our
legend. It would not have been easy to find a more noble
specimen of vigorous manhood, than was offered in the
person of him who called himself Hurry Harry. His real
name was Henry March; but the frontier-men having
caught the practice of giving
sobriquets,
from the Indians,
the appellation of Hurry was far oftener applied to him
than his proper designation, and not unfrequently he was
termed Hurry Skurry, a nick-name he had obtained from a
dashing, reckless, off-hand manner, and a physical
restlessness
that kept him so constantly on the move, as to
cause him to be known along the whole line of scattered
habitations that lay between the province and the Canadas.
The stature of Hurry Harry exceeded six feet four, and
being unusually well proportioned, his strength fully
realized
the idea created by his gigantic frame. The face
did no discredit to the rest of the man, for it was both
good-humoured
and handsome. His air was free, and though
his manner necessarily partook of the rudeness of a border
life, the grandeur that pervaded so noble a physique
prevented
it from becoming altogether vulgar.
Deerslayer, as Hurry called his companion, was a very
2*
different person in appearance, as well as in character. In
stature, he stood about six feet in his moccasins, but his
frame was comparatively light and slender, showing muscles,
however, that promised unusual agility, if not unusual
strength. His face would have had little to recommend it
except youth, were it not for an expression that seldom
failed to win upon those who had leisure to examine it, and
to yield to the feeling of confidence it created. This
expression
was simply that of guileless truth, sustained by an
earnestness of purpose, and a sincerity of feeling, that
rendered
it remarkable. At times this air of integrity seemed
to be so simple as to awaken the suspicion of a want of the
usual means to discriminate between artifice and truth; but
few came in serious contact with the man, without losing
this distrust in respect for his opinions and motives.
Both these frontier-men were still young, Hurry having
reached the age of six or eight and twenty, while Deerslayer
was several years his junior. Their attire needs no
particular
description, though it may be well to add that it was
composed in no small degree of dressed deer-skins, and had
the usual signs of belonging to those who passed their time
between the skirts of civilized society and the boundless
forests. There was, notwithstanding, some attention to
smartness and the picturesque in the arrangements of
Deerslayer's
dress, more particularly in the part connected with
his arms and accountrements. His rifle was in perfect
condition
,
the handle of his hunting-knife was neatly carved,
his powder-horn was ornamented with suitable devices,
lightly cut into the material, and his shot-pouch was
decorated
with wampum. On the other hand, Hurry Harry,
either from constitutional recklessness, or from a secret
consciousness
how little his appearance required artificial aids,
wore every thing in a careless, slovenly manner, as if he
felt a noble scorn for the trifling accessories of dress and
ornaments. Perhaps the peculiar effect of his fine form and
great stature was increased, rather than lessened, by this
unstudied and disdainful air of indifference.
Come, Deerslayer, fall to, and prove that you have a
Delaware stomach, as you say you have had a Delaware
edication, cried Hurry, setting the example by opening his
mouth to receive a slice of cold venison steak that would
have made an entire meal for a European peasant; fall to,
lad, and prove your manhood on this poor devil of a doe,
with your teeth, as you've already done with your rifle.
Nay, nay, Hurry, there's little manhood in killing a
doe, and that, too, out of season; though there might be
some in bringing down a painter, or a catamount, returned
the other, disposing himself to comply. The Delawares
have given me my name, not so much on account of a bold
heart, as on account of a quick eye, and an act
y
ve foot.
There may not be any coward
y
ce in overcoming a deer, but
sartain it is, there's no great valour.
The Delawares, themselves, are no heroes, muttered
Hurry through his teeth, the mouth being too full to permit
it to be fairly opened, or they would never have allowed
them loping vagabonds, the Mingos, to make them women.
That matter is not rightly understoodhas never been
rightly explained, said Deerslayer earnestly, for he was as
zealous a friend, as his companion was dangerous as an
enemy; the Mengwe fill the woods with their lies, and
misconceive words and treaties. I have now lived ten years
with the Delawares, and know them to be as manful as any
other nation, when the proper time to strike comes.
Harkee, Master Deerslayer, since we are on the subject,
we may as well open our minds to each other in a
man-to-man
way; answer me one question; you have had so much
luck among the game as to have gotten a title, it would
seem, but did you ever hit any thing human or intelligible:
did you ever pull trigger on an inimy that was capable of
pulling one upon you?
This question produced a singular collision between
mortification
and correct feeling, in the bosom of the youth, that
was easily to be traced in the workings of his ingenuous
countenance. The struggle was short, however;
uprightness
of heart soon getting the better of false pride, and
frontier
boastfulness.
To own the truth, I never did, answered Deerslayer;
seeing that a fitting occasion never offered. The
Delawares
have been peaceable since my sojourn with 'em, and
I hold it to be onlawful to take the life of man, except in
open and ginerous warfare.
What! did you never find a fellow thieving among your
traps and skins, and do the law on him, with your own
hands, by way of saving the magistrates trouble, in the
settlements
,
and the rogue himself the costs of the suit?
I am no trapper, Hurry, returned the young man
proudly: I live by the rifle, a we'pon at which I will not
turn my back on any man of my years, atween the Hudson
and the St. Lawrence. I never offer a skin that has not a
hole in its head besides them which natur' made to see with,
or to breathe through.
Ay, ay, this is all very well, in the animal way, though
it makes but a poor figure alongside of scalps and
and-bushes
.
Shooting an Indian from an and-bush is acting up
to his own principles, and now we have what you call a
lawful war on our hands, the sooner you wipe that disgrace
off your conscience, the sounder will be your sleep; if it
only come from knowing there is one inimy the less
prowling
in the woods. I shall not frequent your society long,
friend Natty, unless you look higher than four-footed beasts
to pract
y
se your rifle on.
Our journey is nearly ended, you say, Master March,
and we can part to-night, if you see occasion. I have a
fri'nd waiting for me, who will think it no disgrace to
consort
with a fellow-creatur' that has never yet slain his kind.
I wish I knew what has brought that skulking Delaware
into this part of the country so early in the season,
muttered
Hurry to himself, in a way to show equally distrust
and a recklessness of its betrayal. Where did you say
the young chief was to give you the meeting?
At a small, round rock, near the foot of the lake, where,
they tell me, the tribes are given to resorting to make their
treaties, and to bury their hatchets. This rock have I often
heard the Delawares mention, though lake and rock are
equally strangers to me. The country is claimed by both
Mingos and Mohicans, and is a sort of common territory to
fish and hunt through, in time of peace, though what it
may become in war-time, the Lord only knows!
Common territory! exclaimed Hurry, laughing aloud.
I should like to know what Floating Tom Hutter would
say to that? He claims the lake as his own property, in
vartue of fifteen years' possession, and will not be likely to
give it up to either Mingo or Delaware, without a battle
for it.
And what will the colony say to such a quarrel? All
this country must have some owner, the gentry pushing
their cravings into the wilderness, even where they never
dare to ventur', in their own persons, to look at'em.
That may do in other quarters of the colony, Deerslayer,
but it will not do here. Not a human being, the Lord
excepted
,
owns a foot of s'ile in this part of the country. Pen
was never put to paper, consarning either hill or valley,
hereaway, as I've heard old Tom say, time and ag'in, and
so he claims the best right to it of any man breathing; and
what Tom claims, he'll be very likely to maintain.
By what I've heard you say, Hurry, this Floating Tom
must be an oncommon mortal; neither Mingo, Delaware,
nor Pale-Face. His possession, too, has been long, by your
tell, and altogether beyond frontier endurance. What's the
man's history and natur'?
Why, as to old Tom's human natur', it is not much
like other men's human natur', but more like a musk-rat's
human natur', seeing that he takes more to the ways of that
animal, than to the ways of any other fellow-creatur'.
Some think he was a free liver on the salt-water, in his
youth, and a companion of a sartain Kidd, who was hanged
for piracy, long afore you and I were born, or acquainted,
and that he came up into these regions, thinking that the
king's cruisers could never cross the mountains, and that he
might enjoy the plunder peaceably in the woods.
Then he was wrong, Hurry; very wrong. A man can
enjoy plunder
peaceably
nowhere.
That's much as his turn of mind may happen to be.
I've known them that never could enjoy it at all, unless it was
in the midst of a jollification, and them ag'in that enjoyed it
best in a corner. Some men have no peace if they don't
find plunder, and some if they do. Human natur' is crooked
in these matters. Old Tom seems to belong to neither set,
as he enjoys his, if plunder he has really got, with his
darters
,
in a very quiet and comfortable way, and wishes for
no more.
Ay, he has darters, too; I've heard the Delawares,
who've hunted this-a-way, tell their histories of these young
women. Is there no mother, Hurry?
There was
once,
as in reason; but she has now been
dead and sunk these two good years.
Anan? said Deerslayer, looking up at his companion
in a little surprise.
Dead and sunk, I say, and I hope that's good English.
The old fellow lowered his wife into the lake, by way of
seeing the last of her, as I can testify, being an eye-witness
of the ceremony; but whether Tom did it to save digging,
which is no easy job among roots, or out of a consait that
water washes away sin sooner than 'arth, is more than I
can say.
Was the poor woman oncommon wicked, that her
husband
should take so much pains with her body?
Not onreasonable; though she had her faults. I
consider
Judith Hutter to have been as graceful, and about as
likely to make a good ind, as any woman who had lived so
long beyond the sound of church bells; and I conclude old
Tom sunk her as much by way of
saving
pains, as by way
of
taking
it. There was a little steel in her temper, it's
true, and, as old Hutter is pretty much flint, they struck out
sparks once-and-a-while, but, on the whole, they might be
said to live amicable like. When they did kindle, the
listeners got some such insights into their past lives, as one
gets into the darker parts of the woods, when a stray gleam
of sunshine finds its way down to the roots of the trees.
But Judith I shall always esteem, as it's recommend enough
to one woman to be the mother of such a creatur' as her
darter, Judith Hutter!
Ay, Judith was the name the Delawares mentioned,
though it was pronounced after a fashion of their own.
From their discourse, I do not think the girl would much
please my fancy.
Thy fancy! exclaimed March, taking fire equally at
the indifference and at the presumption of his companion,
what the devil have you to do with a fancy, and that, too,
consarning one like Judith? You are but a boya sapling,
that has scarce got root. Judith has had
men
among her
suitors, ever since she was fifteen; which is now near five
years; and will not be apt even to cast a look upon a
half-grown
creatur' like you!
It is June, and there is not a cloud atween us and the
sun, Hurry, so all this heat is not wanted, answered the
other, altogether undisturbed; any one may have a fancy,
and a squirrel has a right to make up his mind touching a
catamount.
Ay, but it might not be wise, always, to let the
catamount
know it, growled March. But you're young and
thoughtless, and I'll overlook your ignorance. Come,
Deerslayer, he added, with a good-natured laugh, after
pausing a moment to reflect, come, Deerslayer, we are
sworn fri'nds, and will not quarrel about a light-minded,
jilting jade, just because she happens to be handsome; more
especially as you have never seen her. Judith is only for a
man whose teeth show the full marks, and it's foolish to be
afeard of a boy. What
did
the Delawares say of the
hussy
;
for, an Indian, after all, has his notions of woman-kind,
as well as a white man?
They said she was fair to look on, and pleasant of
speech; but over-given to admirers, and light-minded.
They are devils incarnate! After all, what schoolmaster
is a match for an Indian, in looking into natur'? Some
people think they are only good on a trail, or the war-path,
but I say that they are philosophers, and understand a man,
as well as they understand a beaver, and a woman as well
as they understand either. Now that's Judith's character
to a riband! To own the truth to you, Deerslayer, I should
have married the gal two years since, if it had not been for
two particular things, one of which was this very
light-mindedness
.
And what may have been the other? demanded the
hunter, who continued to eat like one that took very little
interest in the subject.
T' other was an unsartainty about her having
me
.
The hussy is handsome, and she knows it. Boy, not a
tree that is growing in these hills is straighter, or waves in
the wind with an easier bend, nor did you ever see the doe
that bounded with a more nat'ral motion. If that was all,
every tongue would sound her praises; but she has such
failings that I find it hard to overlook them, and sometimes
I swear I'll never visit the lake ag'in.
Which is the reason that you always come back?
Nothing
is ever made more sure by swearing about it.
Ah, Deerslayer, you are a novelty in these partic'lars;
keeping as true to edication as if you had never left the
settlements
.
With me the case is different, and I never want
to clinch an idee, that I do not feel a wish to swear about it.
If you know'd all that I know consarning Judith, you'd find
a justification for a little cursing. Now, the officers
sometimes
stray over to the lake, from the forts on the Mohawk,
to fish and hunt, and then the creatur' seems beside herself!
You can see it in the manner in which she wears her finery,
and the airs she gives herself with the gallants.
That is unseemly in a poor man's darter, returned
Deerslayer gravely, the officers are all gentry, and can
only look on such as Judith with evil intentions.
There's the unsartainty, and the damper! I have my
misgivings about a particular captain, and Jude has no one
to blame but her own folly, if I'm wrong. On the whole,
I wish to look upon her as modest and becoming, and yet
the clouds that drive among these hills are not more
unsartain
.
Not a dozen white men have ever laid eyes upon her,
since she was a child, and yet her airs, with two or three
of these officers, are extinguishers!
I would think no more of such a woman, but turn my
mind altogether to the forest;
that
will never deceive you,
being ordered and ruled by a hand that never wavers.
If you know'd Judith, you would see how much easier
it is to say this, than it would be to do it. Could I bring
my mind to be easy about the officers, I would carry the
gal off to the Mohawk by force, make her marry me in
spite of her whiffling, and leave old Tom to the care of
Hetty, his other child, who, if she be not as handsome, or
as quick-witted as her sister, is much the most dutiful.
Is there another bird in the same nest? asked
Deerslayer
,
raising his eyes with a species of half-awakened
curiositythe Delawares spoke to me only of one.
That's nat'ral enough, when Judith Hutter and Hetty
Hutter are in question. Hetty is only comely, while her
sister, I tell thee, boy, is such another as is not to be found
atween this and the sea: Judith is as full of wit, and talk,
and cunning, as an old Indian orator, while poor Hetty is
at the best but `compass meant us.'
Anan? inquired, again, the Deerslayer.
Why, what the officers call `compass meant us,' which
I understand to signify that she means always to go in the
right direction, but sometimes doesn't know how. `
Compass'
for the p'int, and `meant us' for the intention. No,
poor Hetty is what I call on the varge of ignorance, and
sometimes she stumbles on one side of the line, and
sometimes
on t' other.
Them are beings that the Lord has in his 'special
care, said Deerslayer, solemnly; for he looks carefully
to all who fall short of their proper share of reason. The
Redskins honour and respect them who are so gifted,
knowing that the Evil Spirit delights more to dwell in an
artful body, than in one that has no cunning to work
upon.
I'll answer for it, then, that he will not remain long
with poor Hettyfor the child is just `compass meant us,'
as I have told you. Old Tom has a feeling for the gal,
and so has Judith, quick-witted and glorious as she is
herself
;
else would I not answer for her being altogether safe
among the sort of men that sometimes meet on the lake
shore.
I thought this water an onknown and little-frequented
sheet, observed the Deerslayer, evidently uneasy at the
idea of being too near the world.
It's all that lad, the eyes of twenty white men never
having been laid on it; still, twenty true-bred frontier-men
hunters, and trappers, and scouts, and the like,can do
a deal of mischief if they try. 'T would be an awful thing
to me, Deerslayer, did I find Judith married, after an absence
of six months!
Have you the gal's faith, to incourage you to hope
otherwise?
Not at all. I know not how it isI'm good-looking,
boy; that much I can see in any spring on which the sun
shinesand yet I could never get the hussy to a promise,
or even a cordial willing smile, though she will laugh by
the hour. If she
has
dared to marry in my absence, she'll
Vol. I.3
be like to know the pleasures of widowhood, afore she is
twenty!
You would not harm the man she had chosen, Hurry,
simply because she found him more to her liking than
yourself
?
Why not? If an enemy crosses my path, will I not
beat him out of it! Look at meam I man like to let
any sneaking, crawling, skin-trader, get the better of me in
a matter that touches me as near as the kindness of Judith
Hutter? Besides, when we live beyond law, we must be
our own judges and executioners. And if a man
should
be found dead in the woods, who is there to say who slew
him, even admitting that the Colony took the matter in
hand, and made a stir about it?
If that man should be Judith Hutter's husband, after
what has passed, I might tell enough, at least, to put the
Colony on the trail.
You!half-grown, venison-hunting bantling! You,
dare to think of informing against Hurry Harry in so much
as a matter touching a mink, or a woodchuck!
I would dare to speak truth, Hurry, consarning you,
or any man that ever lived.
March looked at his companion, for a moment, in silent
amazement; then seizing him by the throat, with both
hands, he shook his comparatively slight frame, with a
violence
that menaced the dislocation of some of the bones.
Nor was this done jocularly, for anger flashed from the
giant's eyes, and there were certain signs, that seemed to
threaten much more earnestness than the occasion would
appear to call for. Whatever might be the real intention
of March, and it is probable there was none settled in his
mind, it is certain that he was unusually aroused; and
most men who found themselves throttled by one of a
mould so gigantic, in such a mood, and in a solitude so
deep and helpless, would have felt intimidated, and tempted
to yield even the right. Not so, however, with Deerslayer.
His countenance remained unmoved; his hand did not
shake, and his answer was given in a voice that did not
resort to the artifice of louder tones, even, by way of
proving its owner's resolution.
You may shake, Hurry, until you bring down the
mountain, he said, quietly, but nothing beside truth will
you shake from me. It is probable that Judith Hutter has
no husband to slay, and you may never have a chance to
waylay one, else would I tell her of your threat, in the
first conversation I held with the gal.
March released his gripe, and sat regarding the other, in
silent astonishment.
I thought we had been friends, he at length added
but you've got the last secret of mine, that will ever
enter your ears.
I want none, if they are to be like this. I know we
live in the woods, Hurry, and are thought to be beyond
human lawsand perhaps we are so, in fact, whatever it
may be in rightbut there is a law, and a law maker, that
rule across the whole continent. He that flies in the face
of either, need not call me fri'nd.
Damme, Deerslayer, if I do not believe you are, at
heart, a Moravian, and no fair-minded, plain-dealing hunter,
as you've pretended to be!
Fair-minded or not, Hurry, you will find me as
plain-dealing
in deeds, as I am in words. But this giving way
to sudden anger is foolish, and proves how little you have
sojourned with the red men. Judith Hutter no doubt is still
single, and you spoke but as the tongue ran, and not as the
heart felt. There's my hand, and we will say and think
no more about it.
Hurry seemed more surprised than ever; then he burst
forth in a loud good-natured laugh, which brought tears to
his eyes. After this, he accepted the offered hand, and the
parties became friends.
'T would have been foolish to quarrel about an idee,
March cried, as he resumed his meal, and more like
lawyers in the towns, than like sensible men in the woods.
They tell me, Deerslayer, much ill blood grows out of
idees, among the people in the lower counties, and that
they sometimes get to extremities upon them.
That do theythat do they; and about other matters
that might better be left to take care of themselves. I
have heard the Moravians say that there are lands in which
men quarrel even consarning their religion; and if they
can get their tempers up on such a subject, Hurry, the Lord
have marcy on 'em. Howsever, there is no occasion for
our following their example, and more especially about a
husband that this Judith Hutter may never see, or never
wish to see. For my part, I feel more cur'osity about the
feeble-witted sister, than about your beauty. There's
something that comes close to a man's feelin's, when he
meets with a fellow creatur' that has all the outward show
of an accountable mortal, and who fails of being what he
seems, only through a lack of reason. This is bad enough
in a man, but when it comes to a woman, and she a young,
and may-be a winning creatur', it touches all the pitiful
thoughts his natur' has. God knows, Hurry, that such poor
things are defenceless enough with all their wits about 'em;
but it's a cruel fortun' when that great protector and guide
fails 'em.
Harkee, Deerslayeryou know what the hunters, and
trappers, and peltry-men in general be; and their best
friends will not deny that they are headstrong and given to
having their own way, without much bethinking 'em of
other people's rights, or feelin'sand yet I don't think the
man is to be found, in all this region, who would harm
Hetty Hutter, if he could; no, not even a red-skin.
Therein, fri'nd Hurry, you do the Delawares, at least,
and all their allied tribes, only justice, for a red-skin looks
upon a being thus struck by God's power, as especially under
his care. I rejoice to hear what you say, howsever, I
rejoice
to hear it; but as the sun is beginning to turn towards
the afternoon's sky, had we not better strike the trail ag'in,
and make forward, that we may get an opportunity of
seeing
these wonderful sisters?
Harry March giving a cheerful assent, the remnants of
the meal were soon collected; then the travellers shouldered
their packs, resumed their arms, and, quitting the little area
of light, they again plunged into the deep shadows of the
forest.
CHAPTER II.
Thou 'rt passing from the lake's green side,
And the hunter's hearth away;
For the time of flowers, for the summer's pride,
Daughter! thou canst not stay.
Records of Woman
.
Our
two adventurers had not far to go. Hurry knew the
direction, as soon as he had found the open spot and the
spring, and he now led on with the confident step of a man
assured of his object. The forest was dark, as a matter of
course, but it was no longer obstructed by under-brush, and
the footing was firm and dry. After proceeding near a
mile, March stopped, and began to cast about him with an
inquiring look, examining the different objects with care,
and occasionally turning his eyes on the trunks of the fallen
trees, with which the ground was well sprinkled, as is usually
the case in an American wood, especially in those parts of
the country where timber has not yet become valuable.
This
must be the place, Deerslayer, March at length
observed; here is a beech by the side of a hemlock, with
three pines at hand, and yonder is a white birch with a
broken top; and yet I see no rock, nor any of the branches
bent down, as I told you would be the case.
Broken branches are onskilful landmarks, as the
least-exper'enced
know that branches don't often break of
themselves
,
returned the other; and they also lead to
suspicion
and discoveries. The Delawares never trust to broken
branches, unless it is in friendly times, and on an open trail.
As for the beeches, and pines, and hemlocks, why, they are
to be seen on all sides of us, not only by two and three's,
but by forties, and fifties, and hundreds.
Very true, Deerslayer, but you never calculate on
position
.
Here is a beech and a hemlock
Yes, and there is another beech and a hemlock, as
loving as two brothers, or, for that matter, more loving than
some brothers; and yonder are others, for neither tree is a
rarity in these woods. I fear me, Hurry, you are better at
trapping beaver and shooting bears, than at leading on a
3*
blindish sort of a trail. Ha! there's what you wish to find,
after all!
Now, Deerslayer, this is one of your Delaware
pretensions
,
for, hang me if I see any thing but these trees, which
do seem to start up around us, in a most onaccountable and
perplexing manner.
Look this-a-way, Hurryhere, in a line with the black
oakdon't you see the crooked sapling that is hooked up
in the branches of the bass-wood, near it? Now, that
sapling
was once snow-ridden, and got the bend by its weight;
but it never straightened itself, and fastened itself in among
the bass-wood branches in the way you see. The hand of
man did that act of kindness for it.
That hand was mine! exclaimed Hurry; I found
the slender, young thing, bent to the airth, like an
unfortunate
creatur' borne down by misfortune, and stuck it up
where you see it. After all, Deerslayer, I must allow,
you're getting to have an oncommon good eye for the
woods!
'T is improving, Hurry't is improving, I will
acknowledge
;
but 't is still only a child's eye, compared to
some I know. There's Tamenund, now, though a man so
old that few remember when he was in his prime,
Tamenund
lets nothing escape his look, which is more like the
scent of a hound, than the sight of an eye. Then Uncas,
the father of Chingachgook, and the lawful chief of the
Mohicans, is another that it is almost hopeless to pass
unseen
.
I'm improving, I will allowI'm improving, but
far from being perfect, as yet.
And who is this Chingachgook, of whom you talk so
much, Deerslayer? asked Hurry, as he moved off in the
direction of the righted sapling; a loping red-skin, at the
best, I make no question.
Not so, Hurry, but the best of loping red-skins, as you
call 'em. If he had his rights, he would be a great chief;
but, as it is, he is only a brave and just-minded Delaware;
respected, and even obeyed in some things, 't is true, but of
a fallen race, and belonging to a fallen people. Ah! Harry
March, 't would warm the heart within you to sit in their
lodges of a winter's night, and listen to the traditions of the
ancient greatness and power of the Mohicans!
Harkee, fri'nd Nathaniel, said Hurry, stopping short
to face his companion, in order that his words might carry
greater weight with them, if a man believed all that other
people choose to say in their own favour, he might get an
oversized opinion of them, and an undersized opinion of
himself. These red-skins are notable boasters, and I set
down more than half of their traditions as pure talk.
There is truth in what you say, Hurry, I'll not deny
it, for I've seen it, and believe it. They
do
boast, but then
that is a gift from natur'; and it's sinful to withstand nat'ral
gifts. See; this is the spot you come to find!
This remark cut short the discourse, and both the men
now gave all their attention to the object immediately before
them. Deerslayer pointed out to his companion the trunk
of a huge linden, or bass-wood, as it is termed in the
language
of the country, which had filled its time, and fallen
by its own weight. This tree, like so many millions of its
brethren, lay where it had fallen, and was mouldering under
the slow, but certain influence of the seasons. The decay,
however, had attacked its centre, even while it stood erect,
in the pride of vegetation, hollowing out its heart, as disease
sometimes destroys the vitals of animal life, even while a
fair exterior is presented to the observer. As the trunk lay
stretched for near a hundred feet along the earth, the quick
eye of the hunter detected this peculiarity, and, from this
and other circumstances, he knew it to be the tree of which
March was in search.
Ay, here we have what we want, cried Hurry, looking
in at the larger end of the linden; every thing is as snug
as if it had been left in an old woman's cupboard. Come,
lend me a hand, Deerslayer, and we'll be afloat in half an
hour.
At this call the hunter joined his companion, and the two
went to work deliberately, and regularly, like men
accustomed
to the sort of thing in which they were employed. In
the first place, Hurry removed some pieces of bark that lay
before the large opening in the tree, and which the other
declared to be disposed in a way that would have been more
likely to attract attention, than to conceal the cover, had
any straggler passed that way. The two, then, drew out a
bark canoe, containing its seats, paddles, and other
appliances
,
even to fishing lines and rods. This vessel was by
no means small; but such was its comparative lightness,
and so gigantic was the strength of Hurry, that the latter
shouldered it with seeming ease, declining all assistance,
even in the act of raising it to the awkward position in which
he was obliged to hold it.
Lead ahead, Deerslayer, said March, and open the
bushes; the rest I can do for myself.
The other obeyed, and the men left the spot, Deerslayer
clearing the way for his companion, and inclining to the
right, or to the left, as the latter directed. In about ten
minutes, they both broke suddenly into the brilliant light of
the sun, on a low gravelly point, that was washed by water
on quite half its outline.
An exclamation of surprise broke from the lips of
Deerslayer
,
an exclamation that was low and guardedly made,
however, for his habits were much more thoughtful and
regulated
than those of the reckless Hurry, when, on reaching
the margin of the lake, he beheld the view that unexpectedly
met his gaze. It was, in truth, sufficiently striking to merit
a brief description. On a level with the point lay a broad
sheet of water, so placid and limpid, that it resembled a
bed of the pure mountain atmosphere, compressed into a
setting of hills and woods. Its length was about three leagues,
while its breadth was irregular, expanding to half a league,
or even more, opposite to the point, and contracting to less
than half that distance, more to the southward. Of course,
its margin was irregular, being indented by bays, and broken
by many projecting, low points. At its northern, or nearest
end, it was bounded by an isolated mountain, lower land
falling off, east and west, gracefully relieving the sweep of
the outline. Still the character of the country was
mountainous
;
high hills, or low mountains, rising abruptly from
the water, on quite nine-tenths of its circuit. The
exceptions
,
indeed, only served a little to vary the scene; and even
beyond the parts of the shore that were comparatively low,
the back-ground was high, though more distant.
But the most striking peculiarities of this scene were its
solemn solitude, and sweet repose. On all sides, wherever
the eye turned, nothing met it but the mirror-like surface of
the lake, the placid view of heaven, and the dense setting of
woods. So rich and fleecy were the outlines of the forest,
that scarce an opening could be seen, the whole visible earth,
from the rounded mountain-top to the water's edge,
presenting
one unvaried hue of unbroken verdure. As if
vegetation
were not satisfied with a triumph so complete, the trees
overhung the lake itself, shooting out towards the light; and
there were miles along its eastern shore, where a boat might
have pulled beneath the branches of dark
Rembrandt-looking
hemlocks, quivering aspens, and melancholy pines.
In a word, the hand of man had never yet defaced or
deformed
any part of this native scene, which lay bathed in
the sun-light, a glorious picture of affluent forest-grandeur,
softened by the balminess of June, and relieved by the
beautiful
variety afforded by the presence of so broad an expanse
of water.
This is grand!'t is solemn!'t is an edication of
itself, to look upon! exclaimed Deerslayer, as he stood
leaning on his rifle, and gazing to the right and left, north
and south, above and beneath, in whichever direction his
eye could wander; not a tree disturbed even by red-skin
hand, as I can discover, but every thing left in the ordering
of the Lord, to live and die according to his own designs
and laws! Hurry, your Judith ought to be a moral and
well-disposed young woman, if she has passed half the time
you mention in the centre of a spot so favoured.
That's a naked truth; and yet the gal has the vagaries.
All
her time has not been passed here, howsever, old Tom
having the custom, afore I know'd him, of going to spend
the winters in the neighbourhood of the settlers, or under the
guns of the forts. No, no, Jude has caught more than is for
her good from the settlers, and especially from the
gallantifying
officers.
If she hasif she has, Hurry, this is a school to set
her mind right ag'in. But what is this I see off here,
abreast of us, that seems too small for an island, and too
large for a boat, though it stands in the midst of the water.
Why, that is what these gallanting gentry, from the
forts, call Muskrat Castle; and old Tom, himself, will grin
at the name, though it bears so hard on his own natur' and
character. 'T is the stationary house, there being two; this,
which never moves, and the other, that floats, being
sometimes
in one part of the lake, and sometimes in another.
The last goes by the name of the ark, though what may be
the meaning of the word is more than I can tell you.
It must come from the missionaries, Hurry, whom I
have heard speak and read of such a thing. They say that
the 'arth was once covered with water, and that Noah, with
his children, were saved from drowning by building a vessel
called an ark, in which he embarked in season. Some of
the Delawares believe this tradition, and some deny it; but
it behoves you and me, as white men born, to put our faith
in its truth. Do you see any thing of this ark?
'T is down south, no doubt, or anchored in some of the
bays. But the canoe is ready, and fifteen minutes will carry
two such paddles as your'n and mine, to the castle.
At this suggestion, Deerslayer helped his companion to
place the different articles in the canoe, which was already
afloat. This was no sooner done, than the two
frontier-men
embarked, and, by a vigorous push, sent the light bark
some eight or ten rods from the shore. Hurry now took
the seat in the stern, while Deerslayer placed himself
forward
,
and, by leisurely but steady strokes of the paddles,
the canoe glided across the placid sheet, towards the
extraordinary-looking
structure, that the former had styled
Muskrat
Castle. Several times the men ceased paddling, and
looked about them at the scene, as new glimpses opened
from behind points enabling them to see further down the
lake, or to get broader views of the wooded mountains. The
only changes, however, were in the new forms of the hills,
the varying curvature of the bays, and the wider reaches
of the valley south; the whole earth, apparently, being
clothed in a gala-dress of leaves.
This
is
a sight to warm the heart! exclaimed
Deerslayer
,
when they had thus stopped for the fourth or fifth
time; the lake seems made to let us get an insight into
the noble forests; and land and water, alike, stand in the
beauty of God's providence! Do you say, Hurry, that
there is no man who calls himself lawful owner of all these
glories?
None but the King, lad. He may pretend to some right
of that natur', but he is so far away, that his claim will
never trouble old Tom Hutter, who has got possession, and
is like to keep it as long as his life lasts. Tom is no squatter,
not being on land; but I call him a floater.
I inv
y
that man!I know it's wrong, and I strive
ag'in the feelin', but I inv
y
that man! Don't think, Hurry,
that I'm consarting any plan to put myself in his
moccasins
,
for such a thought doesn't harbour in my mind; but
I can't help a little inv
y
! 'T is a nat'ral feelin', and the
best of us are but nat'ral, after all, and give way to such
feelin's, at times.
You've only to marry Hetty to inherit half the estate,
cried Hurry, laughing; the gal is comely; nay, if it was
n't for her sister's beauty, she would be even handsome; and
then her wits are so small, that you may easily convart her
into one of your own way of thinking, in all things. Do
you
take Hetty off the old fellow's hands, and
I
'll engage
he'll give you an interest in every deer you can knock
over within five miles of his lake.
Does game abound? suddenly demanded the other,
who paid but little attention to March's raillery.
It has the country to itself. Scarce a trigger is pulled
on it; and as for the trappers, this is not a region they greatly
frequent. I ought not to be so much here, myself, but Jude
pulls one way, while the beaver pulls another. More than
a hundred Spanish dollars has that creatur' cost me, the
two last seasons; and yet I could not forego the wish to
look upon her face once more.
Do the red-men often visit this lake, Hurry? continued
Deerslayer, pursuing his own train of thought.
Why, they come and go; sometimes in parties, and
sometimes singly. The country seems to belong to no
native
tribe in particular; and so it has fallen into the hands
of the Hutter tribe. The old man tells me that some sharp
ones have been wheedling the Mohawks for an Indian deed,
in order to get a title out of the Colony; but nothing has
come of it, seeing that no one, heavy enough for such a trade,
has yet meddled with the matter. The hunters have a good
life-lease, still, of this wilderness.
So much the betterso much the better, Hurry. If I
was King of England, the man that felled one of these
trees without good occasion for the timber, should be
banished
to a desarted and forlorn region, in which no
four-footed
animal ever trod. Right glad am I that
Chingachgook
app'inted our meeting on this lake, for, hitherto, eye
of mine never looked on such a glorious spectacle!
That's because you've kept so much among the
Delawares
,
in whose country there are no lakes. Now, farther
north, and father west, these bits of water abound; and
you're young, and may yet live to see 'em. But, though
there be other lakes, Deerslayer, there's no other Judith
Hutter!
At this remark his companion smiled, and then he
dropped his paddle into the water, as if in consideration of
a lover's haste. Both now pulled vigorously until they got
within a hundred yards of the castle, as Hurry
familiarly
called the house of Hutter, when they again ceased
paddling; the admirer of Judith restraining his impatience
the more readily, as he perceived that the building was
untenanted
,
at the moment. This new pause was to enable
Deerslayer to survey the singular edifice, which was of a
construction so novel as to merit a particular description.
Muskrat Castle, as the house had been facetiously named
by some waggish officer, stood in the open lake, at a
distance
of fully a quarter of a mile from the nearest shore.
On every other side the water extended much farther, the
precise position being distant about two miles from the
northern end of the sheet, and near, if not quite a mile
from its eastern shore. As there was not the smallest
appearance
of any island, but the house stood on piles, with
the water flowing beneath it, and Deerslayer had already
discovered that the lake was of a great depth, he was fain
to ask an explanation of this singular circumstance. Hurry
solved the difficulty by telling him that on this spot alone,
a long narrow shoal, which extended for a few hundred
yards in a north and south direction, rose within six or
eight feet of the surface of the lake, and that Hutter had
driven piles into it, and placed his habitation on them, for
the purpose of security.
The old fellow was burnt out three times, atween the
Indians and the hunters; and in one affray with the
red-skins
he lost his only son, since which time he has taken
to the water for safety. No one can attack him, here,
without coming in a boat, and the plunder and scalps would
scarce be worth the trouble of digging out canoes. Then
it's by no means sartain which would whip, in such a
skrimmage, for old Tom is well supplied with arms and
ammunition, and the castle, as you may see, is a tight
breast-work, ag'in light shot.
Deerslayer had some theoretical knowledge of frontier
warfare, though he had never yet been called on to raise
his hand, in anger, against a fellow-creature. He saw that
Hurry did not overrate the strength of this position, in a
military point of view, since it would not be easy to attack
it, without exposing the assailants to the fire of the
besieged
.
A good deal of art had also been manifested in the
disposition of the timber, of which the building was
constructed
,
and which afforded a protection much greater than
was usual to the ordinary log-cabins of the frontier. The
sides and ends were composed of the trunks of large pines,
cut about nine feet long, and placed upright, instead of being
laid horizontally, as was the practice of the country. These
logs were squared on three sides, and had large tenons on
each end. Massive sills were secured on the heads of the
piles, with suitable grooves dug out of their upper surfaces,
which had been squared for the purpose, and the lower
tenons of the upright pieces were placed in these grooves,
giving them a secure fastening below. Plates had been laid
on the upper ends of the upright logs, and were kept in their
places by a similar contrivance; the several corners of the
structure being well fastened by scarfing and pinning the
sills and plates. The floors were made of smaller logs,
similarly squared, and the roof was composed of light poles,
firmly united, and well covered with bark. The effect of
this ingenious arrangement was to give its owner a house
that could be aprroached only by water, the sides of which
were composed of logs, closely wedged together, which were
two feet thick in their thinnest parts, and which could be
separated only by a deliberate and laborious use of human
hands, or by the slow operation of time. The outer surface
of the building was rude and uneven, the logs being of
unequal
sizes; but the squared surfaces within, gave both the
sides and floor as uniform an appearance as was desired,
either for use or show. The chimney was not the least
singular portion of the castle, as Hurry made his companion
Vol. I.4
observe, while he explained the process by which it had
been made. The material was a stiff clay, properly worked,
which had been put together in a mould of sticks, and
suffered
to harden, a foot or two at a time, commencing at the
bottom. When the entire chimney had thus been raised,
and had been properly bound in with outward props, a brisk
fire was kindled, and kept going until it was burned to
something like a brick-red. This had not been an easy
operation, nor had it succeeded entirely; but by dint of filling
the cracks with fresh clay, a safe fire-place and chimney
had been obtained in the end. This part of the work stood
on the log-floor, secured beneath by an extra pile. There
were a few other peculiarities about this dwelling, which
will better appear in the course of the narrative.
Old Tom is full of contrivances, added Hurry, and he
set his heart on the success of his chimney, which threatened,
more than once, to give out altogether; but parseverance
will even overcome smoke; and now he has a comfortable
cabin of it, though it did promise, at one time, to be a chinky
sort of a flue to carry flames and fire.
You seem to know the whole history of the castle,
Hurry, chimney and sides, said Deerslayer, smiling; is
love so overcoming that it causes a man to study the story
of his sweetheart's habitation?
Partly that, lad, and partly eyesight, returned the
good-natured giant, laughing; there was a large gang of
us, in at the lake, the summer the old fellow built, and we
helped him along with the job. I raised no small part of
the weight of them uprights, with my own shoulders, and
the axes flew, I can inform you, Master Natty, while we
were bee-ing it among the trees ashore. The old devil is no
way stingy about food, and as we had often eat at his hearth,
we thought we would just house him comfortably, afore we
went to Albany with our skins. Yes, many is the meal I've
swallowed in Tom Hutter's cabins; and Hetty, though so
weak in the way of wits, has a wonderful particular way
about a frying-pan or a gridiron!
While the parties were thus discoursing, the canoe had
been gradually drawing nearer to the castle, and was
now so close, as to require but a single stroke of a paddle
to reach the landing. This was at a floored platform in
front of the entrance, that might have been some twenty
feet square.
Old Tom calls this sort of a wharf, his door-yard,
observed
Hurry, as he fastened the canoe, after he and his
companion had left it; and the gallants from the forts have
named it the `castle court,' though what a `court' can have
to do here, is more than I can tell you, seeing that there is
no law. 'T is as I supposed; not a soul within, but the
whole family is off on a v'y'ge of discovery!
While Hurry was bustling about the door-yard,
examining
the fishing-spears, rods, nets, and other similar
appliances
of a frontier cabin, Deerslayer, whose manner was
altogether more rebuked and quiet, entered the building,
with a curiosity that was not usually exhibited by one so
long trained in Indian habits. The interior of the castle
was as faultlessly neat, as its exterior was novel. The
entire space, some twenty feet by forty, was subdivided into
several small sleeping-rooms; the apartment into which he
first entered, serving equally for the ordinary uses of its
inmates, and for a kitchen. The furniture was of the strange
mixture that it is not uncommon to find in the remotely
situated log-tenements of the interior. Most of it was rude,
and, to the last degree, rustic; but there was a clock, with a
handsome case of dark wood, in a corner, and two or three
chairs, with a table and bureau, that had evidently come
from some dwelling of more than usual pretension. The
clock was industriously ticking, but its leaden-looking hands
did no discredit to their dull aspect, for they pointed to the
hour of eleven, though the sun plainly showed it was some
time past the turn of the day. There was also a dark,
massive chest. The kitchen utensils were of the simplest
kind, and far from numerous, but every article was in its
place, and showed the nicest care in its condition.
After Deerslayer had cast a look about him in the outer
room, he raised a wooden latch, and entered a narrow
passage
that divided the inner end of the house into two equal
parts. Frontier usages being no way scrupulous, and his
curiosity being strongly excited, the young man now opened
a door, and found himself in a bed-room. A single glance
sufficed to show that the apartment belonged to females.
The bed was of the feathers of wild-geese, and filled nearly to
overflowing; but it lay in a rude bunk, raised only a foot
from the floor. On one side of it were arranged, on pegs,
various dresses, of a quality much superior to what one
would expect to meet in such a place, with ribands, and other
similar articles, to correspond. Pretty shoes, with
handsome
silver buckles, such as were then worn by females in
easy circumstances, were not wanting; and no less than six
fans, of gay colours, were placed half open, in a way to
catch the eye by their conceits and hues. Even the pillow,
on this side of the bed, was covered with finer linen than its
companion, and it was ornamented with a small ruffle. A
cap, coquettishly decorated with ribands, hung above it, and
a pair of long gloves, such as were rarely used in those days
by persons of the labouring classes, were pinned
ostentatiously
to it, as if with an intention to exhibit them there, if
they could not be shown on the owner's arms.
All this Deerslayer saw, and noted with a degree of
minuteness
that would have done credit to the habitual
observation
of his friends, the Delawares. Nor did he fail to
perceive the distinction that existed between the appearances
on the different sides of the bed, the head of which stood
against the wall. On that opposite to the one just described,
every thing was homely, and uninviting, except through its
perfect neatness. The few garments that were hanging
from the pegs, were of the coarsest materials, and of the
commonest forms, while nothing seemed made for show.
Of ribands there was not one; nor was there either cap or
kerchief, beyond those which Hutter's daughters might be
fairly entitled to wear.
It was now several years since Deerslayer had been in a
spot especially devoted to the uses of females of his own
colour and race. The sight brought back to his mind a
rush of childish recollections; and he lingered in the room
with a tenderness of feeling to which he had long been a
stranger. He bethought him of his mother, whose homely
vestments he remembered to have seen hanging on pegs,
like those which he felt must belong to Hetty Hutter; and
he bethought himself of a sister, whose incipient and native
taste for finery had exhibited itself somewhat in the manner
of that of Judith, though necessarily in a less degree.
These little resemblances opened a long-hidden vein of
sensations
;
and as he quitted the room, it was with a saddened
mien. He looked no further, but returned slowly and
thoughtfully towards the door-yard.
Old Tom has taken to a new calling, and has been
trying
his hand at the traps, cried Hurry, who had been coolly
examining the borderer's implements; if that is his
humour
,
and you're disposed to remain in these parts, we can
make an oncommon comfortable season of it; for, while the
old man and I out-knowledge the beaver, you can fish, and
knock down the deer, to keep body and soul together. We
always give the poorest hunters half a share, but one as
act
y
ve and sartain as yourself, might expect a full one.
Thank'ee, Hurry; thank'ee, with all my heartbut I
do a little beavering for myself, as occasions offer. 'T is
true, the Delawares call me Deerslayer, but it's not so much
because I'm pretty fatal with the venison, as because that
while I kill so many bucks and does, I've never yet taken
the life of a fellow-creatur'! They say their traditions do
not tell of another who had shed so much blood of animals,
that had not shed the blood of man.
I hope they don't account you chicken-hearted, lad? A
faint-hearted man is like a no-tailed beaver.
I don't believe, Hurry, that they account me as
out-of-the-way
timorsome, even though they may not account me as
out-of-the-way brave. But I'm not quarrelsome; and that
goes a great way towards keeping blood off the hands, among
the hunters and red-skins; and then, Harry March, it keeps
blood off the conscience, too.
Well, for my part, I account game, a red-skin, and a
Frenchman as pretty much the same thing; though I'm as
onquarrelsome a man, too, as there is in all the Colonies. I
despise a quarreller, as I do a cur-dog; but one has no need
to be over-scrupulsome, when it's the right time to show
the flint.
I look upon him as the most of a man, who acts nearest
the right, Hurry. But this is a glorious spot, and my eyes
never a-weary looking at it!
'T is your first acquaintance with a lake; and these
idees come over us all, at such times. Lakes have a
general
character, as I say, being pretty much water and land,
and points and bays.
4*
As this definition by no means met the feelings that were
uppermost in the mind of the young hunter, he made no
immediate
answer, but stood gazing at the dark hills, and the
glassy water, in silent enjoyment.
Have the Governor's, or the King's people given this
lake a name? he suddenly asked, as if struck with a new
idea. If they 've not begun to blaze their trees, and set
up their compasses, and line off their maps, it's likely
they've not bethought them to disturb natur' with a name.
They've not got to that, yet; and the last time I went
in with skins, one of the King's surveyors was questioning
me consarning all the region hereabouts. He had heard
that there was a lake in this quarter, and had got some
general notions about it, such as that there was water and
hills; but how much of either, he know'd no more than you
know of the Mohawk tongue. I did n't open the trap any
wider than was necessary, giving him but poor
encouragement
in the way of farms and clearings. In short, I left on
his mind some such opinion of this country as a man gets
of a spring of dirty water, with a path to it that is so muddy
that one mires afore he sets out. He told me they had n't
got the spot down, yet, on their maps; though I conclude
that is a mistake, for he showed me his parchment, and
there is a lake down on it where there is no lake, in fact,
and which is about fifty miles from the place where it ought
to be, if they meant it for this. I don't think my account
will encourage him to mark down another, by way of
improvement
.
Here Hurry laughed heartily, such tricks being
particularly
grateful to a set of men who dreaded the approaches
of civilization as a curtailment of their own lawless empire.
The egregious errors that existed in the maps of the day, all
of which were made in Europe, was, moreover, a standing
topic of ridicule among them; for, if they had not science
enough to make any better themselves, they had sufficient
local information to detect the gross blunders contained in
those that existed. Any one, who will take the trouble to
compare these unanswerable evidences of the topographical
skill of our fathers a century since, with the more accurate
sketches of our own time, will at once perceive that the men
of the woods had sufficient justification for all their criticism
on this branch of the skill of the colonial governments, which
did not at all hesitate to place a river, or a lake, a degree
or two out of the way, even though they lay within a day's
march of the inhabited parts of the country.
I'm glad it has no name, resumed Deerslayer, or, at
least, no pale-face name; for their christenings always
foretell
waste and destruction. No doubt, howsever, the
red-skins
have their modes of knowing it, and the hunters and
trappers, too; they are likely to call the place by something
reasonable and resembling.
As for the tribes, each has its own tongue, and its own
way of calling things; and they treat this part of the world
just as they treat all others. Among ourselves, we've got
to calling the place the `Glimmerglass,' seeing that its whole
basin is so often fringed with pines, cast upward from its
face; as if it would throw back the hills that hang over it.
There is an outlet, I know, for all lakes have outlets,
and the rock at which I am to meet Chingachgook stands
near an outlet. Has
that
no Colony-name, yet?
In that particular they've got the advantage of us,
having one end, and that the biggest, in their own keeping;
they've given it a name which has found its way up to its
source; names nat'rally working up stream. No doubt,
Deerslayer, you've seen the Susquehannah, down in the
Delaware country?
That have I, and hunted along its banks a hundred
times.
That and this are the same, in fact, and, I suppose, the
same in sound. I am glad they've been compelled to keep
the red-men's name, for it would be too hard to rob them of
both land and name!
Deerslayer made no answer; but he stood leaning on his
rifle, gazing at the view which so much delighted him. The
reader is not to suppose, however, that it was the picturesque
alone which so strongly attracted his attention. The spot
was very lovely, of a truth, and it was then seen in one of
its most favourable moments, the surface of the lake being
as smooth as glass, and as limpid as pure air, throwing back
the mountains, clothed in dark pines, along the whole of its
eastern boundary, the points thrusting forward their trees
even to nearly horizontal lines, while the bays were seen
glittering through an occasional arch beneath, left by a vault
fretted with branches and leaves. It was the air of deep
reposethe solitudes, that spoke of scenes and forests
untouched
by the hands of manthe reign of nature, in a
word, that gave so much pure delight to one of his habits
and turn of mind. Still, he felt, though it was unconsciously,
like a poet also. If he found a pleasure in studying this
large, and, to him, unusual opening into the mysteries and
forms of the woods, as one is gratified in getting broader
views of any subject that has long occupied his thoughts, he
was not insensible to the innate loveliness of such a
landscape
neither, but felt a portion of that soothing of the spirit
which is a common attendant of a scene so thoroughly
pervaded
by the holy calm of nature.
CHAPTER III.
Come, shall we go and kill us venison?
And yet it irks me, the poor dappled fools,
Being native burghers of this desert city,
Should, in their own confines, with forked heads
Have their round haunches gored.
Shakspeare
.
Hurry Harry
thought more of the beauties of Judith
Hutter, than of those of the Glimmerglass, and its
accompanying
scenery. As soon as he had taken a sufficiently
intimate survey of Floating Tom's implements, therefore, he
summoned his companion to the canoe, that they might go
down the lake in quest of the family. Previously to
embarking
,
however, Hurry carefully examined the whole of
the northern end of the water, with an indifferent ship's
glass, that formed a part of Hutter's effects. In this
scrutiny
,
no part of the shore was overlooked; the bays and
points, in particular, being subjected to a closer inquiry than
the rest of the wooded boundary.
'T is as I thought, said Hurry, laying aside the glass,
the old fellow is drifting about the south end, this fine
weather, and has left the castle to defend itself. Well, now
we know that he is not up this-a-way; 't will be but a small
matter to paddle down, and hunt him up in his hiding-place.
Does Master Hutter think it necessary to burrow on
this lake? inquired Deerslayer, as he followed his
companion
into the canoe; to my eye, it is such a solitude as
one might open his whole soul in, and fear no one to
disarrange
his thoughts, or his worship.
You forget your friends, the Mingos, and all the French
savages. Is there a spot on 'arth, Deerslayer, to which
them disquiet rogues don't go? Where is the lake, or even
the deer-lick, that the blackguards don't find out; and,
having
found out, don't, sooner or late, discolour its water with
blood?
I hear no good character of them, sartainly, friend
Hurry, though I've never been called on, as yet, to meet
them, or any other mortal, on the war-path. I dare to say
that such a lovely spot as this, would not be likely to be
overlooked by such plunderers; for, though I've not been
in the way of quarrelling with them tribes myself, the
Delawares
give me such an account of 'em, that I've pretty much
set'em down, in my own mind, as thorough miscreants.
You may do that with a safe conscience, or, for that
matter, any other savage you may happen to meet.
Here Deerslayer protested, and, as they went paddling
down the lake, a hot discussion was maintained concerning
the respective merits of the pale-faces and the red-skins.
Hurry had all the prejudices and antipathies of a white
hunter, who generally regards the Indian as a sort of
natural
competitor, and, not unfrequently, as a natural enemy.
As a matter of course, he was loud, clamorous, dogmatical,
and not very argumentative. Deerslayer, on the other hand,
manifested a very different temper; proving, by the
moderation
of his language, the fairness of his views; and the
simplicity
of his distinctions, that he possessed every disposition
to hear reason, a strong, innate desire to do justice, and an
ingenuousness that was singularly indisposed to have
recourse
to sophisms to maintain an argument, or to defend a
prejudice. Still, he was not altogether free from the
influence
of the latter feeling. This tyrant of the human mind,
which rushes on its prey through a thousand avenues,
almost
as soon as men begin to think and feel, and which
seldom relinquishes his iron sway until they cease to do
either, had made some impression on even the just
propensities
of this individual, who probably offered, in these
particulars
,
a fair specimen of what absence from bad
example
,
the want of temptation to go wrong, and native good
feeling, can render youth.
You will allow, Deerslayer, that a Mingo is more than
half devil, cried Hurry, following up the discussion with an
animation that touched closely on ferocity, though you
want to over-persuade me that the Delaware tribe is pretty
much made up of angels. Now, I gainsay that proposal,
consarning white men, even. All white men are not
faultless
,
and therefore all Indians
can't
be faultless. And so
your argument is out at the elbow, in the start. But, this is
what I call reason. Here's three colours on 'arth; white,
black, and red. White is the highest colour, and therefore
the best man; black comes next, and is put to live in the
neighbourhood of the white man, as tolerable, and fit to be
made use of; and red comes last, which shows that those
that made 'em never expected an Indian to be accounted as
more than half human.
God made all three alike, Hurry.
Alike! Do you call a nigger like a white man, or me
like an Indian?
You go off at half-cock, and don't hear me out. God
made us all, white, black, and red; and, no doubt, had his
own wise intentions in colouring us differently. Still, he
made us, in the main, much the same in feelin's; though,
I'll not deny that he gave each race its gifts. A white
man's gifts are christianized, while a red-skin's are more for
the wilderness. Thus, it would be a great offence for a
white man to scalp the dead; whereas, it's a signal vartue
in an Indian. Then ag'in, a white man cannot amboosh
women and children in war, while a red-skin may. 'T is
cruel
work, I'll allow; but for them it's
lawful
work;
while for
us,
it would be grievous work.
That depends on your inimy. As for scalping, or even
skinning a savage, I look upon them pretty much the same
as cutting off the ears of wolves, for the bounty, or stripping
a bear of its hide. And then you're out significantly, as to
taking the poll of a red-skin in hand, seeing that the very
Colony has offered a bounty for the job; all the same as it
pays for wolves' ears, and crows' heads.
Ay, and a bad business it is, Hurry. Even the Indians,
themselves, cry shame on it, seeing it's ag'in a white man's
gifts. I do not pretend that all that white men do, is
properly
christianized, and according to the lights given them;
for then they would be what they
ought
to be; which we
know they are not; but I will maintain that tradition, and
use, and colour, and laws, make such a difference in
races as to amount to gifts. I do not deny that there are
tribes among the Indians that are nat'rally pervarse and
wicked, as there are nations among the whites. Now, I
account the Mingos as belonging to the first, and the
Frenchers
,
in the Canadas, to the last. In a state of lawful
warfare
,
such as we have lately got into, it is a duty to keep
down all compassionate feelin's, so far as life goes, ag'in
either; but when it comes to scalps, it's a very different
matter.
Just hearken to reason, if you please, Deerslayer, and
tell me if the Colony can make an onlawful law? Is n't an
onlawful law more ag'in natur' than scalpin' a savage?
A law can no more be onlawful, than truth can be a lie.
That
sounds
reasonable; but it has a most onreasonable
bearing, Hurry. Laws don't all come from the same
quarter. God has given us his'n, and some come from the
Colony, and others come from the king and parliament.
When the Colony's laws, or even the King's laws, run ag'in
the laws of God, they get to be onlawful, and ought not to
be obeyed. I hold to a white man's respecting white laws,
so long as they do not cross the track of a law comin' from
a higher authority; and for a red-man to obey his own
redskin
usages, under the same privilege. But, 't is useless
talking, as each man will think for himself, and have his
say agreeable to his thoughts. Let us keep a good
lookout
for your friend, Floating Tom, lest we pass him, as he
lies hidden under this bushy shore.
Deerslayer had not named the borders of the lake amiss.
Along their whole length, the smaller trees overhung the
water, with their branches often dipping in the transparent
element. The banks were steep, even from the narrow
strand; and, as vegetation invariably struggles towards the
light, the effect was precisely that at which the lover of the
picturesque would have aimed, had the ordering of this
glorious
setting of forest been submitted to his control. The
points and bays, too, were sufficiently numerous to render
the outline broken and diversified. As the canoe kept close
along the western side of the lake, with a view, as Hurry
had explained to his companion, of reconnoitring for
enemies
,
before he trusted himself too openly in sight, the
expectations
of the two adventurers were kept constantly on
the stretch, as neither could foretell what the next turning
of a point might reveal. Their progress was swift, the
gigantic strength of Hurry enabling him to play with the
light bark as if it had been a feather, while the skill of his
companion almost equalized their usefulness, notwithstanding
the disparity in natural means.
Each time the canoe passed a point, Hurry turned a look
behind him, expecting to see the ark anchored, or beached
in the bay. He was fated to be disappointed, however; and
they had got within a mile of the southern end of the lake,
or a distance of quite two leagues from the castle, which
was now hidden from view by half a dozen intervening
projections
of the land, when he suddenly ceased paddling, a
if uncertain in what direction next to steer.
It is possible that the old chap has dropped into the
river, said Hurry, after looking carefully along the whole
of the eastern shore, which was about a mile distant, and
open to his scrutiny for more than half its length; for he
has taken to trapping considerable, of late, and, barring
flood-wood, he might drop down it, a mile or so; though he
would have a most scratching time in getting back again!
Where is this outlet? asked Deerslayer; I see no
opening in the banks, or the trees, that looks as if it would
let a river like the Susquehannah run through it.
Ay, Deerslayer, rivers are like human mortals; having
small beginnings, and ending with broad shoulders, and wide
mouths. You don't see the outlet, because it passes atween
high, steep banks; and the pines, and hemlocks, and
basswoods
hang over it, as a roof hangs over a house. If old
Tom is not in the `Rat's Cove,' he must have burrowed in
the river; we'll look for him first in the Cove, and then
we'll cross to the outlet.
As they proceeded, Hurry explained that there was a
shallow bay, formed by a long, low point, that had gotten
the name of the Rat's Cove, from the circumstance of its
being a favourite haunt of the muskrat; and which offered
so complete a cover for the ark, that its owner was fond
of lying in it, whenever he found it convenient.
As a man never knows who may be his visiters, in this
part of the country, continued Hurry, it's a great
advantage
to get a good look at 'em, before they come too near.
Now it's war, such caution is more than commonly useful,
since a Canadian, or a Mingo, might get into his hut afore
he invited 'em. But Hutter is a first-rate look-outer, and
can pretty much scent danger, as a hound scents the deer.
I should think the castle so open, that it would be
sartain
to draw inimies, if any happened to find the lake; a
thing onlikely enough, I will allow, as it's off the trail of
the forts and settlements.
Why, Deerslayer, I've got to believe that a man meets
with inimies easier than he meets with fri'nds. It's
skearful
to think for how many causes one gets to be your inimy,
and for how few your fri'nd. Some take up the hatchet
because you don't think just as they think; other some
because
you run ahead of 'em in the same idees; and I once
know'd a vagabond that quarrelled with a fri'nd because he
didn't think him handsome. Now, you're no monument,
in the way of beauty, yourself, Deerslayer, and yet you
wouldn't be so onreasonable as to become my inimy for
just saying so.
I'm as the Lord made me; and I wish to be accounted
no better, nor any worse. Good looks I may not have;
that is to say, to a degree that the light-minded and vain
crave; but I hope I'm not altogether without some
ricommend
in the way of good conduct. There's few nobler
looking men to be seen than yourself, Hurry; and I know
that I am not to expect any to turn their eyes on me, when
such a one as you can be gazed on; but I do not know that
a hunter is less expart with the rifle, or less to be relied on
for food, because he doesn't wish to stop at every shining
Vol. I.5
spring he may meet, to study his own countenance in the
water.
Here Hurry burst into a fit of loud laughter; for, while
he was too reckless to care much about his own manifest
physical superiority, he was well aware of it, and, like most
men who derive an advantage from the accidents of birth,
or nature, he was apt to think complacently on the subject,
whenever it happened to cross his mind.
No, no, Deerslayer, you're no beauty, as you will own
yourself, if you'll look over the side of the canoe, he cried;
Jude will say
that
to your face, if you start her, for a
parter tongue isn't to be found in any gal's head, in or out
of the settlements, if you provoke her to use it. My advice
to you, is never to aggravate Judith; though you may tell
any thing to Hetty, and she'll take it as meek as a lamb.
No, Jude will be just as like as not to tell you her opinion
consarning your looks.
And if she does, Hurry, she will tell me no more than
you have said already
You're not thick'ning up about a small remark, I hope,
Deerslayer, when no harm is meant. You are
not
a beauty,
as you must know, and why shouldn't fri'nds tell each other
these little trifles? If you
was
handsome, or ever like to
be, I'd be one of the first to tell you of it; and that ought
to content you. Now, if Jude was to tell me that I'm as
ugly as a sinner, I'd take it as a sort of obligation, and try
not to believe her.
It's easy for them that natur' has favoured, to jest
about such matters, Hurry, though it is sometimes hard for
others. I'll not deny but I've had my cravings towards
good looks; yes, I have; but then I've always been able to
get them down by considering how many I've known with
fair outsides, who have had nothing to boast of inwardly.
I'll not deny, Hurry, that I often wish I'd been created
more comely to the eye, and more like such a one as
yourself
,
in them particulars; but then I get the feelin' under by
remembering how much better off I am, in a great many
respects, than some fellow-mortals. I might have been born
lame, and onfit, even for a squirrel hunt; or, blind, which
would have made me a burthen on myself, as well as on my
fri'nds; or, without hearing, which would have totally
onqualified
me for ever campaigning, or scouting, which I look
forward to, as part of a man's duty in troublesome times.
Yes, yes; it's not pleasant, I will allow, to see them that's
more comely, and more sought after, and honoured than
yourself; but it may all be borne, if a man looks the evil in
the face, and don't mistake his gifts and his obligations.
Hurry, in the main, was a good-hearted, as well as
goodnatured
fellow; and the self-abasement of his companion
completely got the better of the passing feeling of personal
vanity. He regretted the allusion he had made to the other's
appearance, and endeavoured to express as much, though it
was done in the uncouth manner that belonged to the habits
and opinions of the frontier.
I meant no harm, Deerslayer, he answered, in a
deprecating
manner, and hope you'll forget what I've said.
If you're not downright handsome, you've a sartain look
that says, plainer than any words, that all's right within.
Then you set no valie by looks, and will the sooner
forgive
any little slight to your appearance. I will not say
that Jude will greatly admire you, for that might raise
hopes that would only breed disapp'intment; but there's
Hetty, now, would be just as likely to find satisfaction in
looking at
you,
as in looking at any other man. Then
you're altogether too grave and considerate-like, to care
much about Judith; for, though the gal
is
oncommon, she
is so general in her admiration, that a man need not be
exalted, because she happens to smile. I sometimes think
the hussy loves herself better than she does any thing else
breathin'!
If she did, Hurry, she'd do no more, I'm afeard, than
most queens on their thrones, and ladies in the towns,
answered
Deerslayer, smiling, and turning back towards his
companion with every trace of feeling banished from his
honest-looking and frank countenance. I never yet
know'd even a Delaware of whom you might not say that
much. But here is the end of the long p'int, you mentioned,
and the `Rat's Cove' can't be far off.
This point, instead of thrusting itself forward, like all the
others, ran in a line with the main shore of the lake, which
here swept within it, in a deep and retired bay, circling round
south again, at the distance of a quarter of a mile, and crossed
the valley, forming the southern termination of the water.
In this bay Hurry felt almost certain of finding the ark,
since, anchored behind the trees that covered the narrow
strip of the point, it might have lain concealed from prying
eyes an entire summer. So complete, indeed, was the
cover, in this spot, that a boat hauled close to the beach,
within the point, and near the bottom of the bay, could by
possibility be seen from only one direction; and that was
from a densely-wooded shore, within the sweep of the water,
where strangers would be little apt to go.
We shall soon see the ark, said Hurry, as the canoe
glided round the extremity of the point, where the water was
so deep as actually to appear black; he loves to burrow up
among the rushes, and we shall be in his nest in five minutes,
although the old fellow may be off among the traps, himself.
March proved a false prophet. The canoe completely
doubled the point, so as to enable the two travellers to
command
a view of the whole cove, or bay, for it was more
properly
the last, and no object, but those that nature had
placed there, became visible. The placid water swept round
in a graceful curve, the rushes bent gently towards its
surface
,
and the trees overhung it as usual; but all lay in the
soothing and sublime solitude of a wilderness. The scene
was such as a poet, or an artist would have delighted in,
but it had no charm for Hurry Harry, who was burning
with impatience to get a sight of his light-minded beauty.
The motion of the canoe had been attended with little or
no noise, the frontier-men, habitually, getting accustomed
to caution, in most of their movements, and it now lay on
the glassy water appearing to float in air, partaking of the
breathing stillness that seemed to pervade the entire scene.
At this instant a dry stick was heard cracking on the narrow
strip of land, that concealed the bay from the open lake. Both
the adventurers started, and each extended a hand towards
his rifle, the weapon never being out of reach of the arm.
'T was too heavy for any light creatur', whispered
Hurry, and it sounded like the tread of a man!
Not sonot so, returned Deerslayer; 't was, as you
say, too heavy for one, but it was too light for the other.
Put your paddle in the water, and send the canoe in, to that
log; I'll land, and cut off the creatur's retreat up the p'int,
be it a Mingo, or be it only a muskrat.
As Hurry complied, Deerslayer was soon on the shore,
advancing into the thicket with a moccasin'd foot, and a
caution
that prevented the least noise. In a minute he was in
the centre of the narrow strip of land, and moving slowly
down towards its end, the bushes rendering extreme
watchfulness
necessary. Just as he reached the centre of the
thicket, the dried twigs cracked again, and the noise was
repeated, at short intervals, as if some creature having life,
walked slowly towards the point. Hurry heard these sounds
also, and, pushing the canoe off into the bay, he seized his
rifle to watch the result. A breathless minute succeeded, after
which a noble buck walked out of the thicket, proceeded
with a stately step to the sandy extremity of the point, and
began to slake his thirst from the water of the lake. Hurry
hesitated an instant; then raising his rifle hastily to his
shoulder, he took sight and fired. The effect of this sudden
interruption of the solemn stillness of such a scene, was
not its least striking peculiarity. The report of the weapon
had the usual sharp, short sound of the rifle; but, when a
few moments of silence had succeeded the sudden crack,
during which the noise was floating in air across the
water, it reached the rocks of the opposite mountain, where
the vibrations accumulated, and were rolled from cavity to
cavity for miles along the hills, seeming to awaken the
sleeping
thunders of the woods. The buck merely shook his
head at the report of the rifle, and the whistling of the bullet,
for never before had he come in contact with man; but the
echoes of the hills awakened his distrust, and, leaping
forward
,
with his four legs drawn under his body, he fell at
once into deep water, and began to swim towards the foot
of the lake. Hurry shouted, and dashed forward in chase,
and for one or two minutes the water foamed around the
pursuer and the pursued. The former was dashing past the
point, when Deerslayer appeared on the sand, and signed to
him to return.
'T was inconsiderate to pull a trigger afore we had
reconn'itred
the shore, and made sartain that no inimies
harboured
near it, said the latter, as his companion slowly
and reluctantly complied. This much I have l'arned from
5*
the Delawares, in the way of schooling and traditions, even
though I've never yet been on a war-path. And, moreover,
venison can hardly be called in season, now, and we do not
want for food. They call me Deerslayer, I'll own; and
perhaps I desarve the name, in the way of understanding
the creatur's habits, as well as for sartainty in the aim; but
they can't accuse me of killing an animal when there is no
occasion for the meat, or the skin. I may be a slayer, it's
true, but I'm no slaughterer.
'T was an awful mistake to miss that buck! exclaimed
Hurry, doffing his cap and running his fingers through his
handsome, but matted curls, as if he would loosen his
tangled ideas by the process; I've not done so onhandy
a thing since I was fifteen.
Never lament it; the creatur's death could have done
neither of us any good, and might have done us harm.
Them echoes are more awful, in my ears, than your
mistake
,
Hurry; for they sound like the voice of natur' calling
out ag'in a wasteful and onthinking action.
You'll hear plenty of such calls, if you tarry long in
this quarter of the world, lad, returned the other laughing.
The echoes repeat pretty much all that is said or done on
the Glimmerglass, in this calm summer weather. If a paddle
falls, you hear of it, sometimes, ag'in and ag'in; as if the
hills were mocking your clumsiness; and a laugh, or a
whistle, comes out of them pines, when they're in the
humour
to speak, in a way to make you believe they can
r'ally convarse.
So much the more reason for being prudent and silent.
I do not think the inimy can have found their way into
these hills yet, for I don't know what they are to gain by
it; but all the Delawares tell me, that as courage is a
warrior's
first vartue, so is prudence his second. One such call,
from the mountains, is enough to let a whole tribe into the
secret of our arrival.
If it does no other good, it will warn old Tom to put
the pot over, and let him know visiters are at hand. Come,
lad; get into the canoe, and we will hunt the ark up, while
there is yet day.
Deerslayer complied, and the canoe left the spot. Its
head was turned diagonally across the lake, pointing towards
the south-eastern curvature of the sheet. In that direction,
the distance to the shore, or to the termination of the lake,
on the course the two were now steering, was not quite a
mile, and their progress being always swift, it was fast
lessening
,
under the skilful, but easy sweeps of the paddles.
When about half-way across, a slight noise drew the eyes
of the men towards the nearest land, and they saw that
the buck was just emerging from the lake, and wading
towards
the beach. In a minute the noble animal shook the
water from his flanks, gazed upward at the covering of
trees, and, bounding against the bank, plunged into the
forest.
That creatur' goes off with gratitude in his heart, said
Deerslayer, for natur' tells him he has escaped a great
danger. You ought to have some of the same feelins',
Hurry, to think your eye wasn't truerthat your hand
was onsteady, when no good could come of a shot that was
intended onmeaningly, rather than in reason.
I deny the eye and the hand, cried March, with some
heat. You've got a little character, down among the
Delawares, there, for quickness and sartainty, at a deer;
but I should like to see you behind one of them pines, and
a full-painted Mingo behind another, each with a cock'd
rifle, and a-striving for the chance! Them's the situations,
Nathaniel, to try the sight and the hand, for they begin with
trying the narves. I never look upon killing a creatur' as
an explite; but killing a savage is. The time will come to
try your hand, now we've got to blows ag'in, and we shall
soon know what a ven'son repitation can do in the field. I
deny that either hand or eye was onsteady; it was all a
miscalculation of the buck, which stood still when he ought
to have kept in motion, and so I shot ahead of him.
Have it your own way, Hurry; all I contend for is, that
it's lucky. I dare say I shall not pull upon a human
mortal
as steadily, or with as light a heart, as I pull upon a
deer.
Who's talking of mortals, or of human beings at all,
Deerslayer? I put the matter to you on the supposition of
an Indian. I dare say any man would have his feelin's
when it got to be life, or death, ag'in another human mortal;
but there would be no such scruples in regard to an Indian;
nothing but the chance of his hitting you, or the chance of
your hitting him.
I look upon the red-men to be quite as human as
we are ourselves, Hurry. They have their gifts, and their
religion, it's true; but that makes no difference in the end,
when each will be judged according to his deeds, and not
according to his skin.
That's downright missionary, and will find little favour
up in this part of the country, where the Moravians don't
congregate. Now, skin makes the man. This is reason;
else how are people to judge of each other. The skin is
put on, over all, in order that when a creatur', or a mortal,
is fairly seen, you may know at once what to make of him.
You know a bear from a hog, by his skin, and a grey
squirrel
from a black.
True, Hurry, said the other, looking back and smiling,
nevertheless, they are both squirrels.
Who denies it? But you'll not say that a red-man
and a white man are both Indians?
No; but I
do
say they are both men. Men of
different
races and colours, and having different gifts and
traditions
,
but, in the main, with the same natur'. Both have
souls; and both will be held accountable for their deeds in
this life.
Hurry was one of those theorists who believed in the
inferiority
of all of the human race, who were not white. His
notions on the subject were not very clear, nor were his
definitions
at all well settled; but his opinions were none the
less dogmatical, or fierce. His conscience accused him of
sundry lawless acts against the Indians, and he had found
it an exceedingly easy mode of quieting it, by putting the
whole family of red-men, incontinently, without the category
of human rights. Nothing angered him sooner, than to
deny his proposition, more especially if the denial were
accompanied by a show of plausible argument; and he did
not listen to his companion's remarks with much composure,
of either manner or feeling.
You're a boy, Deerslayer, misled and misconsaited by
Delaware arts, and missionary ignorance, he exclaimed,
with his usual indifference to the forms of speech, when
excited.
You
may account yourself as a red-skin's
brother
,
but
I
hold 'em all to be animals; with nothing human
about 'em, but cunning.
That
they have, I'll allow; but
so has a fox, or even a bear. I'm older than you, and have
lived longer in the woodsor, for that matter, have lived
always there, and am not to be told what an Indian is, or
what he is not. If you wish to be considered a savage,
you've only to say so, and I'll name you as such to Judith,
and the old man, and then we'll see how you'll like your
welcome.
Here Hurry's imagination did his temper some service,
since, by conjuring up the reception his semi-aquatic
acquaintance
would be likely to bestow on one thus introduced,
he burst into a hearty fit of laughter. Deerslayer too well
knew the uselessness of attempting to convince such a being
of any thing against his prejudices, to feel a desire to
attempt
the task; and he was not sorry that the approach of
the canoe to the south-eastern curve of the lake, gave a new
direction to his ideas. They were now, indeed, quite near
the place that March had pointed out for the position of
the outlet, and both began to look for it with a curiosity that
was increased by the expectation of finding the ark.
It may strike the reader as a little singular, that the
place where a stream of any size passed through banks that
had an elevation of some twenty feet, should be a matter
of doubt with men who could not now have been more
than two hundred yards distant from the precise spot.
It will be recollected, however, that the trees and bushes
here, as elsewhere, fairly overhung the water, making such
a fringe to the lake, as to conceal any little variations from
its general outline.
I've not been down at this end of the lake these two
summers, said Hurry, standing up in the canoe, the better
to look about him. Ay, there's the rock, showing its
chin above the water, and I know that the river begins in
its neighbourhood.
The men now plied the paddles again, and they were
presently
within a few yards of the rock, floating towards it,
though their efforts were suspended. This rock was not
large, being merely some five or six feet high, only half of
which elevation rose above the lake. The incessant
washing
of the water, for centuries, had so rounded its summit,
that it resembled a large bee-hive, in shape, its form being
more than usually regular and even. Hurry remarked, as
they floated slowly past, that this rock was well known to all
the Indians in that part of the country, and that they were in
the practice of using it as a mark, to designate the place
of meeting, when separated by their hunts and marches.
And here is the river, Deerslayer, he continued,
though so shut in by trees and bushes, as to look more
like an and-bush, than the outlet of such a sheet as the
Glimmerglass
.
Hurry had not badly described the place, which did truly
seem to be a stream lying in ambush. The high banks
might have been a hundred feet asunder; but, on the
western
side, a small bit of low land extended so far forward, as
to diminish the breadth of the stream to half that width. As
the bushes hung in the water beneath, and pines that had
the stature of church-steeples, rose in tall columns above, all
inclining towards the light, until their branches intermingled,
the eye, at a little distance, could not easily detect any
opening in the shore, to mark the egress of the water. In
the forest above, no traces of this outlet were to be seen
from the lake, the whole presenting the same connected,
and seemingly interminable, carpet of leaves. As the canoe
slowly advanced, sucked in by the current, it entered
beneath
an arch of trees, through which the light from the
heavens struggled by casual openings, faintly relieving the
gloom beneath.
This is a nat'ral and-bush, half whispered Hurry, as
if he felt that the place was devoted to secresy and
watchfulness
;
depend on it, old Tom has burrowed with the
ark somewhere in this quarter. We will drop down with
the current, a short distance, and ferret him out.
This seems no place for a vessel of any size, returned
the other; it appears to me, that we shall have hardly
room enough for the canoe.
Hurry laughed at this suggestion, and, as it soon
appeared
,
with reason; for, the fringe of bushes immediately
on the shore of the lake was no sooner passed, than the
adventurers found themselves in a narrow stream, of a
sufficient
depth of limpid water, with a strong current, and a
canopy of leaves, upheld by arches composed of the limbs
of hoary trees. Bushes lined the shores, as usual, but they
left sufficient space between them to admit the passage of
any thing that did not exceed twenty feet in width, and to
allow of a perspective ahead of eight or ten times that
distance
.
Neither of our two adventurers used his paddle, except to
keep the light bark in the centre of the current, but both
watched each turning of the stream, of which there were
two or three within the first hundred yards, with jealous
vigilance. Turn after turn, however, was passed, and the
canoe had dropped down with the current some little
distance
,
when Hurry caught a bush, and arrested its
movement
,
so suddenly and silently, as to denote some unusual
motive for the act. Deerslayer laid his hand on the stock
of his rifle, as soon as he noted this proceeding; but it was
quite as much with a hunter's habit, as from any feeling of
alarm.
There the old fellow is! whispered Hurry, pointing
with a finger, and laughing heartily, though he carefully
avoided making a noise, ratting it away, just as I
supposed
;
up to his knees in the mud and water, looking to the
traps and the bait. But, for the life of me, I can see nothing
of the ark; though I'll bet every skin I take this season,
Jude isn't trusting her pretty little feet in the neighbourhood
of that black mud. The gal's more likely to be braiding
her hair by the side of some spring, where she can see her
own good looks, and collect scornful feelings ag'in us men.
You over-judge young womenyes you do, Hurry
who as often bethink them of their failings as they do of their
perfections. I dare to say, this Judith, now, is no such
admirer of herself, and no such scorner of our sex, as you
seem to think; and that she is quite as likely to be sarving
her father in the house, wherever that may be, as he is to
be sarving her among the traps.
It's a pleasure to hear truth from a man's tongue, if it
be only once in a girl's life, cried a pleasant, rich, and yet
soft female voice, so near the canoe, as to make both the
listeners start. As for you, Master Hurry, fair words are
so apt to choak you, that I no longer expect to hear them
from your mouth; the last you uttered sticking in your
throat, and coming near to death. But I'm glad to see you
keep better society than formerly, and that they who know
how to esteem and treat women, are not ashamed to
journey
in your company.
As this was said, a singularly handsome and youthful
female face was thrust through an opening in the leaves,
within reach of Deerslayer's paddle. Its owner smiled
graciously on the young man; and the frown that she
cast on Hurry, though simulated and pettish, had the effect
to render her beauty more striking, by exhibiting the play
of an expressive, but capricious countenance; one that
seemed to change from the soft to the severe, the mirthful
to the reproving, with facility and indifference.
A second look explained the nature of the surprise.
Unwittingly
,
the men had dropped alongside of the ark, which
had been purposely concealed in bushes, cut and arranged for
the purpose; and Judith Hutter had merely pushed aside the
leaves that lay before a window, in order to show her face,
and speak to them.
CHAPTER IV.
And that timid fawn starts not with fear,
When I steal to her secret bower;
And that young May violet to me is dear,
And I visit the silent streamlet near,
To look on the lovely flower.
Bryant
.
The
ark, as the floating habitation of the Hutters was
generally called, was a very simple contrivance. A large
flat, or scow, composed the buoyant part of the vessel; and,
in its centre, occupying the whole of its breadth, and about
two-thirds of its length, stood a low fabric, resembling the
castle in construction, though made of materials so light as
barely to be bullet-proof. As the sides of the scow were a
little higher than usual, and the interior of the cabin had
no more elevation than was necessary for comfort, this
unusual
addition had neither a very clumsy, nor a very
obtrusive
appearance. It was, in short, little more than a
modern
canal-boat, though more rudely constructed, of greater
breadth than common, and bearing about it the signs of
the wilderness, in its bark-covered posts and roof. The
scow, however, had been put together with some skill, being
comparatively light, for its strength, and sufficiently
manageable
.
The cabin was divided into two apartments,
one of which served for a parlour, and the sleeping-room of
the father, and the other was appropriated to the uses of the
daughters. A very simple arrangement sufficed for the
kitchen, which was in one end of the scow, and removed
from the cabin, standing in the open air; the ark being
altogether a summer habitation.
The and-bush, as Hurry in his ignorance of English
termed it, is quite as easily explained. In many parts of
the lake and river, where the banks were steep and high,
the smaller trees, and larger bushes, as has been already
mentioned, fairly overhung the stream, their branches not
unfrequently dipping into the water. In some instances
they grew out in nearly horizontal lines, for thirty or forty
feet. The water being uniformly deepest near the shores,
where the banks were highest and the nearest to a
perpendicular
,
Hutter had found no difficulty in letting the ark
drop under one of these covers, where it had been anchored
with a view to conceal its position; security requiring some
such precautions, in his view of the case. Once beneath
the trees and bushes, a few stones fastened to the ends of
the branches had caused them to bend sufficiently to dip
into the river; and a few severed bushes, properly disposed,
did the rest. The reader has seen that this cover was so
complete, as to deceive two men accustomed to the woods,
and who were actually in search of those it concealed; a
circumstance that will be easily understood by those who
are familiar with the matted and wild luxuriance of a virgin
American forest, more especially in a rich soil.
The discovery of the ark produced very different effects
on our two adventurers. As soon as the canoe could be got
round to the proper opening, Hurry leaped on board, and
in a minute was closely engaged in a gay, and a sort of
recriminating discourse with Judith, apparently forgetful of
the existence of all the rest of the world. Not so with
Deerslayer
.
Vol. I.6
He entered the ark with a slow, cautious step,
examining every arrangement of the cover with curious and
scrutinizing eyes. It is true, he cast one admiring glance
at Judith, which was extorted by her brilliant and singular
beauty; but even this could detain him but a single instant
from the indulgence of his interest in Hutter's contrivances.
Step by step did he look into the construction of the
singular
abode, investigate its fastenings and strength,
ascertain
its means of defence, and make every inquiry that
would be likely to occur to one whose thoughts dwelt
principally on such expedients. Nor was the cover
neglected
.
Of this he examined the whole minutely, his
commendation
escaping him more than once, in audible
comments
.
Frontier usages admitting of this familiarity, he
passed through the rooms as he had previously done at the
castle; and, opening a door, issued into the end of the scow
opposite to that where he had left Hurry and Judith. Here
he found the other sister, employed on some coarse
needlework
,
seated beneath the leafy canopy of the cover.
As Deerslayer's examination was by this time ended, he
dropped the butt of his rifle, and, leaning on the barrel, with
both hands, he turned towards the girl with an interest the
singular beauty of her sister had not awakened. He had
gathered from Hurry's remarks that Hetty was considered
to have less intellect than ordinarily falls to the share of
human beings; and his education among Indians had taught
him to treat those who were thus afflicted by Providence,
with more than common tenderness. Nor was there any
thing in Hetty Hutter's appearance, as so often happens, to
weaken the interest her situation excited. An idiot she
could not properly be termed, her mind being just enough
enfeebled to lose most of those traits that are connected with
the more artful qualities, and to retain its ingenuousness and
love of truth. It had often been remarked of this girl, by
the few who had seen her, and who possessed sufficient
knowledge to discriminate, that her perception of the right
seemed almost intuitive, while her aversion to the wrong
formed so distinctive a feature of her mind, as to surround
her with an atmosphere of pure morality; peculiarities that
are not unfrequent with persons who are termed
feeble-minded
;
as if God had forbidden the evil spirits to invade a
precinct so defenceless, with the benign purpose of extending
a direct protection to those who had been left without the
usual aids of humanity. Her person, too, was agreeable,
having a strong resemblance to that of her sister, of which
it was a subdued and humble copy. If it had none of the
brilliancy of Judith's, the calm, quiet, almost holy expression
of her meek countenance, seldom failed to win on the
observer
;
and few noted it long, that did not begin to feel a
deep and lasting interest in the girl. She had no colour,
in common, nor was her simple mind apt to present
images that caused her cheek to brighten; though she
retained
a modesty so innate, that it almost raised her to
the unsuspecting purity of a being superior to human
infirmities
.
Guileless, innocent, and without distrust, equally
by nature and from her mode of life, Providence had,
nevertheless
,
shielded her from harm by a halo of moral light,
as it is said to temper the wind to the shorn lamb.
You are Hetty Hutter, said Deerslayer, in the way one
puts a question unconsciously to himself, assuming a
kindness
of tone and manner that were singularly adapted to win
the confidence of her he addressed. Hurry Harry has told
me of you, and I know you must be the child?
Yes, I'm Hetty Hutter, returned the girl, in a low,
sweet voice, which nature, aided by some education, had
preserved from vulgarity of tone and utterance; I'm
Hetty; Judith Hutter's sister; and Thomas Hutter's
youngest
daughter.
I know your history, then, for Hurry Harry talks
considerable
,
and he is free of speech, when he can find other
people's consarns to dwell on. You pass most of your life
on the lake, Hetty.
Certainly. Mother is dead; father is gone a-trapping,
and Judith and I stay at home. What's
your
name?
That's a question more easily asked than it is answered,
young woman; seeing that I'm so young, and yet have
borne more names than some of the greatest chiefs in all
America.
But you've
got
a nameyou don't throw away one
name before you come honestly by another?
I hope not, galI hope not. My names have come
nat'rally; and I suppose the one I bear now will be of no
great lasting, since the Delawares seldom settle on a man's
ra'al title, until such time as he has an opportunity of showing
his true natur', in the council, or on the war-path; which
has never behappened me; seeing, firstly, because I'm not
born a red-skin, and have no right to sit in
their
councilings
,
and am much too humble to be called on for opinions
from the great of my own colour; and, secondly, because
this is the first war that has befallen in my time, and no
inimy has yet inroaded far enough into the Colony, to be
reached by an arm even longer than mine.
Tell me your names, added Hetty, looking up at him
artlessly, and, may be, I'll tell you your character.
There is some truth in that, I'll not deny, though it
often fails. Men are deceived in other men's characters,
and frequently give 'em names they by no means desarve.
You can see the truth of this in the Mingo names, which,
in their own tongue, signify the same things as the
Delaware
namesat least, so they tell me, for I know little of
that tribe, unless it be by reportand no one can say they
are as honest, or as upright a nation. I put no great
dependence
,
therefore, on names.
Tell me
all
your names, repeated the girl, earnestly,
for her mind was too simple to separate things from
professions
,
and she
did
attach importance to a name; I want
to know what to think of you.
Well, sartain; I've no objection, and you shall hear
them all. In the first place, then, I'm Christian, and
white-born
,
like yourself, and my parents had a name that came
down from father to son, as is a part of their gifts. My
father was called Bumppo; and I was named after him, of
course, the given name being Nathaniel, or Natty, as most
people saw fit to tarm it.
Yes, yesNattyand Hetty interrupted the
girl quickly, and looking up from her work again, with a
smile; you are Natty, and I'm Hettythough you are
Bumppo, and I'm Hutter. Bumppo isn't as pretty as
Hutter
,
is it?
Why, that's as people fancy. Bumppo has no lofty
sound, I admit; and yet men have bumped through the
world with it. I did not go by this name, howsever, very
long; for the Delawares soon found out, or thought they
found out, that I was not given to lying, and they called me,
firstly, Straight-tongue.
That's a
good
name, interrupted Hetty, earnestly,
and in a positive manner; don't tell me there's no virtue
in names!
I do not say
that,
for perhaps I desarved to be so
called, lies being no favourites with me, as they are with
some. After a while they found out that I was quick of foot,
and then they called me `The Pigeon;' which, you know,
has a swift wing, and flies in a direct line.
That
was a
pretty
name! exclaimed Hetty; pigeons
are pretty birds!
Most things that God has created are pretty, in their
way, my good gal, though they get to be deformed by
man-kind
,
so as to change their natur's, as well as their
appearance
.
From carrying messages, and striking blind trails, I
got, at last, to following the hunters, when it was thought I
was quicker and surer at finding the game than most lads,
and then they called me the `Lap-ear;' as, they said, I
partook
of the sagacity of a hound.
That's not so pretty, answered Hetty; I hope you
didn't keep
that
name long.
Not after I was rich enough to buy a rifle, returned
the other, betraying a little pride through his usually quiet
and subdued manner;
then
it was seen I could keep a
wigwam in ven'son; and, in time, I got the name of `
Deerslayer
,'
which is that I now bear; homely as some will
think it, who set more valie on the scalp of a fellow-mortal,
than on the horns of a buck.
Well, Deerslayer, I'm not one of them, answered
Hetty, simply; Judith likes soldiers, and flary coats, and
fine feathers; but they're all naught to me.
She
says the
officers are great, and gay, and of soft speech; but they
make me shudder, for their business is to kill their
fellow-creatures
.
I like your calling better; and your last name is
a very good onebetter than Natty Bumppo.
This is nat'ral, in one of your turn of mind, Hetty, and
much as I should have expected. They tell me your sister
is handsomeoncommon, for a mortal; and beauty is apt
to seek admiration.
Did you never see Judith? demanded the girl, with
6*
quick earnestness; if you never have, go, at once, and
look at her. Even Hurry Harry isn't more pleasant to
look at; though
she
is a woman, and
he
is a man.
Deerslayer regarded the girl, for a moment, with concern.
Her pale face had flushed a little, and her eye, usually so
mild and serene, brightened as she spoke, in the way to
betray
the inward impulses.
Ay, Hurry Harry, he muttered to himself, as he
walked through the cabin, towards the other end of the boat;
this comes of good looks, if a light tongue has had no
consarn
in it. It's easy to see which way that poor creatur's
feelin's are leanin', whatever may be the case with your
Jude's.
But an interruption was put to the gallantry of Hurry
the coquetry of his mistressthe thoughts of Deerslayer,
and the gentle feelings of Hetty, by the sudden appearance
of the canoe of the ark's owner, in the narrow opening
among the bushes, that served as a sort of moat to his
position
.
It would seem that Hutter, or Floating Tom, as he
was familiarly called by all the hunters who knew his habits,
recognized the canoe of Hurry, for he expressed no surprise
at finding him in the scow. On the contrary, his reception
was such as to denote not only gratification, but a pleasure,
mingled with a little disappointment, at his not having made
his appearance some days sooner.
I look'd for you last week, he said, in a half-grumbling,
half-welcoming manner; and was disappointed
uncommonly
that you didn't arrive. There came a runner through,
to warn all the trappers and hunters that the Colony and the
Canadas were again in trouble; and I felt lonesome, up in
these mountains, with three scalps to see to, and only one
pair of hands to protect them.
That's reasonable, returned March; and't was feelin'
like a parent. No doubt, if I had two such darters as Judith
and Hetty, my exper'ence would tell the same story, though,
in gin'ral, I am just as well satisfied with having the nearest
neighbour fifty miles off, as when he is within call.
Notwithstanding, you didn't choose to come into the
wilderness alone, now you knew that the Canada savages
are likely to be stirring, returned Hutter, giving a sort of
distrustful, and, at the same time, inquiring glance at
Deerslayer
.
Why should I? They say a bad companion, on a
journey
,
helps to shorten the path; and this young man I
account
to be a reasonably good one. This is Deerslayer, old
Tom, a noted hunter among the Delawares, and
Christian-born
,
and Christian-edicated, too, like you and me. The
lad is not parfect, perhaps, but there's worse men in the
country that he came from, and, it's likely, he 'll find some
that's no better, in this part of the world. Should we have
occasion to defend our traps, and the territory, he 'll be
useful
in feeding us all; for he's a reg'lar dealer in ven'son.
Young man, you are welcome, growled Tom,
thrusting
a hard, bony hand towards the youth, as a pledge of his
sincerity; in such times, a white-face is a friend's, and I
count on you as a support. Children, sometimes, make a
stout heart feeble, and these two daughters of mine give me
more concern than all my traps, and skins, and rights in
the country.
That's nat'ral! cried Hurry. Yes, Deerslayer, you
and I don't know it, yet, by exper'ence; but, on the whole,
I consider that as nat'ral. If we
had
darters, it's more
than probable we should have some such feelin's; and I
honour the man that owns 'em. As for Judith, old man, I
enlist, at once, as her soldier, and here is Deerslayer to help
you to take care of Hetty.
Many thanks to you, Master March, returned th
beauty, in a full, rich voice, and with an accuracy of
intonation
and utterance that she shared in common with her
sister, and which showed that she had been better taught
than their father's life and appearance would give reason to
expect; many thanks to you; but Judith Hutter has the
spirit and the experience that will make her depend more on
herself, than on good-looking rovers like you. Should there
be need to face the savages, do you land, with my father,
instead of burrowing in the huts, under the show of
defending
us females, and
Girlgirl, interrupted the father, quiet that glib
tongue of thine, and hear the truth. There are savages on
the lake shore, already, and no man can say how near to
us they may be at this very moment, or when we may hear
more from them!
If this be true, Master Hutter, said Hurry, whose
change of countenance denoted how serious he deemed the
information, though it did not denote any unmanly alarm
if this be true, your ark is in a most misfortunate position
for, though the cover did deceive Deerslayer and myself, it
would hardly be overlooked by a full-blooded Indian, who
was out seriously in s'arch of scalps!
I think as you do, Hurry, and wish, with all my heart,
we lay anywhere else, at this moment, than in this narrow,
crooked stream, which has many advantages to hide in, but
which is almost fatal to them that are discovered. The
savages are near us, moreover, and the difficulty is, to get
out of the river without being shot down like deer standing
at a lick!
Are you sartain, Master Hutter, that the red-skins you
dread are ra'al Canadas? asked Deerslayer, in a modest,
but earnest manner. Have you seen any; and can you
describe their paint?
I have fallen in with the signs of their being in the
neighbourhood, but have seen none of 'em. I was down
stream, a mile or so, looking to my traps, when I struck a
fresh trail, crossing the corner of a swamp, and moving
northward. The man had not passed an hour; and I know'd
it for an Indian footstep by the size of the foot, and the
intoe
,
even before I found a worn moccasin, which its owner
had dropped as useless. For that matter, I found the spot
where he halted to make a new one, which was only a few
yards from the place where he had dropped the old one.
That doesn't look much like a red-skin on the
warpath
!
returned the other, shaking his head. An
exper'enced
warrior, at least, would have burned, or buried, or
sunk in the river, such signs of his passage; and your trail
is, quite likely, a peaceable trail. But the moccasin may
greatly relieve my mind, if you bethought you of bringing
it off. I've come here to meet a young chief, myself; and
his course would be much in the direction you 've mentioned.
The trail may have been his'n.
Hurry Harry, you 're well acquainted with this young
man, I hope, who has meetings with savages in a part of
the country where he has never been before? demanded
Hutter, in a tone and in a manner that sufficiently indicated
the motive of the question; these rude beings seldom
hesitating
,
on the score of delicacy, to betray their feelings.
Treachery is an Indian virtue; and the whites, that live
much in their tribes, soon catch their ways and practices.
Truetrue as the Gospel, old Tom; but not
personable
to Deerslayer, who's a young man of truth, if he has
no other ricommend. I'll answer for his
honesty,
whatever
I may do for his valour in battle.
I should like to know his errand in this strange quarter
of the country?
That is soon told, Master Hutter, said the young man,
with the composure of one who kept a clean conscience; I
think, moreover, you 've a
right
to ask it. The father of
two such darters, who occupies a lake, after your fashion,
has just the same right to inquire into a stranger's business
in his neighbourhood, as the Colony would have to demand
the reason why the Frenchers put more rijiments than
common
along the lines. No, no, I 'll not deny your right to
know why a stranger comes into your habitation, or
country
,
in times as serious as these.
If such is your way of thinking, friend, let me hear
your story, without more words.
'T is soon told, as I said afore; and shall be honestly
told. I 'm a young man, and, as yet, have never been on a
war-path; but, no sooner did the news come among the
Delawares, that wampum and a hatchet were about to be sent
in to the tribe, than they wished me to go out among the
people of my own colour, and get the exact state of things
for 'em. This I did; and, after delivering my talk to the
chiefs, on my return, I met an officer of the crown, on the
Schoharie, who had moneys to send to some of the fri'ndly
tribes, that live further west. This was thought a good
occasion for Chingachgook, a young chief who has never
struck a foe, and myself, to go on our first war-path in
company
;
and an app'intment was made for us, by an old
Delaware
,
to meet at the rock near the foot of this lake. I 'll
not deny that Chingachgook has
another
object in view, but
it has no consarn with any here, and is his secret, and not
mine; therefore I 'll say no more about it.
'T is something about a young woman, interrupted
Judith, hastily; then laughing at her own impetuosity, and
even having the grace to colour a little at the manner in
which she had betrayed her readiness to impute such a
motive
.
If't is neither war, nor a hunt, it must be love.
Ay, it comes easy for the young and handsome, who
hear so much of them feelin's, to suppose that they lie at
the bottom of most procedin's; but, on that head, I say
nothin'
.
Chingachgook is to meet me at the rock, an hour
afore sunset to-morrow evening, after which we shall go our
way together, molesting none but the king's inimies, who
are lawfully our own. Knowing Hurry of old, who once
trapped in our hunting-grounds, and falling in with him on
the Schoharie, just as he was on the p'int of starting for his
summer h'ants, we agreed to journey in company; not so
much from fear of the Mingos, as from good fellowship, and,
as he says, to shorten a long road.
And you think the trail I saw may have been that of
your friend, ahead of his time? said Hutter.
That's my idee; which may be wrong, but which may
be right. If I saw the moccasin, however, I could tell, in a
minute, whether it is made in the Delaware fashion or not.
Here it is, then, said the quick-witted Judith, who had
already gone to the canoe in quest of it; tell us what it
says; friend or enemy. You look honest; and
I
believe all
you say, whatever father may think.
That's the way with you, Jude; for ever finding out
friends, where I distrust foes, grumbled Tom: but, speak
out, young man, and tell us what you think of the
moccasin
.
That's not Delaware-made, returned Deerslayer,
examining
the worn and rejected covering for the foot with a
cautious eye; I 'm too young on a war-path to be positive,
but, I should say, that moccasin has a northern look, and
comes from beyond the great lakes.
If such is the case, we ought not to lie here a minute
longer than is necessary, said Hutter, glancing through the
leaves of his cover, as if he already distrusted the presence
of an enemy, on the opposite shore of the narrow and
sinuous
stream. It wants but an hour, or so, of night, and
to move in the dark will be impossible, without making a
noise that would betray us. Did you hear the echo of a
piece, in the mountains, half an hour since?
Yes, old man, and heard the piece itself, answered
Hurry, who now felt the indiscretion of which he had been
guilty, for the last was fired from my own shoulder.
I feared it came from the French Indians; still, it may
put them on the look-out, and be a means of discovering us.
You did wrong to fire, in war-time, unless there was good
occasion.
So I begin to think, myself, uncle Tom; and yet, if a
man can't trust himself to let off his rifle in a wilderness
that is a thousand miles square, lest some inimy should
hear it, where's the use in carrying one!
Hutter now held a long consultation with his two guests,
in which the parties came to a true understanding of their
situation. He explained the difficulty that would exist in
attempting to get the ark out of so swift and narrow a stream,
in the dark, without making a noise that could not fail to
attract Indian ears. Any strollers, in their vicinity, would
keep near the river, or the lake; but the former had swampy
shores, in many places, and was both so crooked, and so
fringed with bushes, that it was quite possible to move by
day-light, without incurring much danger of being seen.
More was to be apprehended, perhaps, from the ear, than
from the eye, especially as long as they were in the short,
straitened, and canopied reaches of the stream.
I never drop down into this cover, which is handy to
my traps, and safer than the lake, from curious eyes,
without
providing the means of getting out ag'in, continued this
singular being; and that is easier done by a pull, than a
push. My anchor is now lying above the suction, in the
open lake; and here is a line, you see, to haul us up to it.
Without some such help, a single pair of hands would make
heavy work, in forcing a scow, like this, up stream. I have
a sort of a crab, too, that lightens the pull, on occasion.
Jude can use the oar, astarn, as well as myself; and, when
we fear no enemy, to get out of the river gives us but little
trouble.
What should we gain, Master Hutter, by changing the
position? asked Deerslayer, with a good deal of
earnestness
;
this is a safe cover; and a stout defence might be
made from the inside of this cabin. I 've never fou't, unless
in the way of tradition; but, it seems to me, we might beat
off twenty Mingos, with palisades like them afore us.
Ay, ay; you 've never fought, except in traditions, that's
plain enough, young man! Did you ever see as broad a
sheet of water as this above us, before you came in upon it,
with Hurry?
I can't say that I ever did, Deerslayer answered,
modestly
.
Youth is the time to l'arn; and I 'm far from
wishing to raise my voice in council, afore it is justified by
exper'ence.
Well, then, I 'll teach you the disadvantage of fighting
in this position, and the advantage of taking to the open
lake. Here, you may see, the savages will know where to
aim every shot; and it would be too much to hope that
some
would not find their way through the crevices of the logs.
Now, on the other hand, we should have nothing but a forest
to aim at. Then we are not safe from fire, here; the bark
of this roof being little better than so much kindling-wood.
The castle, too, might be entered and ransacked, in my
absence
,
and all my possessions overrun and destroyed. Once
in the lake, we can be attacked only in boats, or on rafts
shall have a fair chance with the enemyand can protect
the castle with the ark. Do you understand this reasoning,
youngster?
It sounds wellyes, it has a rational sound; and I 'll
not gainsay it.
Well, old Tom, cried Hurry, if we are to move, the
sooner we make a beginning, the sooner we shall know
whether we are to have our scalps for night-caps, or not.
As this proposition was self-evident, no one denied its
justice. The three men, after a short preliminary
explanation
,
now set about their preparations to move the ark, in
earnest. The slight fastenings were quickly loosened; and,
by hauling on the line, the heavy craft slowly emerged from
the cover. It was no sooner free from the incumbrance
of the branches, than it swung into the stream, sheering
quite close to the western shore, by the force of the current.
Not a soul on board heard the rustling of the branches, as
the cabin came against the bushes and trees of the western
bank, without a feeling of uneasiness; for no one knew at
what moment, or in what place, a secret and murderous enemy
might unmask himself. Perhaps the gloomy light, that still
struggled through the impending canopy of leaves, or found
its way through the narrow, riband-like opening, which
seemed to mark, in the air above, the course of the river
that flowed beneath, aided in augmenting the appearance of
the danger; for it was little more than sufficient to render
objects visible, without giving up all their outlines at a glance.
Although the sun had not absolutely set, it had withdrawn
its direct rays from the valley; and the hues of evening were
beginning to gather around objects that stood uncovered,
rendering those within the shadows of the woods, still more
sombre and gloomy.
No interruption followed the movement, however, and, as
the men continued to haul on the line, the ark passed steadily
ahead, the great breadth of the scow preventing its sinking
into the water, and, from offering much resistance to the
progress of the swift element beneath its bottom. Hutter,
too, had adopted a precaution, suggested by experience,
which might have done credit to a seaman, and which
completely
prevented any of the annoyances and obstacles
which, otherwise, would have attended the short turns of the
river. As the ark descended, heavy stones, attached to the
line, were dropped in the centre of the stream, forming local
anchors, each of which was kept from dragging by the
assistance of those above it, until the uppermost of all was
reached, which got its backing from the anchor, or
grapnel
,
that lay well out in the lake. In consequence of this
expedient, the ark floated clear of the incumbrances of the
shore, against which it would otherwise have been
unavoidably
hauled at every turn, producing embarrassments that
Hutter, single-handed, would have found it very difficult to
overcome.
Favoured by this foresight, and stimulated by the
apprehension
of discovery, Floating Tom and his two athletic
companions hauled the ark ahead, with quite as much
rapidity
as comported with the strength of the line. At every
turn in the stream, a stone was raised from the bottom,
when the direction of the scow changed to one that pointed
towards the stone that lay above. In this manner, with the
channel buoyed out for him, as a sailor might term it, did
Vol. I.7
Hutter move forward, occasionally urging his friends, in a
low and guarded voice, to increase their exertions, and then,
as occasions offered, warning them against efforts that might,
at particular moments, endanger all by too much zeal. In
spite of their long familiarity with the woods, the gloomy
character of the shaded river added to the uneasiness that
each felt; and when the ark reached the first bend in the
Susquehannah, and the eye caught a glimpse of the broader
expanse of the lake, all felt a relief, that perhaps neither
would have been willing to confess. Here the last stone
was raised from the bottom, and the line led directly
towards
the grapnel, which, as Hutter had explained, was
dropped above the suction of the current.
Thank God! ejaculated Hurry,
there
is day-light,
and we shall soon have a chance of
seeing
our inimies, if we
are to
feel
'em.
That is more than you, or any man can say, growled
Hutter. There is no spot so likely to harbour a party, as
the shore around the outlet; and the moment we clear these
trees, and get into open water, will be the most trying time,
since it will leave the enemy a cover, while it puts us out
of one. Judith, girl; do you and Hetty leave the oar to take
care of itself, and go within the cabin; and be mindful not
to show your faces at a window; for they who will look at
them won't stop to praise their beauty. And now, Hurry, we'll
step into this outer room, ourselves, and haul through the
door, where we shall all be safe, from a surprise, at least.
Friend Deerslayer, as the current is lighter, and the line
has all the strain on it that is prudent, do you keep moving
from window to window, taking care not to let your head
be seen, if you set any value on life. No one knows when,
or where, we shall hear from our neighbours.
Deerslayer complied, with a sensation that had nothing
in common with fear, but which had all the interest of a
perfectly novel, and a most exciting situation. For the first
time in his life, he was in the vicinity of enemies, or had
good reason to think so; and that, too, under all the thrilling
circumstances of Indian surprises, and Indian artifices. As
he took his stand at a window, the ark was just passing
through the narrowest part of the stream, a point where the
water first entered what was properly termed the river, and
where the trees fairly interlocked over-head, causing the
current to rush into an arch of verdure; a feature as
appropriate
and peculiar to the country, perhaps, as that of
Switzerland
,
where the rivers come rushing literally from
chambers
of ice.
The ark was in the act of passing the last curve of this
leafy entrance, as Deerslayer, having examined all that could
be seen of the eastern bank of the river, crossed the room to
look from the opposite window, at the western. His arrival
at this aperture was most opportune, for he had no sooner
placed his eye at a crack, than a sight met his gaze that
might well have alarmed a sentinel so young and
inexperienced
.
A sapling overhung the water, in nearly half a
circle, having first grown towards the light, and then been
pressed down into this form by the weight of the snows; a
circumstance of common occurrence in the American woods.
On this tree no less than six Indians had already appeared,
others standing ready to follow them, as they left room; each
evidently bent on running out on the trunk, and dropping on
the roof of the ark, as it passed beneath. This would have
been an exploit of no great difficulty, the inclination of the
tree admitting of an easy passage, the adjoining branches
offering ample support for the hands, and the fall being too
trifling to be apprehended. When Deerslayer first saw this
party, it was just unmasking itself, by ascending the part
of the tree nearest to the earth, or that which was much the
most difficult to overcome; and his knowledge of Indian
habits told him, at once, that they were all in their
warpaint
,
and belonged to a hostile tribe.
Pull, Hurry, he cried; pull for your life, and as you
love Judith Hutter! Pull, man, pull!
This call was made to one that the young man knew had
the strength of a giant. It was so earnest and solemn, that
both Hutter and March felt it was not idly given, and they
applied all their force to the line simultaneously, and at a
most critical moment. The scow redoubled its motion, and
seemed to glide from under the tree as if conscious of the
danger that was impending over-head. Perceiving that they
were discovered, the Indians uttered the fearful war-whoop,
and running forward on the tree, leaped desperately towards
their fancied prize. There were six on the tree, and each
made the effort. All but their leader fell into the river, more
or less distant from the ark, as they came, sooner or later,
to the leaping-place. The chief, who had taken the
dangerous
post in advance, having an earlier opportunity than the
others, struck the scow just within the stern. The fall
proving so much greater than he had anticipated, he was
slightly stunned, and, for a moment, he remained half bent and
unconscious of his situation. At this instant Judith rushed
from the cabin, her beauty heightened by the excitement
that produced the bold act, which flushed her cheek to
crimson
,
and, throwing all her strength into the effort, she pushed
the intruder over the edge of the scow, headlong into the
river. This decided feat was no sooner accomplished than
the woman resumed her sway; Judith looked over the stern
to ascertain what had become of the man, and the expression
of her eyes softened to concern; next, her cheek crimsoned
between shame and surprise, at her own temerity; and then
she laughed, in her own merry and sweet manner. All this
occupied less than a minute, when the arm of Deerslayer
was thrown around her waist, and she was dragged swiftly
within the protection of the cabin. This retreat was not
effected too soon. Scarcely were the two in safety, when
the forest was filled with yells, and bullets began to patter
against the logs.
The ark being in swift motion all this while, it was
beyond
the danger of pursuit by the time these little events
had occurred; and the savages, as soon as the first burst of
their anger had subsided, ceased firing, with the
consciousness
that they were expending their ammunition in vain.
When the scow came up over her grapnel, Hutter tripped
the latter, in a way not to impede the motion; and being
now beyond the influence of the current, the vessel continued
to drift ahead, until fairly in the open lake, though still near
enough to the land to render exposure to a rifle-bullet
dangerous
.
Hutter and March got out two small sweeps, and,
covered by the cabin, they soon urged the ark far enough
from the shore, to leave no inducement to their enemies to
make any further attempt to injure them.
CHAPTER V.
Why, let the stricken deer go weep,
The hart ungalled play:
For some must watch, while some must sleep;
Thus runs the world away.
Shakspeare
.
Another
consultation took place, in the forward part of
the scow, at which both Judith and Hetty were present. As
no danger could now approach unseen, immediate
uneasiness
had given place to the concern which attended the
conviction
that enemies were, in considerable force, on the shores
of the lake, and that they might be sure no practicable means
of accomplishing their own destruction would be neglected. As
a matter of course, Hutter felt these truths the deepest, his
daughters having an habitual reliance on his resources, and
knowing too little to appreciate fully all the risks they ran;
while his male companions were at liberty to quit him at
any moment they saw fit. His first remark showed that he
had an eye to the latter circumstance, and might have
betrayed
,
to a keen observer, the apprehension that was, just
then, uppermost.
We've a great advantage over the Iroquois, or the
enemy
,
whoever they are, in being afloat, he said. There's
not a canoe on the lake, that I don't know where it's hid;
and now yours is here, Hurry, there are but three more on
the land, and they're so snug in hollow logs, that I don't
believe the Indians could find them, let them try ever so
long.
There's no telling thatno one can say that, put in
Deerslayer; a hound is not more sartain on the scent,
than a red-skin, when he expects to get any thing by it.
Let this party see scalps afore 'em, or plunder, or honour,
accordin' to their idees of what honour is, and 't will be a
tight log that hides a canoe from their eyes.
You're right, Deerslayer, cried Harry March; you're
downright Gospel, in this matter, and I rej'ice that my bunch
of bark is safe enough, here, within reach of my arm. I
7*
calcilate they'll be at all the rest of the canoes, afore
tomorrow
night, if they are in ra'al 'arnest to smoke you out,
old Tom, and we may as well overhaul our paddles, for a
pull.
Hutter made no immediate reply. He looked about him
in silence, for quite a minute; examining the sky, the lake,
and the belt of forest which enclosed it, as it might be
hermetically
,
like one consulting their signs. Nor did he find
any alarming symptoms. The boundless woods were
sleeping
in the deep repose of nature, the heavens were placid,
but still luminous with the light of the retreating sun, while
the lake looked more lovely and calm than it had before
done that day. It was a scene altogether soothing, and of a
character to lull the passions into a species of holy calm.
How far this effect was produced, however, on the party in
the ark, must appear in the progress of our narrative.
Judith, called out the father, when he had taken this
close, but short survey, of the omens, night is at hand;
find our friends food; a long march gives a sharp appetite.
We're not starving, Master Hutter, March observed,
for we filled up just as we reached the lake, and, for one,
I prefar the company of Jude, even to her supper. This
quiet evening is very agreeable to sit by her side.
Natur' is natur', objected Hutter, and must be fed.
Judith, see to the meal, and take your sister to help you.
I've a little discourse to hold with you, friends, he
continued
,
as soon as his daughters were out of hearing, and
wish the girls away. You see my situation; and I should
like to hear your opinions concerning what is best to be done.
Three times have I been burnt out, already, but that was on
the shore; and I've considered myself as pretty safe, ever
since I got the castle built, and the ark afloat. My other
accidents, however, happened in peaceable times, being
nothing
more than such flurries as a man must meet with, in
the woods; but this matter looks serious, and your ideas
would greatly relieve my mind.
It's my notion, old Tom, that you, and your huts, and
your traps, and your whole possessions, hereaway, are in
desperate jippardy, returned the matter-of-fact Hurry, who
saw no use in concealment. Accordin' to my idees of
valie, they're altogether not worth half as much to-day, as
they was yesterday, nor would I give more for'em, taking
the pay in skins.
Then I've children! continued the father, making the
allusion in a way that it might have puzzled even an
indifferent
observer to say was intended as a bait, or as an
exclamation
of paternal concern; daughters, as you know,
Hurry; and good girls, too, I may say, though I
am
their
father.
A man may say any thing, Master Hutter, particularily
when pressed by time and circumstances. You've darters,
as you say, and one of them hasn't her equal on the
frontiers
,
for good-looks, whatever she may have for
good-behaviour
.
As for poor Hetty, she's Hetty Hutter, and that's
as much as one can say about the poor thing. Give me
Jude, if her conduct was only equal to her looks!
I see, Harry March, I can only count on you as a
fair-weather
friend; and I suppose that your companion will be
of the same way of thinking, returned the other, with a
slight show of pride, that was not altogether without dignity;
well; I must depend on Providence, which will not turn a
deaf ear, perhaps, to a father's prayers.
If you've understood Hurry, here, to mean that he
intends
to desart you, said Deerslayer, with an earnest
simplicity
that gave double assurance of its truth, I
think
you
do him injustice; as I
know
you do me, in supposing I would
follow him, was he so ontrue-hearted as to leave a family
of his own colour, in such a strait as this. I've come on
this lake, Master Hutter, to rende'vous a fri'nd, and I only
wish he was here, himself, as I make no doubt he will be,
at sunset to-morrow, when you'd have another rifle to aid
you; an inexper'enced one, I'll allow, like my own, but one
that has proved true so often ag'in the game, big and little,
that I'll answer for its sarvice ag'in mortals.
May I depend on
you
to stand by me and my
daughters
,
then, Deerslayer? demanded the old man, with a
father's
anxiety in his countenance.
That may you, Floating Tom, if that's your name; and
as a brother would stand by a sistera husband his wife
or a suitor his sweetheart. In this strait, you may count on
me, through all advarsities; and, I think, Hurry does
discredit
to his natur' and wishes, if you can't count on him.
Not he, cried Judith, thrusting her handsome face out
of the door; his nature is hurry, as well as his name, and
he'll hurry off, as soon as he thinks his fine figure in danger.
Neither `old Tom,' nor his `gals,' will depend much on
Master
March, now they know him, but
you
they will rely on,
Deerslayer; for your honest face, and honest heart, tell us
that what you promise you will perform.
This was said, as much, perhaps, in affected scorn for
Hurry, as in sincerity. Still, it was not said without
feeling
.
The fine face of Judith sufficiently proved the latter
circumstance; and if the conscious March fancied that he
had never seen in it a stronger display of contempta
feeling in which the beauty was apt
to
indulgethan while
she was looking at him, it certainly seldom exhibited more
of womanly softness and sensibility, than when her
speaking
blue eyes were turned on his travelling companion.
Leave us, Judith, Hutter ordered sternly, before either
of the young men could reply; leave us; and do not
return
until you come with the venison and fish. The girl
has been spoilt by the
flattery
of the officers, who sometimes
find their way up here, Master March, and you'll not think
any harm of her silly words.
You never said truer syllable, old Tom, retorted
Hurry, who smarted under Judith's observations; the
devil-tongued youngsters of the garrison have proved her
undoing! I scarce know Jude any longer, and shall soon
take to admiring her sister; who is getting to be much more
to my fancy.
I'm glad to hear this, Harry, and look upon it as a
sign that you're coming to your right senses. Hetty would
make a much safer and more rational companion than Jude,
and would be much the most likely to listen to your suit, as
the officers have, I greatly fear, unsettled her sister's mind.
No man need a safer wife than Hetty, said Hurry,
laughing, though I'll not answer for her being of the most
rational. But, no matter; Deerslayer has not misconceived
me, when he told you I should be found at my post. I'll
not quit
you,
uncle Tom, just now, whatever may be my
feelin's and intentions respecting your eldest darter.
Hurry had a respectable reputation for prowess among
his associates, and Hutter heard this pledge with a
satisfaction
that was not concealed. Even the great personal
strength of such an aid, became of moment, in moving the
ark, as well as in the species of hand-to-hand conflicts, that
were not unfrequent in the woods; and no commander who
was hard pressed, could feel more joy at hearing of the
arrival
of reinforcements, than the borderer experienced at
being told this important auxiliary was not about to quit
him. A minute before, Hutter would have been well
content
to compromise his danger, by entering into a compact
to act only on the defensive; but no sooner did he feel some
security on this point, than the restlessness of man induced
him to think of the means of carrying the war into the
enemy's
country.
High prices are offered for scalps, on both sides, he
observed, with a grim smile, as if he felt the force of the
inducement, at the very time he wished to affect a
superiority
to earning money by means that the ordinary feelings of
those who aspire to be civilized men, repudiated, even while
they were adopted. It isn't right, perhaps, to take gold for
human blood; and yet, when mankind is busy in killing one
another, there can be no great harm in adding a little bit of
skin to the plunder. What's your sentiments, Hurry,
touching these p'ints?
That you've made a vast mistake, old man, in calling
savage blood, human blood, at all. I think no more of a
red-skin's scalp, than I do of a pair of wolf's ears; and
would just as lief finger money for one, as for the other. With
white
people 't is different, for they've a nat'ral avarsion to
being scalped; whereas your Indian shaves his head in
readiness for the knife, and leaves a lock of hair, by way of
braggadocio, that one can lay hold of, in the bargain.
That's manly, however, and I felt, from the first, that
we had only to get you on our side, to have you heart and
hand, returned Tom, losing all his reserve, as he gained
a renewed confidence in the disposition of his companion.
Something more may turn up from this inroad of the
redskins
,
than they bargained for. Deerslayer, I conclude you're
of Hurry's way of thinking, and look upon money 'arned in
this way, as being as likely to pass, as money 'arned in
trapping
,
or hunting.
I've no such feelin', nor any wish to harbour it, not I,
returned the other. My gifts are not scalpers' gifts, but
such as belong to my religion and colour. I'll stand by
you, old man, in the ark, or in the castle, the canoe, or the
woods, but I'll not unhumanize my natur' by falling into
ways that God intended for another race. If you and Hurry
have got any thoughts that lean towards the Colony's gold,
go by yourselves in s'arch of it, and leave the females to
my care. Much as I must differ from you both, on all gifts
that do not properly belong to a white man, we shall agree
that it is the duty of the strong to take care of the weak,
especially when the last belong to them that natur' intended
man to protect and console by his gentleness and strength.
Hurry Harry, that is a lesson you might learn and
practise on to some advantage, said the sweet, but spirited
voice of Judith, from the cabin; a proof that she had
overheard
all that had hitherto been said.
No more of this, Jude, called out the father angrily.
Move further off; we are about to talk of matters unfit for
a woman to listen to.
Hutter did not take any steps, however, to ascertain
whether
he was obeyed or not, but, dropping his voice a little,
he pursued the discourse.
The young man is right, Hurry, he said; and we
can leave the children in his care. Now, my idea is just
this; and I think you'll agree that it is rational and correct.
There's a large party of these savages on the shore; and,
though I didn't tell it before the girls, for they're womanish,
and apt to be troublesome when any thing like real work
is to be done, there's women among 'em. This I know
from moccasin prints; and 't is likely they are hunters, after
all, who have been out so long that they know nothing of
the war, or of the bounties.
In which case, old Tom, why was their first salute an
attempt to cut all our throats?
We don't know that their design was so bloody. It's
natural and easy for an Indian to fall into ambushes and
surprises; and, no doubt, they wished to get on board the
ark first, and to make their conditions afterwards. That a
disapp'inted savage should fire at us, is in rule; and I think
nothing of that. Besides, how often have they burned me
out, and robbed my trapsay, and pulled trigger on me,
in the most peaceful times?
The blackguards will do such things, I must allow;
and we pay 'em off pretty much in their own c'ine.
Women
would not be on the war-path, sartainly; and, so far,
there's reason in your idee.
Nor would a hunter be in his war-paint, returned
Deerslayer. I saw the Mingos, and
know
that they are out
on the trail of mortal men; and not for beaver or deer.
There you have it ag'in, old fellow, said Hurry. In
the way of an eye, now, I'd as soon trust this young man,
as trust the oldest settler in the Colony; if he says paint, why
paint it was.
Then a hunting-party and a war-party have met, for
women must have been with 'em. It's only a few days
since the runner went through with the tidings of the
troubles
;
and, it may be, that warriors have come out to call in
their women and children, and to get an early blow.
That would stand the courts, and is just the truth,
cried Hurry; you've got it now, old Tom, and I should
like to hear what you mean to make out of it?
The bounty; returned the other, looking up at his
attentive
companion, in a cool, sullen manner, in which,
however
,
heartless cupidity, and indifference to the means, were
far more conspicuous than any feelings of animosity or
revenge
.
If there's women, there's children; and big and
little have scalps; the Colony pays for all alike.
More shame to it, that it should do so, interrupted
Deerslayer; more shame to it, that it don't understand its
gifts, and pay greater attention to the will of God.
Hearken to reason, lad, and don't cry out afore you
understand a case, returned the unmoved Hurry; the
savages scalp your fri'nds, the Delawares, or Mohicans,
whichever they may be, among the rest; and why shouldn't
we scalp? I will own, it would be ag'in right for you and
me, now, to go into the settlements and bring out scalps, but
it's a very different matter as consarns Indians. A man
shouldn't take scalps, if he isn't ready to be scalped,
himself
,
on fitting occasions. One good turn desarves another,
all the world over. That's reason, and I believe it to be
good religion.
Ay, Master Hurry, again interrupted the rich voice of
Judith, is it religion to say that one
bad
turn deserves
another?
I'll never reason ag'in you, Judy, for you beat me with
beauty, if you can't with sense. Here's the Canadas
paying
their Indians for scalps, and why not we pay
Our
Indians! exclaimed the girl, laughing with a sort
of melancholy merriment. Father, father! think no more
of this, and listen to the advice of Deerslayer, who
has
a
conscience; which is more than I can say, or think, of Harry
March.
Hutter now rose, and, entering the cabin, he compelled his
daughters to go into the adjoining room, when he secured both
the doors, and returned. Then he and Hurry pursued the
subject; but, as the purport of all that was material in this
discourse will appear in the narrative, it need not be related
here, in detail. The reader, however, can have no difficulty
in comprehending the morality that presided over their
conference
.
It was, in truth, that which, in some form or other,
rules most of the acts of men, and in which the controlling
principle is, that one wrong will justify another. Their
enemies paid for scalps; and this was sufficient to justify the
Colony for retaliating. It is true, the French used the same
argument, a circumstance, as Hurry took occasion to
observe
,
in answer to one of Deerslayer's objections, that
proved its truth, as mortal enemies would not be likely to
have recourse to the same reason, unless it were a good one.
But, neither Hutter nor Hurry was a man likely to stick at
trifles, in matters connected with the rights of the aborigines,
since it is one of the consequences of aggression, that it
hardens
the conscience, as the only means of quieting it. In
the most peaceable state of the country, a species of warfare
was carried on between the Indians, especially those of the
Canadas, and men of their caste; and, the moment an
actual
and recognised warfare existed, it was regarded as the
means of lawfully revenging a thousand wrongs, real and
imaginary. Then, again, there was some truth, and a good
deal of expediency, in the principle of retaliation, of which
they both availed themselves, in particular, to answer the
objections of their juster-minded and more scrupulous
companion
.
You must fight a man with his own we'pons,
Deerslayer
,
cried Hurry, in his uncouth dialect, and in his
dogmatical
manner of disposing of all moral propositions; if
he's f'erce, you must be f'ercer; if he's stout of heart, you
must be stouter. This is the way to get the better of
Christian
or savage: by keeping up to this trail, you'll get
soonest
to the ind of your journey.
That's not Moravian doctrine, which teaches that all
are to be judged according to their talents, or l'arning; the
Indian, like an Indian; and the white man, like a white man.
Some of their teachers say, that if you're struck on the
cheek, it's a duty to turn the other side of the face, and take
another blow, instead of seeking revenge, whereby I
understand
That's enough! shouted Hurry; that's all I want,
to prove a man's doctrine! How long would it take to kick
a man through the Colonyin at one ind, and out at the
other, on that principle?
Don't mistake me, March, returned the young hunter,
with dignity; I don't understand by this, any more, than
that it's
best
to do this, if
possible
. Revenge is an Indian
gift, and forgiveness a white man's. That's all. Overlook
all you
can,
is what's meant; and not
revenge
all you can.
As for kicking, Master Hurry, and Deerslayer's sun-burnt
cheek flushed, as he continued, into the Colony, or out of
the Colony, that's neither here nor there, seeing no one
proposes it, and no one would be likely to put up with it.
What I wish to say is, that a red-skin's scalping don't justify
a pale-face's scalping.
Do as you're done by, Deerslayer; that's ever the
Christian parson's doctrine.
No, Hurry, I've asked the Moravians consarning that;
and it's altogether different. `Do as you
would
be done
by,' they tell me, is the
true
saying, while men pract
y
se the
false
. They think all the Colonies wrong, that offer
bounties for scalps, and believe no blessing will follow the
measures. Above all things, they forbid revenge.
That
for your Moravians! cried March, snapping his
fingers; they're the next thing to Quakers; and if you'd
believe all they tell you, not even a 'rat would be skinned,
out of marcy. Who ever heard of marcy on a muskrat!
Vol. I.8
The disdainful manner of Hurry prevented a reply, and
he and the old man resumed the discussion of their plans in
a more quiet and confidential manner. This conference
lasted until Judith appeared, bearing the simple, but savoury
supper. March observed, with a little surprise, that she
placed the choicest bits before Deerslayer, and that in the
little nameless attentions it was in her power to bestow, she
quite obviously manifested a desire to let it be seen that she
deemed him the honoured guest. Accustomed, however, to
the waywardness and coquetry of the beauty, this discovery
gave him little concern, and he ate with an appetite that
was in no degree disturbed by any moral causes. The
easily-digested food of the forests offering the fewest possible
obstacles to the gratification of this great animal indulgence,
Deerslayer, notwithstanding the hearty meal both had taken
in the woods, was in no manner behind his companion, in
doing justice to the viands.
An hour later, the scene had greatly changed. The lake
was still placid and glassy, but the gloom of the hour had
succeeded to the soft twilight of a summer evening, and all
within the dark setting of the woods lay in the quiet repose
of night. The forests gave up no song, or cry, or even
murmur, but looked down from the hills on the lovely basin
they encircled, in solemn stillness; and the only sound that
was audible, was the regular dip of the sweeps, at which
Hurry and Deerslayer lazily pushed, impelling the ark
towards
the castle. Hutter had withdrawn to the stern of the
scow, in order to steer, but, finding that the young men kept
even strokes, and held the desired course by their own skill,
he had permitted the oar to drag in the water, taken a seat
on the end of the vessel, and lighted his pipe. He had not
been thus placed many minutes, ere Hetty came stealthily
out of the cabin, or house, as they usually termed that part
of the ark, and placed herself at his feet, on a little bench
that she brought with her. As this movement was by
no means unusual in his feeble-minded child, the old man
paid no other attention to it, than to lay his hand kindly on
her head, in an affectionate and approving manner; an act
of grace that the girl received in meek silence.
After a pause of several minutes, Hetty began to sing.
Her voice was low and tremulous, but it was earnest and
solemn. The words and the time were of the simplest form,
the first being a hymn that she had been taught by her
mother, and the last one of those natural melodies that find
favour with all classes, in every age, coming from, and
being addressed to, the feelings. Hutter never listened to
this simple strain without finding his heart and manner
softened; facts that his daughter well knew, and by which
she had often profited, through the sort of holy instinct that
enlightens the weak of mind, more especially in their aims
toward good.
Hetty's low, sweet tones had not been raised many
moments
,
when the dip of the oars ceased, and the holy strain
arose singly on the breathing silence of the wilderness.
As if she gathered courage with the theme, her powers
appeared
to increase as she proceeded; and though nothing
vulgar, or noisy, mingled in her melody, its strength and
melancholy tenderness grew on the ear, until the air was
filled with this simple homage of a soul that seemed almost
spotless. That the men forward were not indifferent to this
touching interruption, was proved by their inaction; nor did
their oars again dip, until the last of the sweet sounds had
actually died among the remarkable shores, which, at that
witching hour, would waft, even the lowest modulations of
the human voice, more than a mile. Hutter, himself, was
affected; for, rude as he was by early habits, and even
ruthless
as he had got to be by long exposure to the practices
of the wilderness, his nature was of that fearful mixture of
good and evil, that so generally enters into the moral
composition
of man.
You are sad to-night, child, said the father, whose
manner and language usually assumed some of the
gentleness
and elevation of the civilized life he had led in youth,
when he thus communed with this particular child; we
have just escaped from enemies, and ought rather to rejoice.
You can never do it, father! said Hetty, in a low
remonstrating manner, taking his hard knotty hand into both
her own; you have talked long with Harry March; but
neither of you will have the heart to do it!
This is going beyond your means, foolish child; you
must have been naughty enough to have listened, or you
could know nothing of our talk.
Why should you and Hurry kill peopleespecially
women and children?
Peace, girl, peace; we are at war, and must do to our
enemies as our enemies would do to us.
That's not it, father! I heard Deerslayer say how it
was. You must do to your enemies, as you
wish
your
enemies
would do to you. No man wishes his enemies to kill
him.
We kill our enemies in war, girl, lest they should kill
us. One side or the other must begin; and them that begin
first, are most apt to get the victory. You know nothing
about these things, poor Hetty, and had best say nothing.
Judith
says it is wrong, father; and Judith has sense,
though I have none.
Jude understands better than to talk to me of these
matters
;
for she has sense, as you say, and knows I'll not bear it.
Which would you prefer, Hetty; to have your own scalp
taken, and sold to the French, or that we should kill our
enemies, and keep them from harming us?
That's not it, father! Don't kill them, nor let them
kill us. Sell your skins, and get more, if you can; but don't
sell blood.
Come, come, child; let us talk of matters you
understand
.
Are you glad to see our old friend, March, back
again? You like Hurry, and must know that one day he
may be your brotherif not something nearer.
That can't be, father, returned the girl, after a
considerable
pause; Hurry has had one father, and one
mother
;
and people never have two.
So much for your weak mind, Hetty. When Jude
marries, her husband's father will be her father, and her
husband's sister, her sister. If she should marry Hurry,
then he will be your brother.
Judith will never have Hurry, returned the girl mildly,
but positively; Judith don't like Hurry.
That's more than you can know, Hetty. Harry March
is the handsomest, and the strongest, and the boldest young
man that ever visits the lake; and, as Jude is the greatest
beauty, I don't see why they shouldn't come together. He
has as much as promised that he will enter into this job with
me, on condition that I'll consent.
Hetty began to move her body back and forth, and
otherwise
to express mental agitation; but she made no answer
for more than a minute. Her father, accustomed to her
manner, and suspecting no immediate cause of concern,
continued
to smoke with the apparent phlegm which would seem
to belong to that particular species of enjoyment.
Hurry
is
handsome, father, said Hetty, with a simple
emphasis, that she might have hesitated about using, had
her mind been more alive to the inferences of others.
I told you so, child, muttered old Hutter, without
removing
the pipe from between his teeth; he's the likeliest
youth in these parts; and Jude is the likeliest young woman
I've met with since her poor mother was in her best days.
Is it wicked to be ugly, father?
One might be guilty of worse thingsbut you're by
no means ugly; though not so comely as Jude.
Is Judith any happier for being so handsome?
She may be, child; and she may not be. But talk of
other matters, now; for you hardly understand these, poor
Hetty. How do you like our new acquaintance,
Deerslayer
?
He isn't handsome, father. Hurry is far handsomer
than Deerslayer.
That's true; but they say he is a noted hunter! His
fame had reached me before I ever saw him; and I did hope
he would prove to be as stout a warrior, as he is dexterous
with the deer. All men are not alike, howsever, child; and
it takes time, as I know by experience, to give a man a true
wilderness heart.
Have I got a wilderness heart, fatherand, Hurry, is
his
heart true wilderness?
You sometimes ask queer questions, Hetty! Your heart
is good, child, and fitter for the settlements than for the
woods; while your reason is fitter for the woods than for
the settlements.
Why has Judith more reason than I, father?
Heaven help thee, child!this is more than I can
answer
.
God gives sense, and appearance, and all these things;
and he grants them as he seeth fit. Dost thou wish for
more sense?
Not I. The little I have troubles me; for when I think
8*
the hardest, then I feel the unhappiest. I don't believe
thinking is good for me, though I
do
wish I was as
handsome
as Judith!
Why so, poor child? Thy sister's beauty may cause
her trouble, as it caused her mother before her. It's no
advantage, Hetty, to be so marked for any thing as to
become
an object of envy, or to be sought after more than
others.
Mother was good, if she
was
handsome, returned the
girl, the tears starting to her eyes, as usually happened
when she adverted to her deceased parent.
Old Hutter, if not equally affected, was moody and silent
at this allusion to his wife. He continued smoking,
without
appearing disposed to make any answer, until his
simple-minded
daughter repeated her remark, in a way to show that
she felt uneasiness, lest he might be inclined to deny her
assertion. Then he knocked the ashes out of his pipe, and
laying his hand in a sort of rough kindness on the girl's
head, he made a reply.
Thy mother was too good for this world, he said;
though others might not think so. Her good looks did
not befriend her; and you have no occasion to mourn that
you are not as much like her as your sister. Think less
of beauty, child, and more of your duty, and you'll be as
happy on this lake, as you could be in the king's palace.
I know it, father; but Hurry says beauty is every thing,
in a young woman.
Hutter made an ejaculation expressive of dissatisfaction,
and went forward; passing through the house, in order to do
so. Hetty's simple betrayal of her weakness in behalf of
March, gave him uneasiness on a subject concerning which
he had never felt before; and he determined to come to an
explanation at once with his visiter; for directness of speech,
and decision in conduct, were two of the best qualities of
this rude being, in whom the seeds of a better education
seemed to be constantly struggling upward, to be choked by
the fruits of a life, in which his hard struggles for
subsistence
and security, had steeled his feelings and indurated his
nature. When he reached the forward end of the scow, he
manifested an intention to relieve Deerslayer at the oar,
directing the latter to take his own place aft. By these
changes, the old man and Hurry were again left alone,
while the young hunter was transferred to the other end of
the ark.
Hetty had disappeared when Deerslayer reached his new
post, and for some little time he directed the course of the
slow-moving craft by himself. It was not long, however,
before Judith came out of the cabin, as if disposed to do the
honours of the place to a stranger engaged in the service of
her family. The star-light was sufficient to permit objects
to be plainly distinguished, when near at hand, and the
bright eyes of the girl had an expression of kindness in them,
when they met those of the youth, that the latter was easily
enabled to discover. Her rich hair shaded her spirited, and
yet soft countenance, even at that hour rendering it the
more beautifulas the rose is loveliest when reposing amid
the shadows and contrasts of its native foliage. Little
ceremony
is used in the intercourse of the woods; and Judith
had acquired a readiness of address, by the admiration
that she so generally excited, which, if it did not amount to
forwardness, certainly in no degree lent to her charms the
aid of that retiring modesty on which poets love to dwell.
I thought I should have killed myself with laughing,
Deerslayer, the beauty abruptly, but coquettishly
commenced
,
when I saw that Indian dive into the river! He
was a good-looking savage, too, the girl always dwelt on
personal beauty as a sort of merit, and yet one couldn't
stop to consider whether his paint would stand water!
And I thought they would have killed you with their
we'pons, Judith, returned Deerslayer; it was an awful
risk for a female to run, in the face of a dozen Mingos!
Did
that
make
you
come out of the cabin, in spite of
their rifles, too? asked the girl, with more real interest than
she would have cared to betray, though with an indifference
of manner that was the result of a good deal of practice,
united to native readiness.
Men ar'n't apt to see females in danger, and not come
to their assistance. Even a Mingo knows that.
This sentiment was uttered with as much simplicity of
manner as of feeling, and Judith rewarded it with a smile so
sweet, that even Deerslayer, who had imbibed a prejudice
against the girl, in consequence of Hurry's suspicions of her
levity, felt its charm, notwithstanding half its winning
influence
was lost in the feeble light. It at once created a sort
of confidence between them and the discourse was continued
on the part of the hunter without the lively consciousness
of the character of this coquette of the wilderness, with
which it had certainly commenced.
You are a man of deeds and not of words, I see plainly,
Deerslayer, continued the beauty, taking her seat near the
spot where the other stood, and I foresee we shall be very
good friends. Hurry Harry has a tongue, and, giant as he
is, he talks more than he performs.
March is your fri'nd, Judith; and fri'nds should be
tender
of each other, when apart.
We all know what Hurry's friendship comes to! Let
him have his own way in every thing, and he's the best
fellow in the Colony; but, `head him off,' as you say of the
deer, and he is master of every thing near him, but himself.
Hurry is no favourite of mine, Deerslayer; and I dare say,
if the truth was known, and his conversation about me
repeated
,
it would be found that he thinks no better of me,
than I own I do of him.
The latter part of this speech was not uttered without
uneasiness
.
Had the girl's companion been more
sophisticated
,
he might have observed the averted face, the manner
in which the pretty little foot was agitated, and other signs
that, for some unexplained reason, the opinions of March
were not quite as much matter of indifference to her as she
thought fit to pretend. Whether this was no more than the
ordinary working of female vanity, feeling keenly even
when it affected not to feel at all, or whether it proceeded
from that deeply-seated consciousness of right and wrong,
which God himself has implanted in our breasts that we
may know good from evil, will be made more apparent to
the reader as we proceed in the tale. Deerslayer felt
embarrassed
.
He well remembered the cruel imputations left
by March's distrust; and, while he did not wish to injure
his associate's suit by exciting resentment against him, his
tongue was one that literally knew no guile. To answer
without saying more or less than he wished, was
consequently
a delicate duty.
March has his say of all things in natur', whether of
fri'nd or foe, slowly and cautiously rejoined the hunter.
He's one of them that speak as they feel, while the
tongue's a-going, and that's sometimes different from what
they'd speak if they took time to consider. Give me a
Delaware, Judith, for one that reflects and ruminates on his
idees! Inmity has made 'em thoughtful, and a loose tongue
is no riccommend at their council fires.
I dare say March's tongue goes free enough when it
gets on the subject of Judith Hutter and her sister, said the
girl, rousing hereself as if in careless disdain. Young
women's good names are a pleasant matter of discourse with
some that wouldn't dare to be so open-mouthed, if there was
a brother in the way. Master March may find it pleasant
to traduce us, but, sooner or later, he'll repent!
Nay, Judith, this is taking the matter up too much in
'arnest. Hurry has never whispered a syllable ag'in the
good name of Hetty, to begin with
I see how it isI see how it isimpetuously
interrupted
Judith.
I
am the one he sees fit to scorch with his
withering tongue!Hetty, indeed!Poor Hetty!she
continued, her voice sinking into low husky tones, that
seemed nearly to stifle her in the utterance
she
is beyond
and above his slanderous malice! Poor Hetty! If God has
created her feeble-minded, the weakness lies altogether on
the side of errors of which she seems to know nothing.
The earth never held a purer being than Hetty Hutter,
Deerslayer.
I can believe ityes, I can believe
that,
Judith, and I
hope 'arnestly that the same can be said of her handsome
sister.
There was a soothing sincerity in the voice of Deerslayer,
which touched the girl's feelings; nor did the allusion to her
beauty lessen the effect with one who only knew too well
the power of her personal charms. Nevertheless, the still,
small voice of conscience was not hushed, and it prompted
the answer which she made, after giving herself time to
reflect.
I dare say Hurry had some of his vile hints about the
people of the garrisons, she added. He knows they are
gentlemen, and can never forgive any one for being what
he feels he can never become himself.
Not in the sense of a king's officer, Judith, sartainly,
for March has no turn that-a-way; but in the sense of
reality, why may not a beaver-hunter be as respectable as
a governor. Since you speak of it, yourself, I'll not deny
that he
did
complain of one as humble as you, being so
much in the company of scarlet coats and silken sashes.
But 't was jealousy that brought it out of him, and I do think
that he mourned over his own thoughts, as a mother would
have mourned over her child.
Perhaps Deerslayer was not aware of the full meaning
that his earnest language conveyed. It is certain that he
did not see the colour that crimsoned the whole of Judith's
fine face, nor detect the uncontrollable distress that,
immediately
after, changed its hue to a deadly paleness. A
minute or two elapsed in profound stillness, the splash of
the water seeming to occupy all the avenues of sound; and
then Judith arose, and grasped the hand of the hunter,
almost convulsively, with one of her own.
Deerslayer, she said, hurriedly, I'm glad the ice is
broke between us. They say that sudden friendships lead
to long enmities, but I do not believe it will turn out so with
us. I know not how it isbut, you are the first man I ever
met, who did not seem to wish to flatterto wish my ruin
to be an enemy in disguisenever mind; say nothing to
Hurry, and another time we'll talk together again.
As the girl released her grasp, she vanished in the house,
leaving the astonished young man standing at the
steeringoar
,
as motionless as one of the pines on the hills. So
abstracted
indeed had his thoughts become, that he was hailed
by Hutter to keep the scow's head in the right direction,
before he remembered his actual situation.
CHAPTER VI.
So spake the apostate Angel, though in pain,
Vaunting aloud, but racked with deep despair!
Milton
.
Shortly
after the disappearance of Judith, a light
southerly
air arose, and Hutter set a large square-sail, that had
once been the flying top-sail of an Albany sloop, but which,
having become threadbare in catching the breezes of
Tappan
,
had been condemned and sold. He had a light tough
spar of tamarack that he could raise on occasion, and with
a little contrivance, his duck was spread to the wind in a
sufficiently professional manner. The effect on the ark was
such as to supersede the necessity of rowing; and, in about
two hours, the castle was seen, in the darkness, rising out
of the water, at the distance of a hundred yards. The sail
was then lowered, and by slow degrees the scow drifted up
to the building, and was secured.
No one had visited the house since Hurry and his
companion
left it. The place was found in the quiet of
mid-night
,
a sort of type of the solitude of a wilderness. As an
enemy was known to be near, Hutter directed his daughters
to abstain from the use of lights, luxuries in which they
seldom indulged during the warm months, lest they might
prove beacons to direct their foes where they might be found.
In open day-light, I shouldn't fear a host of savages,
behind these stout logs, and they without any cover to skulk
into, added Hutter, when he had explained to his guests
the reasons why he forbade the use of lights; for I've
three or four trusty weapons always loaded, and Killdeer, in
particular, is a piece that never misses. But it's a different
thing at night. A canoe might get upon us unseen in the
dark; and the savages have so many cunning ways of
attacking
,
that I look upon it as bad enough to deal with 'em
under a bright sun. I built this dwelling in order to have
'em at arm's length, in case we should ever get to blows
again. Some people think it's too open and exposed, but
I'm for anchoring out here, clear of underbrush and
thickets
,
as the surest means of making a safe berth.
You was once a sailor, they tell me, old Tom? said
Hurry, in his abrupt manner, struck by one or two
expressions
that the other had just used; and some people believe
you could give us strange accounts of inimies and
shipwrecks
,
if you'd a mind to come out with all you know?
There are people in this world, Hurry, returned the
other evasively, who live on other men's thoughts; and
some such often find their way into the woods. What I've
been, or what I've seen in youth, is of less matter, now,
than what the savages are. It's of more account to find
out what will happen in the next twenty-four hours than to
talk over what happened twenty-four years since.
That's judgment, Deerslayer; yes, that's sound
judgment
.
Here's Judith and Hetty to take care of, to say
nothing of our own top-knots; and, for my part, I can sleep
as well in the dark, as I could under a noon-day sun. To
me it's no great matter whether there is light, or not, to see
to shut my eyes by.
As Deerslayer seldom thought it necessary to answer his
companion's peculiar vein of humour, and Hutter was
evidently
indisposed to dwell longer on the subject, its
discussion
ceased with this remark. The latter had something
more on his mind, however, than recollections. His
daughters
had no sooner left them, with an expressed intention of
going to bed, than he invited his two companions to follow
him again into the scow. Here the old man opened his
project, keeping back the portion that he had reserved for
execution by Hurry and himself.
The great object for people, posted like ourselves, is to
command the water, he commenced. So long as there
is no other craft on the lake, a bark canoe is as good as a
man-of-war, since the castle will not be easily taken by
swimming. Now, there are but five canoes remaining in
these parts, two of which are mine, and one is Hurry's.
These three we have with us, here; one being fastened in
the canoe-dock beneath the house, and the other two being
alongside the scow. The other canoes are housed on the
shore, in hollow logs; and the savages, who are such
venomous
enemies, will leave no likely place unexamined, in the
morning, if they're serious in s'arch of bounties
Now, friend Hutter, interrupted Hurry, the Indian
don't live that can find a canoe that is suitably wintered.
I've done something at this business before now, and
Deerslayer
,
here, knows that I am one that can hide a craft in
such a way that I can't find it myself.
Very true, Hurry, put in the person to whom the
appeal
had been made, but you overlook the sarcumstance
that if you couldn't see the trail of the man who did the job,
I could
. I'm of Master Hutter's mind, that it's far wiser to
mistrust a savage's ingenuity, than to build any great
expectations
on his want of eye-sight. If these two canoes can be
got off to the castle, therefore, the sooner it's done the better.
Will you be of the party that's to do it? demanded
Hutter, in a way to show that the proposal both surprised
and pleased him.
Sartain. I'm ready to enlist in any enterprise that's
not ag'in a white man's lawful gifts. Natur' orders us to
defend our lives, and the lives of others, too, when there's
occasion and opportunity. I'll follow you, Floating Tom,
into the Mingo camp, on such an ar'r'n'd, and will strive to
do my duty, should we come to blows; though, never
having been tried in battle, I don't like to promise more than
I may be able to perform. We all know our wishes, but
none know their might, till put to the proof.
That's modest and suitable, lad, exclaimed Hurry.
You've never yet heard the crack of an angry rifle; and,
let me tell you, 't is as different from the persuasion of one
of your venison speeches, as the laugh of Judith Hutter, in
her best humour, is from the scolding of a Dutch
house-keeper
on the Mohawk. I don't expect you'll prove much
of a warrior, Deerslayer, though your equal with the bucks
and the does, don't exist in all these parts. As for the ra'al
sarvice, however, you'll turn out rather rearward, according
to my consait.
We'll see, Hurry, we'll see, returned the other
meekly
;
so far as human eye could discover, not at all disturbed
by these expressed doubts concerning his conduct on a point
on which men are sensitive, precisely in the degree that
they feel the consciousness of demerit; having never been
Vol. I.9
tried, I'll wait to know, before I form any opinion myself;
and then there'll be sartainty, instead of bragging. I've
heard of them that was valiant, afore the fight, who did
little
in it; and of them that waited to know their own
tempers
,
and found that they weren't as bad as some expected,
when put to the proof.
At any rate, we know you can use a paddle, young
man, said Hutter, and that's all we shall ask of you,
tonight
.
Let us waste no more time, but get into the canoe,
and
do,
in place of talking.
As Hutter led the way, in the execution of his project, the
boat was soon ready, with Hurry and Deerslayer at the
paddles. Before the old man embarked, himself, however,
he held a conference of several minutes with Judith, entering
the house for that purpose; then, returning, he took his
place in the canoe, which left the side of the ark at the next
instant.
Had there been a temple reared to God, in that solitary
wilderness, its clock would have told the hour of midnight
as the party set forth on their expedition. The darkness
had increased, though the night was still clear, and the light
of the stars sufficed for all the purposes of the adventurers.
Hutter alone knew the places where the two canoes were hid,
and he directed the course, while his two athletic
companions
raised and dipped their paddles with proper caution,
lest the sounds should be carried to the ears of their
enemies
,
across that sheet of placid water, in the stillness of
deep night. But the bark was too light to require any
extraordinary
efforts, and skill supplying the place of strength,
in about half an hour they were approaching the shore, at
a point near a league from the castle.
Lay on your paddles, men, said Hutter, in a low voice,
and let us look about us for a moment. We must now
be all eyes and ears, for these vermin have noses like
blood-hounds
.
The shores of the lake were examined closely, in order to
discover any glimmering of light that might have been left
in a camp; and the men strained their eyes, in the obscurity,
to see if some thread of smoke was not still stealing along
the mountain-side, as it arose from the dying embers of a
fire. Nothing unusual could be traced; and as the position
was at some distance from the outlet, or the spot where the
savages had been met, it was thought safe to land. The
paddles were plied again, and the bows of the canoe ground
upon the gravelly beach with a gentle motion, and a sound
barely audible. Hutter and Hurry immediately landed, the
former carrying his own and his friend's rifle, leaving
Deerslayer
in charge of the canoe. The hollow log lay a
little
distance up the side of the mountain, and the old man
led the way towards it, using so much caution as to stop at
every third or fourth step, to listen if any tread betrayed the
presence of a foe. The same death-like stillness, however,
reigned on the midnight scene, and the desired place was
reached without an occurrence to induce alarm.
This is it, whispered Hutter, laying a foot on the trunk
of a fallen linden; hand me the paddles first, and draw
the boat out with care, for the wretches may have left it
for a bait, after all.
Keep my rifle handy, butt towards me, old fellow,
answered
March. If they attack me loaded, I shall want to
unload the piece at 'em, at least. And feel if the pan is full.
All's right, muttered the other; move slow, when
you get your load, and let me lead the way.
The canoe was drawn out of the log with the utmost care,
raised by Hurry to his shoulder, and the two began to return
to the shore, moving but a step at a time, lest they should
tumble down the steep declivity. The distance was not
great, but the descent was extremely difficult; and, towards
the end of their little journey, Deerslayer was obliged to
land and meet them, in order to aid in lifting the canoe
through the bushes. With his assistance, the task was
successfully
accomplished, and the light craft soon floated by
the side of the other canoe. This was no sooner done, than
all three turned anxiously toward the forest and the
mountain
,
expecting an enemy to break out of the one, or to come
rushing down the other. Still the silence was unbroken,
and they all embarked with the caution that had been used
in coming ashore.
Hutter now steered broad off towards the centre of the
lake. Having got a sufficient distance from the shore, he
cast his prize loose, knowing that it would drift slowly up the
lake, before the light southerly air, and intending to find
it, on his return. Thus relieved of his tow, the old man
held his way down the lake, steering towards the very point
where Hurry had made his fruitless attempt on the life of
the deer. As the distance from this point to the outlet was
less than a mile, it was like entering an enemy's country;
and redoubled caution became necessary. They reached
the extremity of the point, however, and landed in safety on
the little gravelly beach already mentioned. Unlike the last
place at which they had gone ashore, here was no acclivity
to ascend, the mountains looming up in the darkness quite
a quarter of a mile further west, leaving a margin of level
ground between them and the strand. The point itself,
though long, and covered with tall trees, was nearly flat,
and, for some distance, only a few yards in width. Hutter
and Hurry landed, as before, leaving their companion in
charge of the boat.
In this instance, the dead tree that contained the canoe
of which they had come in quest, lay about half-way
between
the extremity of the narrow slip of land, and the
place where it joined the main shore; and, knowing that
there was water so near him on his left, the old man led the
way along the eastern side of the belt, with some confidence,
walking boldly, though still with caution. He had landed
at the point expressly to get a glimpse into the bay, and to
make certain that the coast was clear; otherwise he would
have come ashore directly abreast of the hollow tree. There
was no difficulty in finding the latter, from which the canoe
was drawn, as before, and, instead of carrying it down to
the place where Deerslayer lay, it was launched at the
nearest favourable spot. As soon as it was in the water,
Hurry entered it, and paddled round to the point, whither
Hutter also proceeded, following the beach. As the three
men had now in their possession all the boats on the lake,
their confidence was greatly increased, and there was no
longer the same feverish desire to quit the shore, or the
same necessity for extreme caution. Their position on the
extremity of the long, narrow bit of land, added to the
feeling
of security, as it permitted an enemy to approach in only
one direction, that in their front, and under circumstances
that would render discovery, with their habitual vigilance,
almost certain. The three now landed together, and stood
grouped in consultation on the gravelly point.
We've fairly tree'd the scamps, said Hurry,
chuckling
at their success; if they wish to visit the castle, let
'em wade or swim! Old Tom, that idee of your'n, in
burrowing out in the lake, was high proof, and carries a fine
bead. There be men who would think the land safer than
the water; but, after all, reason shows it isn't; the beaver,
and rats, and other l'arned creatur's, taking to the last, when
hard pressed. I call our position, now, entrenched, and set
the Canadas at defiance.
Let us paddle along this south shore, said Hutter,
and see if there's no sign of an encampmentbut, first,
let me have a better look into the bay, for no one has been
far enough round the inner shore of the point, to make sure
of that quarter, yet.
As Hutter ceased speaking, all three moved in the
direction
he had named. Scarce had they fairly opened the
bottom of the bay, when a general start proved that their
eyes had lighted on a common object at the same instant.
It was no more than a dying brand, giving out its flickering
and failing light; but at that hour, and in that place, it was
at once as conspicuous as a good deed in a naughty
world. There was not a shadow of doubt that this fire
had been kindled at an encampment of the Indians. The
situation, sheltered from observation on all sides but one,
and even on that, except for a very short distance, proved
that more care had been taken to conceal the spot, than
would be used for ordinary purposes, and Hutter, who knew
that a spring was near at hand, as well as one of the best
fishing-stations on the lake, immediately inferred that this
encampment contained the women and children of the party.
That's not a warrior's encampment, he growled to
Hurry; and there's bounty enough sleeping round that
fire to make a heavy division of head-money. Send the lad
to the canoes, for there'll come no good of him, in such an
onset, and let us take the matter in hand, at once, like men.
There's judgment in your notion, old Tom, and I like
it to the back-bone. Deerslayer, do you get into the canoe,
lad, and paddle off into the lake, with the spare one, and set
it adrift, as we did with the other; after which, you can float
9*
along shore, as near as you can get to the head of the bay,
keeping outside the point, howsever, and outside the rushes,
too. You can hear us when we want you; and, if there's
any delay, I'll call like a loonyes, that'll do itthe
call of a loon shall be the signal. If you hear rifles, and
feel like soldiering, why, you may close in, and see if you
can make the same hand with the savages that you do with
the deer.
If my wishes could be followed, this matter would not
be undertaken, Hurry
Quite truenobody denies it, boy; but your wishes
can't
be followed; and that inds the matter. So just canoe
yourself off into the middle of the lake, and by the time you
get back, there'll be movements in that camp!
The young man set about complying with great reluctance
and a heavy heart. He knew the prejudices of the
frontier-men
too well, however, to attempt a remonstrance. The
latter, indeed, under the circumstances, might prove
dangerous
,
as it would certainly prove useless. He paddled the
canoe, therefore, silently, and with the former caution, to a
spot near the centre of the placid sheet of water, and set the
boat just recovered adrift, to float towards the castle, before
the light southerly air. This expedient had been adopted,
in both cases, under the certainty that the drift could not
carry the light barks more than a league or two, before the
return of light, when they might easily be overtaken. In
order to prevent any wandering savage from using them, by
swimming off and getting possession, a possible, but scarcely
a probable event, all the paddles were retained.
No sooner had he set the recovered canoe adrift, than
Deerslayer turned the bows of his own towards the point
on the shore that had been indicated by Hurry. So light
was the movement of the little craft, and so steady the sweep
of its master's arm, that ten minutes had not elapsed ere it
was again approaching the land, having, in that brief time,
passed over fully half a mile of distance. As soon as
Deerslayer's
eye caught a glimpse of the rushes, of which there
were many growing in the water a hundred feet from the
shore, he arrested the motion of the canoe, and anchored his
boat by holding fast to the delicate, but tenacious stem of
one of the drooping plants. Here he remained, awaiting
with an intensity of suspense that can be easily imagined,
the result of the hazardous enterprise.
It would be difficult to convey to the minds of those who
have never witnessed it, the sublimity that characterizes the
silence of a solitude as deep as that which now reigned over
the Glimmerglass. In the present instance, this sublimity was
increased by the gloom of night, which threw its shadowy
and fantastic forms around the lake, the forest, and the hills.
It is not easy, indeed, to conceive of any place more
favourable
to heighten these natural impressions, than that
Deerslayer
now occupied. The size of the lake brought all
within the reach of human senses, while it displayed so
much of the imposing scene at a single view, giving up,
as it might be, at a glance, a sufficiency to produce the
deepest impressions. As has been said, this was the first
lake Deerslayer had ever seen. Hitherto, his experience
had been limited to the courses of rivers and smaller streams,
and never before had he seen so much of that wilderness
which he so well loved, spread before his gaze.
Accustomed
to the forest, however, his mind was capable of
portraying
all its hidden mysteries, as he looked upon its leafy
surface. This was also the first time he had been on a trail
where human lives depended on the issue. His ears had
often drunk in the traditions of frontier warfare, but he had
never yet been confronted with an enemy.
The reader will readily understand, therefore, how intense
must have been the expectation of the young man, as he sat
in his solitary canoe, endeavouring to catch the smallest
sound that might denote the course of things on shore. His
training had been perfect, so far as theory could go, and his
self-possession, notwithstanding the high excitement, that
was the fruit of novelty, would have done credit to a
veteran
.
The visible evidences of the existence of the camp, or
of the fire, could not be detected from the spot where the
canoe lay, and he was compelled to depend on the sense of
hearing alone. He did not feel impatient, for the lessons he
had heard taught him the virtue of patience, and, most of all,
inculcated the necessity of wariness, in conducting any
covert
assault on the Indians. Once he thought he heard the
cracking of a dried twig, but expectation was so intense it
might mislead him. In this manner minute after minute
passed, until the whole time since he left his companions
was extended to quite an hour. Deerslayer knew not
whether
to rejoice in, or to mourn over this cautious delay, for,
if it augured security to his associates, it foretold destruction
to the feeble and innocent.
It might have been an hour and a half after his
companions
and he had parted, when Deerslayer was aroused by
a sound that filled him equally with concern and surprise.
The quavering call of a loon arose from the opposite side of
the lake, evidently at no great distance from its outlet.
There was no mistaking the note of this bird, which is so
familiar to all who know the sounds of the American lakes.
Shrill, tremulous, loud, and sufficiently prolonged, it seems
the very cry of warning. It is often raised, also, at night
an exception to the habits of most of the other feathered
inmates
of the wilderness; a circumstance which had induced
Hurry to select it as his own signal. There had been
sufficient
time, certainly, for the two adventurers to make their
way by land, from the point where they had been left to that
whence the call had come, but it was not probable that they
would adopt such a course. Had the camp been deserted,
they would have summoned Deerslayer to the shore, and, did
it prove to be peopled, there could be no sufficient motive for
circling it, in order to re-embark at so great a distance.
Should he obey the signal, and be drawn away from the
landing, the lives of those who depended on him might be
the forfeitand, should he neglect the call, on the
supposition
that it had been really made, the consequences might
be equally disastrous, though from a different cause. In
this indecision he waited, trusting that the call, whether
feigned or natural, would be speedily renewed. Nor was he
mistaken. A very few minutes elapsed before the same
shrill, warning cry was repeated, and from the same part
of the lake. This time, being on the alert, his senses were
not deceived. Although he had often heard admirable
imitations
of this bird, and was no mean adept, himself, in
raising
its notes, he felt satisfied that Hurry, to whose efforts in
that way he had attended, could never so completely and
closely follow nature. He determined, therefore, to
disregard
that cry, and to wait for one less perfect, and nearer
at hand.
Deerslayer had hardly come to this determination, wher
the profound stillness of night and solitude was broken by a
cry so startling, as to drive all recollection of the more
melancholy
call of the loon, from the listener's mind. It was
a shriek of agony, that came either from one of the female
sex, or from a boy so young as not yet to have attained a
manly voice. This appeal could not be mistaken.
Heartrending
terrorif not writhing agonywas in the sounds,
and the anguish that had awakened them was as sudden as
it was fearful. The young man released his hold of the
rush, and dashed his paddle into the water; to do, he knew
not whatto steer, he knew not whither. A very few
moments
,
however, removed his indecision. The breaking of
branches, the cracking of dried sticks, and the fall of feet,
were all distinctly audible; the sounds appearing to
approach
the water, though in a direction that led diagonally
towards the shore, and a little farther north than the spot
that Deerslayer had been ordered to keep near. Following
this clue, the young man urged the canoe ahead, paying but
little attention to the manner in which he might betray its
presence. He had reached a part of the shore, where its
immediate bank was tolerably high and quite steep. Men
were evidently threshing through the bushes and trees on
the summit of this bank, following the line of the shore, as
if those who fled sought a favourable place for descending.
Just at this instant, five or six rifles flashed, and the
opposite
hills gave back, as usual, the sharp reports in
prolonged
,
rolling echoes. One or two shrieks, like those which
escape the bravest when suddenly overcome by unexpected
anguish and alarm, followed; and then the threshing among
the bushes was renewed, in a way to show that man was
grappling with man.
Slippery devil! shouted Hurry, with the fury of
disappointment
his
skin's greased! I shan't grapple!Take
that
for your cunning!
The words were followed by the fall of some heavy
object
among the smaller trees that fringed the bank,
appearing
to Deerslayer as if his gigantic associate had hurled an
enemy from him, in this unceremonious manner. Again
the flight and pursuit were renewed, and then the young
man saw a human form break down the hill, and rush
several
yards into the water. At this critical moment the canoe
was just near enough to the spot to allow this movement,
which was accompanied by no little noise, to be seen; and
feeling that there he must take in his companions, if
anywhere
,
Deerslayer urged the canoe forward, to the rescue.
His paddle had not been raised twice, when the voice of
Hurry was heard filling the air with imprecations, and he
rolled on the narrow beach, literally loaded down with
enemies
.
While prostrate, and almost smothered with his foes,
the athletic frontier-man gave his loon-call, in a manner
that would have excited laughter under circumstances less
terrific. The figure in the water seemed suddenly to repent
his own flight, and rushed to the shore to aid his companion,
but was met and immediately overpowered by half a dozen
fresh pursuers, who, just then, came leaping down the bank.
Let up, you painted riptyleslet up! cried Hurry, too
hard pressed to be particular about the terms he used; isn't
it enough that I'm withed like a saw-log, that ye must
choke, too?
This speech satisfied Deerslayer that his friends were
prisoners
,
and that to land would be to share their fate. He
was already within a hundred feet of the shore, when a few
timely strokes of the paddle not only arrested his advance,
but forced him off to six or eight times that distance from his
enemies. Luckily for him, all of the Indians had dropped
their rifles in the pursuit, or this retreat might not have been
effected with impunity; though no one had noted the canoe
in the first confusion of the
mle
.
Keep off the land, lad, called out Hutter; the girls
depend only on you, now: you will want all your caution
to escape these savages. Keep off, and God prosper you,
as you aid my children!
There was little sympathy, in general, between Hutter and
the young man, but the bodily and mental anguish with
which this appeal was made, served at the moment to
conceal
from the latter the former's faults. He saw only the
father in his sufferings, and resolved at once to give a pledge
of fidelity to his interests, and to be faithful to his word.
Put your heart at ease, Master Hutter, he called out;
the gals shall be looked to, as well as the castle. The
inimy has got the shore, 't is no use to deny, but he hasn't
got the water. Providence has the charge of all, and no
one can say what will come of it; but, if good-will can sarve
you and your'n, depend on that much. My exper'ence is
small, but my will is good.
Ayay, Deerslayer, returned Hurry, in his stentorian
voice, which was losing some of its heartiness,
notwithstanding
Ay,
ay, Deerslayer, you
mean
well enough, but what
can you
do?
You're no great matter in the best of times,
and such a person is not likely to turn out a miracle in the
worst. If there's one savage on this lake shore, there's
forty, and that's an army you ar'n't the man to
overcome
.
The best way, in my judgment, will be to make a
straight course to the castle; get the gals into the canoe,
with a few eatables; then strike off for the corner of the lake
where we came in, and take the best trial for the Mohawk.
These devils won't know where to look for you for some
hours, and if they did, and went off hot in the pursuit, they
must turn either the foot, or the head of the lake, to get at
you. That's my judgment in the matter; and if old Tom,
here, wishes to make his last will and testament in a
manner
favourable to his darters, he'll say the same.
'T will never do, young man, rejoined Hutter. The
enemy has scouts out at this moment, looking for canoes,
and you'll be seen and taken. Trust to the castle; and,
above all things, keep clear of the land. Hold out a week,
and parties from the garrisons will drive the savages off.
'T won't be four-and-twenty hours, old fellow, afore
these foxes will be rafting off, to storm your castle,
interrupted
Hurry, with more of the heat of argument than might
be expected from a man who was bound and a captive, and
about whom nothing could be called free but his opinions
and his tongue. Your advice has a stout sound, but it
will have a fatal tarmination. If you or I was in the house,
we might hold out a few days, but remember that this lad
has never seen an inimy afore to-night, and is what you
yourself called settlement-conscienced; though, for my part,
I think the consciences in the settlements pretty much the
same as they are out here in the woods. These savages
are making signs, Deerslayer, for me to encourage you to
come ashore with the canoe; but that I'll never do, as it's
ag'in reason and natur'. As for old Tom and myself,
whether
they'll scalp us to-night, keep us for the torture by
fire, or carry us to Canada, is more than any one knows,
but the devil that advises them how to act. I've such
a big and bushy head, that it's quite likely they'll indivor
to get two scalps off it, for the bounty is a tempting thing,
or old Tom and I wouldn't be in this scrape. Aythere
they go with their signs ag'in, but if I advise you to land,
may they eat me as well as roast me. No, no, Deerslayer
do you keep off where you are, and after day-light, on
no account come within two hundred yards
This injunction of Hurry's was stopped by a hand being
rudely slapped against his mouth, the certain sign that some
one in the party sufficiently understood English to have at
length detected the drift of his discourse. Immediately after,
the whole group entered the forest, Hutter and Hurry
apparently
making no resistance to the movement. Just as the
sounds of the cracking bushes were ceasing, however, the
voice of the father was again heard.
As you're true to my children, God prosper you, young
man! were the words that reached Deerslayer's ears; after
which he found himself left to follow the dictates of his own
discretion.
Several minutes elapsed, in death-like stillness, when the
party on the shore had disappeared in the woods. Owing
to the distance, rather more than two hundred yards, and
the obscurity, Deerslayer had been able barely to distinguish
the group, and to see it retiring; but even this dim
connection
with human forms, gave an animation to the scene that
was strongly in contrast to the absolute solitude that
remained
.
Although the young man leaned forward to listen,
holding his breath and condensing every faculty in the
single
sense of hearing, not another sound reached his ears to
denote the vicinity of human beings. It seemed as if a
silence that had never been broken, reigned on the spot
again; and, for an instant, even that piercing shriek which
had so lately broken the stillness of the forest, or the
execrations
of March, would have been a relief to the feeling
of desertion to which it gave rise.
This paralysis of mind and body, however, could not last
long in one constituted mentally and physically like
Deerslayer
.
Dropping his paddle into the water, he turned the
head of the canoe, and proceeded slowly, as one walks who
thinks intently, towards the centre of the lake. When he
believed himself to have reached a point in a line with that
where he had set the last canoe adrift, he changed his
direction
northward, keeping the light air as nearly on his back
as possible. After paddling a quarter of a mile in this
direction
,
a dark object became visible on the lake, a little to
the right; and turning on one side for the purpose, he had
soon secured his lost prize to his own boat. Deerslayer
now examined the heavens, the course of the air, and the
position of the two canoes. Finding nothing in either to
induce a change of plan, he lay down and prepared to catch
a few hours' sleep, that the morrow might find him equal to
its exigencies.
Although the hardy and the tired sleep profoundly, even
in scenes of danger, it was some time before Deerslayer lost
his recollection. His mind dwelt on what had passed, and
his half-conscious faculties kept figuring the events of the
night, in a sort of waking dream. Suddenly he was up and
alert, for he fancied he heard the preconcerted signal of
Hurry, summoning him to the shore. But all was still
as the grave, again. The canoes were slowly drifting
northward, the thoughtful stars were glimmering in their
mild glory over his head, and the forest-bound sheet of
water lay embedded between its mountains, as calm and
melancholy as if never troubled by the winds, or brightened
by a noon-day sun. Once more the loon raised his
tremulous
cry, near the foot of the lake, and the mystery of the
alarm was explained. Deerslayer adjusted his hard pillow,
stretched his form in the bottom of the canoe, and slept.
Vol. I.10
CHAPTER VII.
Clear, placid Leman! Thy contrasted lake
With the wild world I dwelt in, is a thing
Which warns me, with its stillness, to forsake
Earth's troubled waters for a purer spring.
This quiet sail is as a noiseless wing
To waft me from distraction: once I loved
Torn ocean's roar, but thy soft murmuring
Sounds sweet as if a sister's voice reproved,
That I with stern delights should e'er have been so moved.
Byron
.
Day
had fairly dawned, before the young man, whom we
have left in the situation described in the last chapter, again
opened his eyes. This was no sooner done, than he started
up, and looked about him with the eagerness of one who
suddenly felt the importance of accurately ascertaining his
precise position. His rest had been deep and undisturbed;
and when he awoke, it was with a clearness of intellect, and
a readiness of resources that were much needed at that
particular
moment. The sun had not risen, it is true, but the
vault of heaven was rich with the winning softness that
`brings and shuts the day,' while the whole air was filled
with the carols of birds, the hymns of the feathered tribe.
These sounds first told Deerslayer the risks he ran. The
air, for wind it could scarce be called, was still light, it is
true, but it had increased a little in the course of the night,
and as the canoes were mere feathers on the water, they
had drifted twice the expected distance; and, what was still
more dangerous, had approached so near the base of the
mountain that here rose precipitously from the eastern shore,
as to render the carols of the birds plainly audible. This
was not the worst. The third canoe had taken the same
direction, and was slowly drifting towards a point where it
must inevitably touch, unless turned aside by a shift of
wind, or human hands. In other respects, nothing
presented
itself to attract attention, or to awaken alarm. The
castle stood on its shoal, nearly abreast of the canoes, for
the drifts had amounted to miles in the course of the night,
and the ark lay fastened to its piles, as both had been left
so many hours before.
As a matter of course, Deerslayer's attention was first
given to the canoe ahead. It was already quite near the
point, and a very few strokes of the paddle sufficed to tell
him that it must touch before he could possibly overtake it.
Just at this moment, too, the wind inopportunely freshened,
rendering the drift of the light craft much more rapid and
certain. Feeling the impossibility of preventing a contact
with the land, the young man wisely determined not to heat
himself with unnecessary exertions; but, first looking to
the priming of his piece, he proceeded slowly and warily
towards the point, taking care to make a little circuit, that
he might be exposed on only one side, as he approached.
The canoe adrift, being directed by no such intelligence,
pursued its proper way, and grounded on a small sunken
rock, at the distance of three or four yards from the shore.
Just at that moment, Deerslayer had got abreast of the point,
and turned the bows of his own boat to the land; first
casting
loose his tow, that his movements might be
unencumbered
.
The canoe hung an instant on the rock; then it rose
a hair's-breadth on an almost imperceptible swell of the
water, swung round, floated clear, and reached the strand.
All this the young man noted, but it neither quickened his
pulses, nor hastened his hand. If any one had been lying
in wait for the arrival of the waif, he must be seen, and the
utmost caution in approaching the shore became
indispensable
;
if no one was in ambush, hurry was unnecessary.
The point being nearly diagonally opposite to the Indian
encampment, he hoped the last, though the former was not
only possible, but probable; for the savages were prompt in
adopting all the expedients of their particular modes of
warfare
,
and quite likely had many scouts searching the shores
for craft to carry them off to the castle. As a glance at the
lake from any height or projection, would expose the
smallest
object on its surface, there was little hope that either of
the canoes could pass unseen; and Indian sagacity needed
no instruction to tell which way a boat or a log would
drift, when the direction of the wind was known. As
Deerslayer drew nearer and nearer to the land, the stroke
of his paddle grew slower, his eye became more watchful,
and his ears and nostrils almost dilated with the effort to
detect any lurking danger. 'T was a trying moment for a
novice, nor was there the encouragement which even the
timid sometimes feel, when conscious of being observed and
commended. He was entirely alone, thrown on his own
resources, and was cheered by no friendly eye, emboldened
by no encouraging voice. Notwithstanding all these
circumstances
,
the most experienced veteran in forest warfare
could not have conducted better. Equally free from
recklessness
and hesitation, his advance was marked by a sort
of philosophical prudence, that appeared to render him
superior
to all motives but those which were best calculated to
effect his purpose. Such was the commencement of a
career
in forest exploits, that afterwards rendered this man, in
his way, and under the limits of his habits and
opportunities
,
as renowned as many a hero whose name has adorned
the pages of works more celebrated than legends simple as
ours can ever become.
When about a hundred yards from the shore, Deerslayer
rose in the canoe, gave three or four vigorous strokes with
the paddle, sufficient of themselves to impel the bark to land,
and then quickly laying aside the instrument of labour, he
seized that of war. He was in the very act of raising the
rifle, when a sharp report was followed by the buzz of a
bullet
that passed so near his body, as to cause him
involuntarily
to start. The next instant Deerslayer staggered, and
fell his whole length in the bottom of the canoe. A yell
it came from a single voicefollowed, and an Indian leaped
from the bushes upon the open area of the point, bounding
towards the canoe. This was the moment the young man
desired. He rose on the instant, and levelled his own rifle
at his uncovered foe; but his finger hesitated about pulling
the trigger on one whom he held at such a disadvantage.
This little delay, probably, saved the life of the Indian, who
bounded back into the cover as swiftly as he had broken out
of it. In the meantime Deerslayer had been swiftly
approaching
the land, and his own canoe reached the point
just as his enemy disappeared. As its movements had not
been directed, it touched the shore a few yards from the
other boat; and though the rifle of his foe had to be loaded,
there was not time to secure his prize, and to carry it
beyond
danger, before he would be exposed to another shot.
Under the circumstances, therefore, he did not pause an
instant
,
but dashed into the woods and sought a cover.
On the immediate point there was a small open area,
partly in native grass, and partly beach, but a dense fringe
of bushes lined its upper side. This narrow belt of dwarf
vegetation passed, one issued immediately into the high and
gloomy vaults of the forest. The land was tolerably level
for a few hundred feet, and then it rose precipitously in a
mountain-side. The trees were tall, large, and so free from
under-brush, that they resembled vast columns, irregularly
scattered, upholding a dome of leaves. Although they stood
tolerably close together, for their ages and size, the eye could
penetrate to considerable distances; and bodies of men, even,
might have engaged beneath their cover, with concert and
intelligence.
Deerslayer knew that his adversary must be employed in
re-loading, unless he had fled. The former proved to be the
case, for the young man had no sooner placed himself behind
a tree, than he caught a glimpse of the arm of the Indian,
his body being concealed by an oak, in the very act of
forcing the leathered bullet home. Nothing would have
been easier than to spring forward, and decide the affair by
a close assault on his unprepared foe; but every feeling of
Deerslayer revolted at such a step, although his own life
had just been attempted from a cover. He was yet
unpractised
in the ruthless expedients of savage warfare, of which
he knew nothing except by tradition and theory, and it
struck him as an unfair advantage to assail an unarmed foe.
His colour had heightened, his eye frowned, his lips were
compressed, and all his energies were collected and ready;
but, instead of advancing to fire, he dropped his rifle to the
usual position of a sportsman in readiness to catch his aim,
and muttered to himself, unconscious that he was speaking
No, nothat may be red-skin warfare, but it's not a
Christian's gifts. Let the miscreant charge, and then we'll
take it out like men; for the canoe he
must
not, and
shall
not have. No, no; let him have time to load, and God will
take care of the right!
All this time the Indian had been so intent on his own
10*
movements, that he was even ignorant that his enemy was
in the wood. His only apprehension was, that the canoe
would be recovered and carried away, before he might be
in readiness to prevent it. He had sought the cover from
habit, but was within a few feet of the fringe of bushes, and
could be at the margin of the forest, in readiness to fire, in
a moment. The distance between him and his enemy was
about fifty yards, and the trees were so arranged by nature
that the line of sight was not interrupted, except by the
particular
trees behind which each party stood.
His rifle was no sooner loaded, than the savage glanced
around him, and advanced incautiously as regarded the real,
but stealthily as respected the fancied position of his enemy,
until he was fairly exposed. Then Deerslayer stepped from
behind his own cover, and hailed him.
This-a-way, red-skin; this-a-way, if you're looking for
me, he called out. I'm young in war, but not so young
as to stand on an open beach to be shot down like an owl,
by day-light. It rests on yourself whether it's peace, or
war, atween us; for my gifts are white gifts, and I'm not
one of them that thinks it valiant to slay human mortals,
singly, in the woods.
The savage was a good deal startled by this sudden
discovery
of the danger he ran. He had a little knowledge of
English, however, and caught the drift of the other's
meaning
.
He was also too well schooled to betray alarm, but,
dropping the butt of his rifle to the earth, with an air of
confidence
,
he made a gesture of lofty courtesy. All this was
done with the ease and self-possession of one accustomed to
consider no man his superior. In the midst of this
consummate
acting, however, the volcano that raged within caused
his eyes to glare, and his nostrils to dilate, like those of some
wild beast that is suddenly prevented from taking the fatal
leap.
Two canoe, he said, in the deep guttural tones of his
race, holding up the number of fingers he mentioned, by
way of preventing mistakes; one for youone for me.
No, no, Mingo, that will never do. You own neither;
and neither shall you have, as long as I can prevent it. I
know it's war atween your people and mine, but that's no
reason why human mortals should slay each other, like
savage creatur's that meet in the woods; go your way,
then, and leave me to go mine. The world is large enough
for us both; and when we meet fairly in battle, why, the
Lord will order the fate of each of us.
Good! exclaimed the Indian; my brother missionary
great talk; all about Manitou.
Not sonot so, warrior. I'm not good enough for the
Moravians, and am too good for most of the other
vagabonds
that preach about in the woods. No, no, I'm only a
hunter, as yet, though afore the peace is made, 't is like
enough there'll be occasion to strike a blow at some of your
people. Still, I wish it to be done in fair fight, and not in a
quarrel about the ownership of a miserable canoe.
Good! My brother very young  but he very wise.
Little warriorgreat talker. Chief, sometimes, in council.
I don't know this, nor do I say it, Indian, returned
Deerslayer, colouring a little at the ill-concealed sarcasm
of the other's manner; I look forward to a life in the
woods, and I only hope it may be a peaceable one. All
young men must go on the war-path, when there's occasion,
but war isn't needfully massacre. I've seen enough of the
last, this very night, to know that Providence frowns on it;
and I now invite you to go your own way, while I go mine;
and hope that we may part fri'nds.
Good! My brother has two scalp  grey hair under
t'other. Old wisdomyoung tongue.
Here the savage advanced with confidence, his hand
extended
,
his face smiling, and his whole bearing denoting
amity and respect. Deerslayer met his offered friendship
in a proper spirit, and they shook hands cordially, each
endeavouring to assure the other of his sincerity and desire
to be at peace.
All have his own, said the Indian; my canoe, mine;
your canoe, your'n. Go look; if your'n, you keep; if mine,
I keep.
That's just, red-skin; though you must be wrong in
thinking the canoe your property. Howsever, seein' is
believin'
,
and we'll go down to the shore, where you may
look with your own eyes; for it's likely you'll object to
trustin' altogether to mine.
The Indian uttered his favourite exclamation of good!
and then they walked, side by side, towards the shore.
There was no apparent distrust in the manner of either, the
Indian moving in advance, as if he wished to show his
companion
that he did not fear turning his back to him. As
they reached the open ground, the former pointed towards
Deerslayer's boat, and said emphatically
No minepale-face canoe.
This
red-man's. No want
other man's canoewant his own.
You 're wrong, red-skin, you 're altogether wrong.
This canoe was left in old Hutter's keeping, and is his'n,
according to all law, red or white, till its owner comes to
claim it. Here's the seats and the stitching of the bark to
speak for themselves. No man ever know'd an Indian to
turn off such work.
Good! My brother little oldbig wisdom. Indian no
make him. White man's work.
I'm glad you think so, for holding out to the contrary
might have made ill blood atween us; every one having a
right to take possession of his own. I'll just shove the
canoe out of reach of dispute, at once, as the quickest way
of settling difficulties.
While Deerslayer was speaking, he put a foot against the
end of the light boat, and giving a vigorous shove, he sent
it out into the lake a hundred feet or more, where, taking the
true current, it would necessarily float past the point, and be
in no further danger of coming ashore. The savage started
at this ready and decided expedient, and his companion saw
that he cast a hurried and fierce glance at his own canoe, or
that which contained the paddles. The change of manner,
however, was but momentary, and then the Iroquois
resumed
his air of friendliness, and a smile of satisfaction.
Good! he repeated, with stronger emphasis than ever.
Young head, old mind. Know how to settle quarrel.
Farewell, brother. He go to house in watermuskrat
houseIndian go to camp; tell chiefs no find canoe.
Deerslayer was not sorry to hear this proposal, for he
felt anxious to join the females, and he took the offered hand
of the Indian very willingly. The parting words were
friendly; and, while the red-man walked calmly towards the
wood, with the rifle in the hollow of his arm, without once
looking back in uneasiness or distrust, the white man moved
towards the remaining canoe, carrying his piece in the same
pacific manner, it is true, but keeping his eyes fastened on
the movements of the other. This distrust, however, seemed
to be altogether uncalled for, and, as if ashamed to have
entertained it, the young man averted his look, and stepped
carelessly up to his boat. Here he began to push the canoe
from the shore, and to make his other preparations for
departing
.
He might have been thus employed a minute, when,
happening to turn his face towards the land, his quick and
certain eye told him, at a glance, the imminent jeopardy
in which his life was placed. The black, ferocious eyes of
the savage were glancing on him, like those of the
crouching
tiger, through a small opening in the bushes, and the
muzzle of his rifle seemed already to be opening in a line
with his own body.
Then, indeed, the long practice of Deerslayer, as a hunter,
did him good service. Accustomed to fire with the deer on
the bound, and often when the precise position of the
animal's
body had in a manner to be guessed at, he used the
same expedients here. To cock and poise his rifle were the
acts of a single moment, and a single motion; then, aiming
almost without sighting, he fired into the bushes where he
knew a body ought to be, in order to sustain the appalling
countenance, which alone was visible. There was not time
to raise the piece any higher, or to take a more deliberate
aim. So rapid were his movements, that both parties
discharged
their pieces at the same instant, the concussions
mingling in one report. The mountains, indeed, gave back
but a single echo. Deerslayer dropped his piece, and stood,
with head erect, steady as one of the pines in the calm of a
June morning, watching the result; while the savage gave
the yell that has become historical for its appalling
influence
,
leaped through the bushes, and came bounding across
the open ground, flourishing a tomahawk. Still Deerslayer
moved not, but stood with his unloaded rifle fallen against
his shoulders, while, with a hunter's habits, his hands were
mechanically feeling for the powder-horn and charger.
When about forty feet from his enemy, the savage hurled
his keen weapon; but it was with an eye so vacant, and a
hand so unsteady and feeble, that the young man caught it
by the handle, as it was flying past him. At that instant
the Indian staggered and fell his whole length on the
ground.
I know'd itI know'd it! exclaimed Deerslayer, who
was already preparing to force a fresh bullet into his rifle;
I know'd it must come to this, as soon as I had got the
range from the creatur's eyes. A man sights suddenly, and
fires quick, when his own life's in danger; yes, I know'd it
would come to this. I was about the hundredth part of a
second too quick for him, or it might have been bad for me!
The riptyle's bullet has just grazed my sidebut, say what
you will, for or ag'in 'em, a red-skin is by no means as
sartain
with powder and ball as a white man. Their gifts don't
seem to lie that-a-way. Even Chingachgook, great as he
is in other matters, isn't downright deadly with the rifle.
By this time the piece was reloaded, and Deerslayer, after
tossing the tomahawk into the canoe, advanced to his
victim
,
and stood over him, leaning on his rifle, in melancholy
attention. It was the first instance in which he had seen a
man fall in battleit was the first fellow-creature against
whom he had ever seriously raised his own hand. The
sensations were novel; and regret, with the freshness of our
better feelings, mingled with his triumph. The Indian was
not dead, though shot directly through the body. He lay
on his back motionless, but his eyes, now full of
consciousness
,
watched each action of his victoras the fallen bird
regards the fowlerjealous of every movement. The man
probably expected the fatal blow, which was to precede the
loss of his scalp; or, perhaps he anticipated that this latter
act of cruelty would precede his death. Deerslayer read his
thoughts; and he found a melancholy satisfaction in
relieving
the apprehensions of the helpless savage.
No, no, red-skin, he said; you 've nothing more to
fear from me. I am of a Christian stock, and scalping is
not of my gifts. I'll just make sartain of your rifle, and
then come back and do you what sarvice I can. Though
here I can't stay much longer, as the crack of three rifles
will be apt to bring some of your devils down upon me.
The close of this was said in a sort of a soliloquy, as the
young man went in quest of the fallen rifle. The piece was
found where its owner had dropped it, and was immediately
put into the canoe. Laying his own rifle at its side,
Deerslayer
then returned and stood over the Indian again.
All inmity atween you and me's at an ind, red-skin,
he said; and you may set your heart at rest, on the score
of the scalp, or any further injury. My gifts are white, as
I've told you; and I hope my conduct will be white also!
Could looks have conveyed all they meant, it is probable
Deerslayer's innocent vanity, on the subject of colour, would
have been rebuked a little; but he comprehended the
gratitude
that was expressed in the eyes of the dying savage,
without in the least detecting the bitter sarcasm that
struggled
with the better feeling.
Water! ejaculated the thirsty and unfortunate
creature
;
give poor Indian water.
Ay, water you shall have, if you drink the lake dry.
I'll just carry you down to it, that you may take your fill.
This is the way, they tell me, with all wounded people
water is their greatest comfort and delight.
So saying, Deerslayer raised the Indian in his arms, and
carried him to the lake. Here he first helped him to take
an attitude in which he could appease his burning thirst;
after which he seated himself on a stone, and took the head
of his wounded adversary in his own lap, and endeavoured
to soothe his anguish, in the best manner he could.
It would be sinful in me to tell you your time hadn't
come, warrior, he commenced, and therefore I'll not say
it. You 've passed the middle age, already, and, considerin'
the sort of lives ye lead, your days have been pretty well
filled. The principal thing, now, is to look forward to what
comes next. Neither red-skin nor pale-face, on the whole,
calculates much on sleepin' for ever; but both expect to live
in another world. Each has his gifts, and will be judged
by 'em, and, I suppose, you 've thought these matters over
enough, not to stand in need of sarmons, when the trial
comes. You'll find your happy hunting-grounds, if you 've
been a just Indian; if an unjust, you'll meet your desarts
in another way. I 've my own idees about these things; but
you 're too old and exper'enced to need any explanations
from one as young as I.
Good! ejaculated the Indian, whose voice retained its
depth even as life ebbed away; young headold
wisdom
!
It's sometimes a consolation, when the ind comes, to
know that them we've harmed, or
tried
to harm, forgive
us. I suppose natur' seeks this relief, by way of getting a
pardon on 'arth; as we never can know whether He
pardons
,
who is all in all, till judgment itself comes. It's
soothing to know that
any
pardon, at such times; and that,
I conclude, is the secret. Now, as for myself, I overlook
altogether your designs ag'in my life; first, because no
harm came of 'em; next, because it's your gifts, and natur',
and trainin', and I ought not to have trusted you at all; and,
finally and chiefly, because I can bear no ill-will to a dying
man, whether heathen or Christian. So put your heart at
ease, so far as I'm consarned; you know best what other
matters ought to trouble you, or what ought to give you
satisfaction, in so trying a moment.
It is probable that the Indian had some of the fearful
glimpses of the unknown state of being which God, in mercy,
seems, at times, to afford to all the human race; but they
were necessarily in conformity with his habits and
prejudices
.
Like most of his people, and like too many of our
own, he thought more of dying in a way to gain applause
among those he left, than to secure a better state of
existence
,
hereafter. While Deerslayer was speaking, his mind
was a little bewildered, though he felt that the intention was
good; and when he had done, a regret passed over his spirit
that none of his own tribe were present to witness his
stoicism
,
under extreme bodily suffering, and the firmness with
which he met his end. With the high, innate courtesy that
so often distinguishes the Indian warrior, before he becomes
corrupted by too much intercourse with the worst class of
the white men, he endeavoured to express his thankfulness
for the other's good intentions, and to let him understand that
they were appreciated.
Good! he repeated, for this was an English word much
used by the savagesgoodyoung head; young
heart,
too.
Old
heart tough; no shed tear. Hear Indian when
he die, and no want to liewhat he call him?
Deerslayer is the name I bear now, though the
Delawares
have said that when I get back from this war-path, I
shall have a more manly title, provided I can 'arn one.
That good name for boypoor name for warrior. He
get better quick. No fear
there
the savage had strength
sufficient, under the strong excitement he felt, to raise a
hand and tap the young man on his breasteye sartain
finger lighteningaim, deathgreat warrior, soon. No
DeerslayerHawkeyeHawkeyeHawkeye. Shake
hand.
Deerslayeror Hawkeye, as the youth was then first
named, for in after years he bore the appellation throughout
all that regionDeerslayer took the hand of the savage,
whose last breath was drawn in that attitude, gazing in
admiration
at the countenance of a stranger, who had shown
so much readiness, skill and firmness, in a scene that was
equally trying and novel. When the reader remembers it
is the highest gratification an Indian can receive to see his
enemy betray weakness, he will be better able to appreciate
the conduct which had extorted so great a concession, at
such a moment.
His spirit has fled! said Deerslayer, in a suppressed,
melancholy voice. Ah's me!Well, to this we must all
come, sooner or later; and he is happiest, let his skin be of
what colour it may, who is best fitted to meet it. Here lies
the body of, no doubt, a brave warrior, and the soul is
already
flying towards its heaven, or hell, whether that be a
happy hunting-ground, a place scant of game; regions of
glory, according to Moravian doctrine, or flames of fire!
So it happens, too, as regards other matters! Here have
old Hutter and Hurry Harry got themselves into difficulty,
if they havn't got themselves into torment and death, and
all for a bounty that luck offers to me in what many would
think a lawful and suitable manner. But not a farthing of
such money shall cross my hand. White I was born, and
white will I die; clinging to colour to the last, even though
the King's Majesty, his governors, and all his councils, both
at home and in the Colonies, forget from what they come,
and where they hope to go, and all for a little advantage in
warfare. No, nowarrior; hand of mine shall never
molest
your scalp, and so your soul may rest in peace on the
Vol. I.11
p'int of making a decent appearance, when the body comes
to join it, in your own land of spirits.
Deerslayer arose as soon as he had spoken. Then he
placed the body of the dead man in a sitting posture, with
its back against the little rock, taking the necessary care to
prevent it from falling, or in any way settling into an
attitude
that might be thought unseemly by the sensitive, though
wild notions of a savage. When this duty was performed,
the young man stood gazing at the grim countenance of his
fallen foe, in a sort of melancholy abstraction. As was his
practice, however, a habit gained by living so much alone
in the forest, he then began again to give utterance to his
thoughts and feelings aloud.
I didn't wish your life, red-skin, he said, but you left
me no choice atween killing, or being killed. Each party
acted according to his gifts, I suppose, and blame can light
on neither. You were treacherous, according to your natur'
in war, and I was a little oversightful, as I'm apt to be in
trusting others. Well, this is my first battle with a human
mortal, though it's not likely to be the last. I have fou't
most of the creatur's of the forest, such as bears, wolves,
painters and catamounts, but this is the beginning with the
red-skins. If I was Indian born, now, I might tell of this,
or carry in the scalp, and boast of the expl'ite afore the
whole tribe; or, if my inimy had only been even a bear,
't would have been nat'ral and proper to let every body know
what had happened; but I don't well see how I'm to let even
Chingachgook into this secret, so long as it can be done
only by boasting with a white tongue. And why should I
wish to boast of it, after all? It's slaying a human,
although
he was a savage; and how do I know that he was a
just Indian; and that he has not been taken away suddenly,
to any thing but happy hunting-grounds. When it's
onsartain
whether good or evil has been done, the wisest way
is not to be boastfulstill, I
should
like Chingachgook to
know that I haven't discredited the Delawares, or my
training
!
Part of this was uttered aloud, while part was merely
muttered between the speaker's teeth; his more confident
opinions enjoying the first advantage, while his doubts were
expressed in the latter mode. Soliloquy and reflection
received
a startling interruption, however, by the sudden
appearance
of a second Indian on the lake shore, a few
hundred
yards from the point. This man, evidently another
scout, who had probably been drawn to the place by the
reports of the rifles, broke out of the forest with so little
caution, that Deerslayer caught a view of his person before
he was himself discovered. When the latter event die
occur, as was the case a moment later, the savage gave a
loud yell, which was answered by a dozen voices from
different
parts of the mountain-side. There was no longer
any time for delay, and, in another minute the boat was
quitting the shore under long and steady sweeps of the
paddle
.
As soon as Deerslayer believed himself to be at a safe
distance, he ceased his efforts, permitting the little bark to
drift, while he leisurely took a survey of the state of things.
The canoe first sent adrift was floating before the air, quite
a quarter of a mile above him, and a little nearer to the
shore than he wished, now that he knew more of the savages
were near at hand. The canoe shoved from the point was
within a few yards of him, he having directed his own course
towards it, on quitting the land. The dead Indian lay in
grim quiet where he had left him, the warrior who had
shown himself from the forest had already vanished, and
the woods themselves were as silent, and seemingly as
deserted
,
as the day they came fresh from the hands of their
great Creator. This profound stillness, however, lasted but
a moment. When time had been given to the scouts of the
enemy to reconnoitre, they burst out of the thicket upon the
naked point, filling the air with yells of fury, at discovering
the death of their companion. These cries were
immediately
succeeded by shouts of delight, when they reached the
body, and clustered eagerly around it. Deerslayer was a
sufficient adept in the usages of the natives, to understand
the reason of the change. The yell was the customary
lamentation at the loss of a warrior, the shout a sign of
rejoicing
that the conqueror had not been able to secure the
scalp; the trophy, without which a victory was never
considered
complete. The distance at which the canoes lay,
probably prevented any attempts to injure the conqueror,
the American Indian, like the panther of his own woods,
seldom making any effort against his foe, unless tolerably
certain it is under circumstances that may be expected to
prove effective.
As the young man had no longer any motive to remain
near the point, he prepared to collect his canoes, in order to
tow them off to the castle. That nearest was soon in tow,
when he proceeded in quest of the other, which was, all this
time, floating up the lake. The eye of Deerslayer was no
sooner fastened on this last boat, than it struck him that it was
nearer to the shore than it would have been, had it merely
followed the course of the gentle current of air. He began
to suspect the influence of some unseen current in the water,
and he quickened his exertions, in order to regain possession
of it before it could drift in to a dangerous proximity to the
woods. On getting nearer, he thought that the canoe had
a perceptible motion through the water, and, as it lay
broadside
to the air, that this motion was taking it towards the
land. A few vigorous strokes of the paddle carried him still
nearer, when the mystery was explained. Something was
evidently in motion on the off-side of the canoe, or that
which was furthest from himself, and closer scrutiny showed
that it was a naked human arm. An Indian was lying in
the bottom of the canoe, and was propelling it slowly, but
certainly, to the shore, using his hand as a paddle.
Deerslayer
understood the whole artifice at a glance. A savage
had swum off to the boat while he was occupied with his
enemy on the point, got possession, and was using these
means to urge it to the shore.
Satisfied that the man in the canoe could have no arms,
Deerslayer did not hesitate to dash close alongside of the
retiring boat, without deeming it necessary to raise his own
rifle. As soon as the wash of the water, which he made in
approaching, became audible to the prostrate savage, the
latter sprang to his feet, and uttered an exclamation that
proved how completely he was taken by surprise.
If you 've enj'yed yourself enough in that canoe,
red-skin
,
Deerslayer coolly observed, stopping his own career
in sufficient time to prevent an absolute collision between the
two boatsif you 've enj'yed yourself enough in that
canoe, you 'll do a prudent act by taking to the lake ag'in.
I 'm reasonable in these matters, and don't crave your blood,
though there's them about that would look upon you more
as a due-bill for the bounty, than a human mortal. Take
to the lake, this minute, afore we get to hot words.
The savage was one of those who did not understand a
word of English, and he was indebted to the gestures of
Deerslayer, and to the expression of an eye that did not
often deceive, for an imperfect comprehension of his
meaning
.
Perhaps, too, the sight of the rifle that lay so near the
hand of the white man quickened his decision. At all events,
he crouched like a tiger about to take his leap, uttered a
yell, and the next instant his naked body had disappeared
in the water. When he rose to take breath, it was at the
distance of several yards from the canoe, and the hasty
glance he threw behind him, denoted how much he feared
the arrival of a fatal messenger from the rifle of his foe.
But the young man made no indication of any hostile
intention
.
Deliberately securing the canoe to the others, he began
to paddle from the shore; and by the time the Indian reached
the land, and had shaken himself, like a spaniel on quitting
the water, his dreaded enemy was already beyond rifle-shot,
on his way to the castle. As was so much his practice,
Deerslayer did not fail to soliloquize on what had just
occurred
while steadily pursuing his course towards the point
of destination.
Well, wellhe commenced't would have been
wrong to kill a human mortal without an object. Scalps
are of no account with me, and life is sweet, and ought not
to be taken marcilessly, by them that have white gifts. The
savage was a Mingo, it's true; and I make no doubt he is,
and will be, as long as he lives, a ra'al riptyle and
vagabond
;
but that's no reason I should forget my gifts and
colour
.
No, nolet him go; if ever we meet ag'in, rifle
in hand, why then 't will be seen which has the stoutest heart
and the quickest eye.Hawkeye! That's not a bad name
for a warrior, sounding much more manful and valiant than
Deerslayer! 'T wouldn't be a bad title to begin with, and
it has been fairly 'arned. If 't was Chingachgook, now, he
might go home and boast of his deeds, and the chiefs would
name him Hawkeye, in a minute; but it don't become white
blood to brag, and 't isn't easy to see how the matter can be
known, unless I do. Well, wellevery thing is in the
11*
hands of Providence; this affair as well as another; I'll
trust to that for getting my desarts in all things.
Having thus betrayed what might be termed his weak
spot, the young man continued to paddle in silence, making
his way diligently, and as fast as his tows would allow him,
towards the castle. By this time the sun had not only risen,
but it had appeared over the eastern mountains, and was
shedding a flood of glorious light on this, as yet,
unchristened
sheet of water. The whole scene was radiant with
beauty; and no one unaccustomed to the ordinary history
of the woods, would fancy it had so lately witnessed
incidents
so ruthless and barbarous. As he approached the
building of old Hutter, Deerslayer thought, or rather
felt,
that its appearance was in singular harmony with all the
rest of the scene. Although nothing had been consulted but
strength and security, the rude massive logs, covered with
their rough bark, the projecting roof, and the form, would
contribute to render the building picturesque in almost any
situation, while its actual position added novelty and
piquancy
to its other points of interest.
When Deerslayer drew nearer to the castle, however,
objects of interest presented themselves, that at once eclipsed
any beauties that might have distinguished the scenery of the
lake, and the site of the singular edifice. Judith and Hetty
stood on the platform, before the door, Hurry's door-yard,
awaiting his approach with manifest anxiety; the former,
from time to time, taking a survey of his person and of the
canoes, through the old ship's spy-glass that has been
already
mentioned. Never probably did this girl seem more
brilliantly beautiful than at that moment; the flush of
anxiety
and alarm increasing her colour to its richest tints,
while the softness of her eyes, a charm that even poor Hetty
shared with her, was deepened by intense concern. Such,
at least, without pausing, or pretending to analyze motives,
or to draw any other very nice distinctions between cause
and effect, were the opinions of the young man as his canoes
reached the side of the ark, where he carefully fastened all
three, before he put his foot on the platform.
CHAPTER VIII.
His words are bonds, his oaths are oracles;
His love sincere, his thoughts immaculate;
His tears pure messengers sent from his heart;
His heart as far from fraud, as heaven from earth.
Shakspeare
.
Neither
of the girls spoke, as Deerslayer stood before
them alone, his countenance betraying all the apprehension
he felt on account of the two absent members of their party.
Father! Judith at length exclaimed, succeeding in
uttering
the word, as it might be, by a desperate effort.
He's met with misfortune, and there's no use in
concealing
it, answered Deerslayer, in his direct and
simple-minded
manner. He and Hurry are in Mingo hands, and
Heaven only knows what's to be the tarmination. I've got
the canoes safe, and that's a consolation, since the
vagabonds
will have to swim for it, or raft off, to come near this
place. At sunset we'll be reinforced by Chingachgook, if
I can manage to get him into a canoe; and then, I think,
we two can answer for the ark and the castle, 'till some of
the officers in the garrisons hear of this war-path, which
sooner or later must be the case, when we may look for
succour from that quarter, if from no other.
The officers! exclaimed Judith, impatiently, her colour
deepening, and her eye expressing a lively but passing
emotion
.
Who thinks or speaks of the heartless gallants,
now?We are sufficient of ourselves to defend the castle;
but what of my father, and of poor Hurry Harry?
'Tis natural you should feel this consarn for your own
parent, Judith, and I suppose it's equally so that you should
feel it for Hurry Harry, too.
Deerslayer then commenced a succinct but clear
narrative
of all that occurred during the night, in no manner
concealing
what had befallen his two companions, or his own
opinion of what might prove to be the consequences. The
girls listened with profound attention, but neither betrayed
that feminine apprehension and concern, which would have
followed such a communication when made to those who
were less accustomed to the hazards and accidents of a
frontier
life. To the surprise of Deerslayer, Judith seemed the
most distressed, Hetty listening eagerly, but appearing to
brood over the facts in melancholy silence, rather than
betraying
any outward signs of feeling. The former's
agitation
,
the young man did not fail to attribute to the interest
she felt in Hurry, quite as much as to her filial love, while
Hetty's apparent indifference was ascribed to that mental
darkness which, in a measure, obscured her intellect, and
which possibly prevented her from foreseeing all the
consequences
.
Little was said, however, by either, Judith and
her sister busying themselves in making the preparations
for the morning meal, as they who habitually attend to such
matters, toil on mechanically even in the midst of suffering
and sorrow. The plain but nutritious breakfast was taken
by all three, in sombre silence. The girls ate little, but
Deerslayer gave proof of possessing one material requisite
of a good soldier, that of preserving his appetite in the midst
of the most alarming and embarrassing circumstances. The
meal was nearly ended before a syllable was uttered; then,
however, Judith spoke in the convulsive and hurried manner
in which feeling breaks through restraint, after the latter
has become more painful than even the betrayal of emotion.
Father would have relished this fish! she exclaimed;
he says the salmon of the lakes is almost as good as the
salmon of the sea.
Your father has been acquainted with the sea, they tell
me, Judith, returned the young man, who could not forbear
throwing a glance of inquiry at the girl; for, in common
with all who knew Hutter he had some curiosity on the
subject of his early history. Hurry Harry tells he was
once a sailor.
Judith first looked perplexed; then, influenced by feelings
that were novel to her, in more ways than one, she became
suddenly communicative, and seemingly much interested in
the discourse.
If Hurry knows any thing of father's history, I would
he had told it to me! she cried. Sometimes I think, too,
he was once a sailor, and then again I think he was not. If
that chest were open, or if it could speak, it might let us into
his whole history. But its fastenings are too strong to be
broken like pack-thread.
Deerslayer turned to the chest in question, and for the
first time examined it closely. Although discoloured, and
bearing proofs of having received much ill-treatment, he
saw that it was of materials and workmanship altogether
superior to any thing of the same sort he had ever before
beheld. The wood was dark, rich, and had once been
highly polished, though the treatment it had received left
little gloss on its surface, and various scratches and
indentations
proved the rough collisions that it had encountered with
substances still harder than itself. The corners were firmly
bound with steel, elaborately and richly wrought, while the
locks, of which it had no less than three, and the hinges,
were of a fashion and workmanship that would have
attracted
attention even in a warehouse of curious furniture.
The chest was large too; and when Deerslayer arose, and
endeavoured to raise an end by its massive handle, he found
that the weight fully corresponded with the external
appearance
.
Did you never see that chest opened, Judith, the young
man demanded with frontier freedom, for delicacy on such
subjects was little felt among the people on the verge of
civilization, in that age, even if it be to-day.
Never. Father has never opened it in my presence, if
he ever opens it at all. No one here has ever seen its lid
raised, unless it be father; nor do I even know that he has
ever seen it.
Now, you're wrong, Judith, Hetty quietly answered.
Father
has
raised the lid, and
I've
seen him do it.
A feeling of manliness kept the mouth of Deerslayer shut;
for, while he would not have hesitated about going far
beyond
what would be thought the bounds of propriety, in
questioning the elder sister, he had just scruples about taking
what might be thought an advantage of the feeble intellect
of the younger. Judith, being under no such restraint,
however
,
turned quickly to the last speaker, and continued the
discourse.
When and where did you ever see that chest opened,
Hetty?
Here, and, again and again. Father often opens it,
when
you
are away, though he don't in the least mind my
being by, and seeing all he does, as well as hearing all he
says.
And what is it that he does, and what does he say?
That I cannot tell
you,
Judith, returned the other, in
a low, but resolute voice.
Father's
secrets are not
my
secrets.
Secrets! This is stranger still, Deerslayer; that father
should tell them to Hetty, and not tell them to me!
There's good reason for that, Judith, though you're
not to know it. Father's not here to answer for himself,
and I'll say no more about it.
Judith and Deerslayer looked surprised, and, for a minute,
the first seemed pained. But, suddenly recollecting
herself
,
she turned away from her sister, as if in pity for her
weakness, and addressed the young man.
You've told but half your story, she said,
breaking
off at the place where you went to sleep in the canoe
or, rather, where you rose to listen to the cry of the loon.
We heard the call of the loons, too, and thought their cries
might bring a storm, though we are little used to tempests
on this lake, at this season of the year.
The winds blow, and the tempests howl as God pleases;
sometimes at one season, and sometimes at another,
answered
Deerslayer; and the loons speak accordin' to their
natur'. Better would it be, if men were as honest and
frank. After I rose to listen to the birds, finding it could
not be Hurry's signal, I lay down and slept. When the
day dawned I was up and stirring as usual, and then I went
in chase of the two canoes, lest the Mingos should lay hands
on 'em.
You have not told us all, Deerslayer, said Judith,
earnestly. We heard rifles, under the eastern mountain;
the echoes were full and long, and came so soon after the
reports, that the pieces must have been fired on, or quite
near to the shore. Our ears are used to these signs, and
are not to be deceived.
They've done their duty, gal, this time; yes, they've
done their duty. Rifles have been sighted this morning,
ay, and triggers pulled, too, though not as often as they
might have been. One warrior has gone to his happy
hunting-grounds
,
and that's the whole of it. A man of white
blood, and white gifts, is not to be expected to boast of his
expl'ites, and to flourish scalps.
Judith listened almost breathlessly; and, when
Deerslayer
,
in his quiet, modest manner, seemed disposed to quit the
subject, she rose, and, crossing the room, took a seat by his
side. The manner of the girl had nothing forward about
it, though it betrayed the quick instinct of female affection,
and the sympathizing kindness of a woman's interest. She
even took the hard hand of the hunter, and pressed it in
both her own, unconsciously to herself, perhaps, while she
looked earnestly and even reproachfully into his sun-burned
face.
You have been fighting the savages, Deerslayer, singly
and by yourself! she said. In your wish to take care
of usof Hettyof me, perhapsyou've fought the
enemy
bravely, with no eye to encourage your deeds, or to
witness your fall, had it pleased Providence to suffer so
great a calamity!
I've fou't, Judith; yes I
have
fou't the inimy, and that,
too, for the first time in my life. These things must be,
and they bring with 'em a mixed feelin' of sorrow and
triumph
.
Human natur' is a fightin' natur', I suppose, as all
nations kill in battle, and we must be true to our rights and
gifts. What has yet been done is no great matter, but,
should Chingachgook come to the rock this evening, as is
agreed atween us, and I get him off it, onbeknown to the
savages, or, if known to them, ag'in their wishes and
designs
,
then may we all look to something like warfare, afore
the Mingos shall get possession of either the castle, or the
ark, or yourselves.
Who is this Chingachgook; from what place does he
come, and
why
does he come
here?
The questions are nat'ral, and right, I suppose, though
the youth has a great name, already, in his own part of the
country. Chingachgook is a Mohican by blood, consorting
with the Delawares by usage, as is the case with most of
his tribe; which has long been broken up by the increase
of our colour. He is of the family of the great chiefs,
Uncas, his father, having been the considerablest warrior
and counsellor of his people. Even old Tamenund honours
Chingachgook, though he is thought to be yet too young to
lead in war; and then the nation is so disparsed and
diminished
,
that chieftainship among 'em has got to be little more
than a name. Well, this war having commenced in 'arnest,
the Delaware and I rendezvous'd an app'intment to meet
this evening, at sunset, on the rendezvous-rock, at the foot
of this very lake, intending to come out on our first hostile
expedition ag'in the Mingos.
Why
we come exactly
this-a-way
,
is our own secret; but thoughtful young men, on a
war-path, as you may suppose, do nothing without a
calculation
,
and a design.
A Delaware can have no unfriendly intentions towards
us, said Judith, after a moment's hesitation, and we know
you to be friendly.
Treachery is the last crime I hope to be accused of,
returned Deerslayer, hurt at the gleam of distrust that had
shot through Judith's mind; and, least of all, treachery
to my own colour.
No one suspects
you,
Deerslayer, the girl impetuously
cried. Nonoyour honest countenance would be a
sufficient surety for the truth of a thousand hearts! If all
men had as honest tongues, and no more promised what
they did not mean to perform, there would be less wrong
done in the world, and fine feathers and scarlet cloaks would
not be thought excuses for baseness and deception.
The girl spoke with strong, nay, even with convulsed
feeling, and her fine eyes, usually so soft and alluring,
flashed fire as she concluded. Deerslayer could not but
observe this extraordinary emotion; but, with the tact of a
courtier, he avoided not only any allusion to the
circumstance
,
but succeeded in concealing the effect of his
discovery
on himself. Judith gradually grew calm again, and,
as she was obviously anxious to appear to advantage in the
eyes of the young man, she was soon able to renew the
conversation as composedly as if nothing had occurred to
disturb her.
I have no right to look into your secrets, or the secrets
of your friend, Deerslayer, she continued, and am ready
to take all you say on trust. If we can really get another
male ally to join us, at this trying moment, it will aid us
much; and I am not without hope that when the savages
find we are able to keep the lake, they will offer to give up
their prisoners in exchange for skins, or, at least for the
keg of powder that we have in the house.
The young man had the words scalps, and bounty,
on his lips, but a reluctance to alarm the feelings of the
daughters, prevented him from making the allusion he had
intended to the probable fate of their father. Still, so little
was he practised in the arts of deception, that his
expressive
countenance was, of itself, understood by the
quick-witted
Judith, whose intelligence had been sharpened by the
risks and habits of her life.
I understand what you mean, she continued, hurriedly,
and what you would say, but for the fear of hurting me
us,
I mean; for Hetty loves her father quite as well as I
do. But this is not as we think of Indians. They never
scalp an unhurt prisoner, but would rather take him away
alive; unless, indeed, the fierce wish for torturing should get
the mastery of them. I fear nothing for my father's scalp,
and little for his life. Could they steal on us, in the night,
we should all probably suffer in this way; but men taken in
open strife, are seldom injured; not, at least, until the time
of torture comes.
That's tradition, I'll allow, and it's according to
practice
but,
Judith, do you know the 'ar'nd on which your
father and Hutter went ag'in the savages?
I do; and a cruel errand it was! But what will you
have? Men will be men, and some even that flaunt in their
gold and silver, and carry the king's commission in their
pockets, are not guiltless of equal cruelty. Judith's eye
again flashed, but, by a desperate struggle, she resumed her
composure. I get warm, when I think of all the wrong
that men do, she added, affecting to smile, an effort in
which she only succeeded indifferently well. All this is
silly. What is done, is done, and it cannot be mended by
complaints. But the Indians think so little of the shedding
of blood, and value men so much for the boldness of their
undertakings, that, did they know the business on which
their prisoners came, they would be more likely to honour,
than to injure them for it.
For a time, Judith; yes, I allow
that,
for a time. But,
Vol. I.12
when that feelin' dies away, then will come the love of
revenge
.
We must indivour, Chingachgook and I, we must
indivour to see what we can do to get Hurry and your father
free; for the Mingos will, no doubt, hover about this lake
some days, in order to make the most of their success.
You think this Delaware can be depended on,
Deerslayer
?
demanded the girl, thoughtfully.
As much as I can myself. You say you do not
suspect
me,
Judith?
You!
taking his hand again, and pressing it between
her own with a warmth that might have awakened the
vanity of one less simple-minded, and more disposed to
dwell on his own good qualities, I would as soon suspect
a brother! I have known you but a day, Deerslayer, but
it has awakened the confidence of a year. Your name,
however, is not unknown to me; for the gallants of the
garrisons
frequently speak of the lessons you have given them
in hunting, and all proclaim your honesty.
Do they ever talk of the shooting, gal? inquired the
other eagerly, after, however, laughing in a silent but
heart-felt
manner. Do they ever talk of the shooting? I want
to hear nothing about my own, for, if that isn't sartified to,
by this time, in all these parts, there's little use in being
skilful and sure; but what do the officers say of their own
yes, what do they say of their own! Arms, as they call
it, is their trade, and yet there's some among 'em that know
very little how to use 'em!
Such, I hope, will not be the case with your friend
Chingachgook, as you call himwhat is the English of his
Indian name?
Big Sarpentso called for his wisdom and cunning.
Uncas is his ra'al nameall his family being called Uncas,
until they get a title that has been 'arned by deeds.
If he has all this wisdom, we may expect a useful friend
in him, unless his own business in this part of the country
should prevent him from serving us.
I see no great harm in telling you his ar'n'd, after all,
and, as you may find means to help us, I will let you and
Hetty into the whole matter, trusting that you'll keep the
secret as if it was your own. You must know that
Chingachgook
is a comely Indian, and is much look'd upon and
admired by the young women of his tribe, both on account
of his family, and on account of himself. Now, there is a
chief that has a daughter called Wah-ta!-Wah, which is
intarpreted
into Hist-oh!-Hist, in the English tongue, the rarest
gal among the Delawares, and the one most sought after
and craved for a wife, by all the young warriors of the
nation
.
Well, Chingachgook, among others, took a fancy to
Wah-ta!-Wah, and Wah-ta!-Wah took a fancy to him.
Here Deerslayer paused an instant; for, as he got thus far
in his tale, Hetty Hutter arose, approached and stood
attentive
at his knee, as a child draws near to listen to the legends
of its mother. Yes, he fancied her, and she fancied him,
resumed Deerslayer, after casting a friendly and approving
glance at the innocent and interested girl; and when that
is the case, and all the elders are agreed, it does not often
happen that the young couple keep apart. Chingachgook
could'n't well carry off such a prize without making inimies
among them that wanted her as much as he did himself. A
sartain Briarthorn, as we call him in English, or Yocommon,
as he is tarmed in Indian, took it most to heart, and we
mistrust
him of having a hand in all that followed. Wah-
ta!Wah
went with her father and mother, two moons ago, to
fish for salmon, on the western streams, where, it is agreed
by all in these parts, that fish most abounds, and while thus
empl'y'd the gal vanished. For several weeks we could
get no tidings of her; but, here, ten days since, a runner
that came through the Delaware country, brought us a
message
,
by which we l'arn that Wah-ta!-Wah was stolen from
her peoplewe think, but do not know it, by Briarthorn's
sarcumventions,and that she was now with the inimy,
who had adopted her, and wanted her to marry a young
Mingo. The message said that the party intended to hunt
and forage through this region, for a month or two, afore it
went back into the Canadas, and that if we could contrive
to get on a scent in this quarter, something might turn up
that would lead to our getting the maiden off.
And how does that concern
you,
Deerslayer? demanded
Judith, a little anxiously.
It consarns me, as all things that touches a fri'nd
consarns
a fri'nd. I'm here as Chingachgook's aid and helper,
and if we can get the young maiden he likes back ag'in, it
will give me almost as much pleasure as if I had got back
my own sweetheart.
And where, then, is
your
sweetheart, Deerslayer?
She 's in the forest, Judithhanging from the boughs
of the trees, in a soft rainin the dew on the open grass
the clouds that float about in the blue heavensthe birds
that sing in the woodsthe sweet springs where I slake my
thirstand in all the other glorious gifts that come from
God's Providence!
You mean that, as yet, you've never loved one of my
sex, but love best your haunts, and your own manner of
life.
That's itthat's just it. I am whitehave a white
heart, and can't, in reason, love a red-skinned maiden, who
must have a red-skin heart and feelin's. No, no, I 'm
sound enough in them particulars, and hope to remain so,
at least till this war is over. I find my time too much
taken up with Chingachgook's affair, to wish to have one of
my own on my hands afore that is settled.
The girl that finally wins you, Deerslayer, will at least
win an
honest
heart; one without treachery or guile; and
that will be a victory, that most of her sex ought to envy.
As Judith uttered this, her beautiful face had a resentful
frown on it; while a bitter smile lingered around a mouth that
no derangement of the muscles could render any thing but
handsome. Her companion observed the change, and,
though little skilled in the workings of the female heart, he
had sufficient native delicacy to understand that it might be
well to drop the subject.
As the hour when Chingachgook was expected, still
remained
distant, Deerslayer had time enough to examine into
the state of the defences, and to make such additional
arrangements
as were in his power, and the exigency of the
moment seemed to require. The experience and foresight
of Hutter had left little to be done in these particulars; still
several precautions suggested themselves to the young man,
who may be said to have studied the art of frontier warfare,
through the traditions and legends of the people among whom
he had so long lived. The distance between the castle and
the nearest point on the shore, prevented any apprehension
on the subject of rifle-bullets thrown from the land. The
house was within musket-shot, in one sense, it was true, but
aim was entirely out of the question, and even Judith
professed
a perfect disregard of any danger from that source.
So long, then, as the party remained in possession of the
fortress, they were safe; unless their assailants could find
the means to come off and carry it by fire or storm; or, by
some of the devices of Indian cunning and Indian treachery.
Against the first source of danger, Hutter had made ample
provision, and the building itself, the bark roof excepted,
was not very combustible. The floor was scuttled in several
places, and buckets provided with ropes, were in daily use,
in readiness for any such emergency. One of the girls could
easily extinguish any fire that might be lighted, provided it
had not time to make much headway. Judith, who appeared
to understand all her father's schemes of defence, and who
had the spirit to take no unimportant share in the execution
of them, explained all these details to the young man, who
was thus saved much time and labour in making his
investigations
.
Little was to be apprehended during the day. In
possession
of the canoes and of the ark, no other vessel was to be
found on the lake. Nevertheless, Deerslayer well knew
that a raft was soon made, and as dead trees were to be
found in abundance near the water, did the savages
seriously
contemplate the risks of an assault, it would not be a
very difficult matter to find the necessary means. The
celebrated
American axe, a tool that is quite unrivalled in its
way, was then not very extensively known, and the savages
were far from expert in the use of its hatchet-like substitute;
still, they had sufficient practive in crossing streams by this
mode to render it certain they would construct a raft, should
they deem it expedient to expose themselves to the risks of
an assault. The death of their warrior might prove a
sufficient
incentive, or it might act as a caution; but Deerslayer
thought it more than possible that the succeeding night would
bring matters to a crisis, and in this precise way. This
impression
caused him to wish ardently for the presence and
succour of his Mohican friend, and to look forward to the
approach of sunset with an increasing anxiety.
As the day advanced, the party in the castle matured
their plans, and made their preparations. Judith was active,
12*
and seemed to find a pleasure in consulting and advising
with her new acquaintance, whose indifference to danger,
manly devotion to herself and sister, guilelessness of manner,
and truth of feeling, had won rapidly on both her
imagination
and her affections. Although the hours appeared long in
some respects to Deerslayer, Judith did not find them so, and
when the sun began to descend towards the pine-clad
summits
of the western hills, she felt and expressed her surprise
that the day should so soon be drawing to a close. On the
other hand, Hetty was moody and silent. She was never
loquacious, or if she occasionally became communicative, it
was under the influence of some temporary excitement, that
served to arouse her unsophisticated mind; but, for hours
at a time, in the course of this all-important day, she seemed
to have absolutely lost the use of her tongue. Nor did
apprehension
on account of her father, materially affect the
manner
of either sister. Neither appeared seriously to dread
any evil greater than captivity, and once or twice, when
Hetty did speak, she intimated the expectation that Hutter
would find the means to liberate himself. Although Judith
was less sanguine on this head, she too betrayed the hope
that propositions for a ransom would come, when the
Indians
discovered that the castle set their expedients and
artifices
at defiance. Deerslayer, however, treated these passing
suggestions as the ill-digested fancies of girls, making his
own arrangements as steadily, and brooding over the future
as seriously, as if they had never fallen from their lips.
At length the hour arrived when it became necessary to
proceed to the place of rendezvous appointed with the
Mohican
;
or Delaware, as Chingachgook was more commonly
called. As the plan had been matured by Deerslayer, and
fully communicated to his companions, all three set about
its execution, in concert, and intelligently. Hetty passed
into the ark, and fastening two of the canoes together, she
entered one, and paddled up to a sort of gate-way in the
palisadoes that surrounded the building, through which she
carried both; securing them beneath the house by chains
that were fastened within the building. These palisadoes
were trunks of trees driven firmly into the mud, and served
the double purpose of a small enclosure, that was intended
to be used in this very manner, and to keep any enemy that
might approach in boats at arm's-length. Canoes thus
docked
were, in a measure, hid from sight, and as the gate
was properly barred and fastened, it would not be an easy
task to remove them, even in the event of their being seen.
Previously, however, to closing the gate, Judith also entered
within the enclosure with the third canoe, leaving Deerslayer
busy in securing the door and windows inside the building,
over her head. As every thing was massive and strong,
and small saplings were used as bars, it would have been
the work of an hour or two to break into the building, when
Deerslayer had ended his task, even allowing the assailants
the use of any tools but the axe, and to be unresisted. This
attention to security arose from Hutter's having been robbed
once or twice, by the lawless whites of the frontiers, during
some of his many absences from home.
As soon as all was fast in the inside of the dwelling,
Deerslayer
appeared at a trap, from which he descended into the
canoe of Judith. When this was done, he fastened the door
with a massive staple and stout padlock. Hetty was then
received in the canoe, which was shoved outside of the
palisadoes
.
The next precaution was to fasten the gate, and
the keys were carried into the ark. The three were now
fastened out of the dwelling, which could only be entered by
violence, or by following the course taken by the young man
in quitting it.
The glass had been brought outside as a preliminary step,
and Deerslayer next took a careful survey of the entire
shore of the lake, as far as his own position would allow.
Not a living thing was visible, a few birds excepted, and
even the last fluttered about in the shades of the trees, as if
unwilling to encounter the heat of a sultry afternoon. All
the nearest points, in particular, were subjected to severe
scrutiny, in order to make certain that no raft was in
preparation
;
the result everywhere giving the same picture of
calm solitude. A few words will explain the greatest
embarrassment
belonging to the situation of our party.
Exposed
themselves to the observation of any watchful eyes,
the movements of their enemies were concealed by the
drapery of a dense forest. While the imagination would be
very apt to people the latter with more warriors than it
really contained, their own weakness must be too
apparent
to all who might chance to cast a glance in their
direction.
Nothing is stirring, hows'ever, exclaimed Deerslayer,
as he finally lowered the glass, and prepared to enter the
ark: If the vagabonds do harbour mischief in their minds,
they are too cunning to let it be seen; it's true, a raft may be
in preparation in the woods, but it has not yet been brought
down to the lake. They can't guess that we are about to
quit the castle, and, if they did, they 've no means of
knowing
where we intend to go.
This is so true, Deerslayer, returned Judith, that now
all is ready, we may proceed, at once, boldly, and without
the fear of being followedelse we shall be behind our
time.
Nonothe matter needs managementfor, though
the savages are in the dark as to Chingachgook and the
rock, they 've eyes and legs, and will see in what direction
we steer, and will be sartain to follow us. I shall strive to
baffle 'em, hows'ever, by heading the scow in all manner of
ways, first in one quarter, and then in another, until they
get to be a-leg-weary, and tired of tramping after us.
So far as it was in his power, Deerslayer was as good as
his word. In less than five minutes after this speech was
made, the whole party was in the ark, and in motion. There
was a gentle breeze from the north; and boldly hoisting the
sail, the young man laid the head of the unwieldy craft in
such a direction as, after making a liberal but necessary
allowance
for lee-way, would have brought it ashore a couple of
miles down the lake, and on its eastern side. The sailing
of the ark was never very swift, though, floating as it did
on the surface, it was not difficult to get it in motion, or to
urge it along over the water, at the rate of some three or
four miles in the hour. The distance between the castle and
the rock was a little more than two leagues. Knowing the
punctuality of an Indian, Deerslayer had made his
calculations
closely, and had given himself a little more time than
was necessary to reach the place of rendezvous, with a view
to delay, or to press his arrival, as might prove most
expedient
.
When he hoisted the sail, the sun lay above the
western hills, at an elevation that promised rather more than
two hours of day; and a few minutes satisfied him that the
progress of the scow was such as to equal his expectations.
It was a glorious June afternoon, and never did that
solitary
sheet of water seem less like an arena of strife and
bloodshed. The light air scarce descended as low as the
bed of the lake, hovering over it, as if unwilling to disturb
its deep tranquillity, or to ruffle its mirror-like surface.
Even the forests appeared to be slumbering in the sun, and
a few piles of fleecy clouds had lain for hours along the
northern horizon, like fixtures in the atmosphere, placed
there purely to embellish the scene. A few aquatic fowls
occasionally skimmed along the water, and a single raven
was visible, sailing high above the trees, and keeping a
watchful eye on the forest beneath him, in order to detect
any thing having life that the mysterious woods might offer
as prey.
The reader will probably have observed, that, amidst the
frankness and abruptness of manner, which marked the
frontier
habits of Judith, her language was superior to that used
by her male companions, her own father included. This
difference extended as well to pronunciation, as to the choice
of words and phrases. Perhaps nothing so soon betrays
the education and association as the modes of speech; and
few accomplishments so much aid the charm of female
beauty as a graceful and even utterance, while nothing so
soon produces the disenchantment that necessarily follows a
discrepancy between appearance and manner, as a mean
intonation of voice, or a vulgar use of words. Judith and
her sister were marked exceptions to all the girls of their
class, along that whole frontier; the officers of the nearest
garrison having often flattered the former with the belief
that few ladies of the towns acquitted themselves better than
herself, in this important particular. This was far from
being literally true, but it was sufficiently near the fact to
give birth to the compliment. The girls were indebted to
their mother for this advantage, having acquired from her, in
childhood, an advantage that no subsequent study or labour
can give without a drawback, if neglected beyond the earlier
periods of life. Who that mother was, or, rather, had been,
no one but Hutter knew. She had now been dead two
summers, and, as was stated by Hurry, she had been
buried in the lake; whether in indulgence of a prejudice, or
from a reluctance to take the trouble to dig her grave, had
frequently been a matter of discussion between the rude
beings
of that region. Judith had never visited the spot, but
Hetty was present at the interment, and she often paddled a
canoe, about sunset, or by the light of the moon, to the place,
and gazed down into the limpid water, in the hope of being
able to catch a glimpse of a form that she had so tenderly
loved, from infancy to the sad hour of their parting.
Must we reach the rock exactly at the moment the sun
sets? Judith demanded of the young man, as they stood
near each other, Deerslayer holding the steering-oar, and
she working with a needle at some ornament of dress, that
much exceeded her station in life, and was altogether a
novelty in the woods. Will a few minutes, sooner or later,
alter the matter? it will be very hazardous to remain long
near the shore as that rock!
That 's it, Judith; that's the very difficulty! The
rock's within pi'nt blank for a shot-gun, and 't will never
do to hover about it too close and too long. When you
have to deal with an Indian, you must calculate and
manage
,
for a red natur' dearly likes sarcumvention. Now,
you see, Judith, that I do not steer towards the rock at all,
but here to the eastward of it, whereby the savages will be
tramping off in that direction, and get their legs awearied,
and all for no advantage.
You think, then, they see us, and watch our
movements
,
Deerslayer? I was in hopes they might have fallen
back into the woods, and left us to ourselves, for a few
hours.
That's altogether a woman's consati. There 's no
let-up in an Indian's watchfulness when he's on a
war-path
;
and eyes are on us at this minute, 'though the lake
presarves us. We must draw near the rock on a
calculation
,
and indivour to get the miscreants on a false scent.
The Mingos have good noses, they tell me; but a white
man's reason ought always to equalize their instinct.
Judith now entered into a desultory discourse with
Deerslayer
,
in which the girl betrayed her growing interest in the
young man; an interest that his simplicity of mind, and her
decision of character, sustained as it was by the
consciousness
awakened by the consideration her personal charms so
universally produced, rendered her less anxious to conceal
than might otherwise have been the case. She was scarcely
forward in her manner, though there was sometimes a
freedom
in her glances, that it required all the aid of her
exceeding
beauty to prevent from awakening suspicions
unfavourable
to her discretion, if not to her morals. With Deerslayer,
however, these glances were rendered less obnoxious to so
unpleasant a construction; for she seldom looked at him,
without discovering much of the sincerity and nature that
accompany the purest emotions of woman. It was a little
remarkable that, as his captivity lengthened, neither of the
girls manifested any great concern for her father; but, as
has been said already, their habits gave them confidence,
and they looked forward to his liberation, by means of a
ransom, with a confidence that might, in a great degree,
account for their apparent indifference. Once before,
Hutter
had been in the hands of the Iroquois, and a few skins
had readily effected his release. This event, however,
unknown
to the sisters, had occurred in a time of peace
between
England and France, and when the savages were
restrained, instead of being encouraged to commit their
excesses
,
by the policy of the different colonial governments.
While Judith was loquacious and caressing in her
manner
,
Hetty remained thoughtful and silent. Once, indeed,
she drew near to Deerslayer, and questioned him a little
closely as to his intentions, as well as concerning the mode
of effecting his purpose; but her wish to converse went no
farther. As soon as her simple queries were answered
and answered they all were, in the fullest and kindest
manner
she
withdrew to her seat, and continued to work on a
coarse garment that she was making for her father,
sometimes
humming a low melancholy air, and frequently
sighing
.
In this manner the time passed away; and when the sun
was beginning to glow behind the fringe of pines that
bounded
the western hill, or about twenty minutes before it
actually
set, the ark was nearly as low as the point where
Hutter
and Hurry had been made prisoners. By sheering first
to one side of the lake, and then to the other, Deerslayer
had managed to create an uncertainty as to his object; and,
doubtless, the savages, who were unquestionably watching
his movements, were led to believe that his aim was to
communicate
with them, at or near this spot, and would hasten
in that direction, in order to be in readiness to profit by
circumstances
.
This artifice was well managed; since the
sweep of the bay, the curvature of the lake, and the low
marshy land that intervened, would probably allow the ark
to reach the rock, before its pursuers, if really collected
near the point, could have time to make the circuit that
would be required to get there by land. With a view to aid
this deception, Deerslayer stood as near the western shore
as was at all prudent; and, then, causing Judith and Hetty
to enter the house, or cabin, and crouching himself so as to
conceal his person by the frame of the scow, he suddenly
threw the head of the letter round, and began to make the
best of his way towards the outlet. Favoured by an
increase
in the wind, the progress of the ark was such as to
promise the complete success of this plan, though the
crab-like
movement of the craft compelled the helmsman to
keep its head looking in a direction very different from that
in which it was actually moving.
CHAPTER IX.
Yet art thou prodigal of smiles
Smiles, sweeter than thy frowns are stern;
Earth sends from all her thousand isles,
A shout at thy return.
The glory that comes down from thee
Bathes, in deep joy, the land and sea.
The Skies
.
It
may assist the reader in understanding the events we
are about to record, if he has a rapidly sketched picture of
the scene, placed before his eyes at a single view. It will
be remembered that the lake was an irregularly shaped
basin, of an outline that, in the main, was oval, but with
bays and points to relieve its formality and ornament its
shores. The surface of this beautiful sheet of water was
now glittering like a gem, in the last rays of the evening
sun, and the setting of the wholehills clothed in the
richest
forest verdurewas lighted up with a sort of radiant
smile, that is best described in the beautiful lines we have
placed at the head of this chapter. As the banks, with few
exceptions, rose abruptly from the water, even where the
mountain did not immediately bound the view, there was a
nearly unbroken fringe of leaves overhanging the placid
lakethe trees starting out of the acclivities, inclining to
the light, until in many instances they extended their long
limbs and straight trunks some forty or fifty feet beyond the
line of the perpendicular. In these cases we allude only to
the giants of the forestpines of a hundred or a hundred
and fifty feet in heightfor, of the smaller growth, very
many inclined so far as to steep their lower branches in the
water.
In the position in which the ark had now got, the castle
was concealed from view by the projection of a point, as
indeed was the northern extremity of the lake itself. A
respectable mountain, forest-clad, and rounded like all the
rest, limited the view in that direction, stretching
immediately
across the whole of the fair scene, with the exception
of a deep bay that passed its western end, lengthening the
basin, for more than a mile. The manner in which the
water flowed out of the lake, beneath the leafy arches of
the trees that lined the sides of the stream, has already been
mentioned, and it has also been said that the rock, which
was a favourite place of rendezvous throughout all that
region, and where Deerslayer now expected to meet his
friend, stood near this outlet, and at no great distance from
the shore. It was a large isolated stone, that rested on the
bottom of the lake, apparently left there when the waters
tore away the earth from around it, in forcing for
themselves
a passage down the river, and which had obtained
its shape from the action of the elements, during the slow
progress of centuries. The height of this rock could
scarcely
equal six feet, and, as has been said, its shape was not
unlike that which is usually given to bee-hives, or to a
haycock
.
The latter, indeed, gives the best idea not only of its
form, but of its dimensions. It stood, and still stands, for
Vol. I.13
we are writing of real scenes, within fifty feet of the bank,
and in water that was only two feet in depth, though there
were seasons in which its rounded apex, if such a term can
properly be used, was covered by the lake. Many of the
trees stretched so far forward as almost to blend the rock
with the shore, when seen from a little distance; and one
tall pine in particular overhung it in a way to form a noble
and appropriate canopy to a seat that had held many a
forest chieftain, during the long succession of unknown
ages, in which America, and all it contained, had existed
apart, in mysterious solitude, a world by itself; equally
without a familiar history, and without an origin that the
annals of man can reach.
When distant some two or three hundred feet from the
shore, Deerslayer took in his sail, and he dropped his grapnel,
as soon as he found the ark had drifted in a line that was
directly to windward of the rock. The motion of the scow
was then checked, when it was brought head to wind, by
the action of the breeze. As soon as this was done,
Deerslayer
paid out line, and suffered the vessel to set down
upon the rock, as fast as the light air would force it to
leeward
.
Floating entirely on the surface, this was soon
effected, and the young man checked the drift when he was
told that the stern of the scow was within fifteen or eighteen
feet of the desired spot.
In executing this manuvre, Deerslayer had proceeded
promptly; for, while he did not in the least doubt that he
was both watched and followed by the foe, he believed he
had distracted their movements, by the apparent uncertainty
of his own, and he knew they could have no means of
ascertaining that the rock was his aim, unless, indeed, one
of the prisoners had betrayed him; a chance so
improbable
in itself, as to give him no concern. Notwithstanding
the celerity and decision of his movements, he did not,
however
,
venture so near the shore without taking due
precautions
to effect a retreat, in the event of its becoming
necessary
.
He held the line in his hand, and Judith was
stationed
at a loop, on the side of the cabin next the shore,
where she could watch the beach and the rocks, and give
timely notice of the approach of either friend or foe. Hetty
was also placed on watch, but it was to keep the trees
overhead
in view, lest some enemy might ascend one, and, by
completely commanding the interior of the scow, render the
defences of the hut, or cabin, useless.
The sun had disappeared from the lake and valley, when
Deerslayer checked the ark, in the manner mentioned. Still
it wanted a few minutes to the true sunset, and he knew
Indian punctuality too well to anticipate any unmanly haste
in his friend. The great question was, whether, surrounded
by enemies, as he was known to be, he had escaped their
toils. The occurrences of the last twenty-four hours must
be a secret to him, and, like himself, Chingachgook was yet
young on a war-path. It was true, he came prepared to
encounter
the party that withheld his promised bride, but he
had no means of ascertaining the extent of the danger he
ran, or the precise positions occupied by either friends or
foes. In a word, the trained sagacity, and untiring caution
of an Indian, were all he had to rely on, amid the critical
risks he unavoidably ran.
Is the rock empty, judith? inquired Deerslayer, as
soon as he had checked the drift of the ark, deeming it
imprudent
to venture unnecessarily near the shore. Is any
thing to be seen of the Delaware chief?
Nothing, Deerslayer. Neither rock, shore, tree, nor
lake, seems to have ever held a human form.
Keep close, Judithkeep close, Hettya rifle has a
prying eye, a nimble foot, and a desperate fatal tongue.
Keep close then, but keep up act
y
ve looks, and be on the
alart. 'T would grieve me to the heart, did any harm befal
either of you.
And
you,
Deerslayer! exclaimed Judith, turning her
handsome face from the loop, to bestow a gracious and
grateful look on the young man; do
you
`keep close,' and
have a proper care that the savages do not catch a glimpse
of you! A bullet might be as fatal to
you,
as to one of us;
and the blow that you felt, would be felt by all.
No fear of me, Judithno fear of me, my good gal.
Do not look this-a-way, although you look so pleasant and
comely, but keep your eyes on the rock, and the shore, and
the
Deerslayer was interrupted by a slight exclamation from
the girl, who, in obedience to his hurried gestures, as much
as in obedience to his words, had immediately bent her looks
again, in the opposite direction.
What is 't?what is 't, Judith? he hastily demanded.
Is any thing to be seen?
There is a man on the rock!an Indian warrior, in his
paint, and armed!
Where does he wear his hawk's feather? eagerly added
Deerslayer, relaxing his hold of the line, in readiness to drift
nearer to the place of rendezvous. Is it fast to the
warlock
,
or does he carry it above the left ear?
'T is as you say, above the left ear; he smiles, too, and
mutters the word `Mohican.'
God be praised, 't is the Sarpent, at last! exclaimed
the young man, suffering the line to slip through his hands,
until hearing a light bound, in the other end of the craft, he
instantly checked the rope, and began to haul it in again,
under the assurance that his object was effected.
At that moment the door of the cabin was opened hastily,
and a warrior, darting through the little room, stood at
Deerslayer's side, simply uttering the exclamation Hugh!
At the next instant, Judith and Hetty shrieked, and the air
was filled with the yell of twenty savages, who came
leaping
through the branches, down the bank, some actually
falling headlong into the water, in their haste.
Pull, Deerslayer, cried Judith, hastily barring the door,
in order to prevent an inroad by the passage through which
the Delaware had just entered; pull, for life and death
the lake is full of savages, wading after us!
The young menfor Chingachgook immediately came to
his friend's assistanceneeded no second bidding, but they
applied themselves to their task in a way that showed how
urgent they deemed the occasion. The great difficulty was
in suddenly overcoming the
vis inerti
of so large a mass;
for, once in motion, it was easy to cause the scow to skim
the water, with all the necessary speed.
Pull, Deerslayer, for Heaven's sake! cried Judith again
at the loop. These wretches rush into the water like
hounds following their prey! Ah!the scow moves! and,
now, the water deepens to the arm-pits of the foremost, still
they rush forward, and will seize the ark!
A slight scream, and then a joyous laugh followed from
the girl; the first produced by a desperate effort of their
pursuers
,
and the last by its failure; the scow, which had now
got fairly in motion, gliding ahead into deep water, with a
velocity that set the designs of their enemies at naught. As
the two men were prevented by the position of the cabin from
seeing what passed astern, they were compelled to inquire
of the girls, into the state of the chase.
What now, Judith?what next?Do the Mingos still
follow, or are we quit of 'em, for the present? demanded
Deerslayer, when he felt the rope yielding, as if the scow
was going fast ahead, and heard the scream, and the laugh
of the girl, almost in the same breath.
They have vanished!one, the last, is just burying
himself in the bushes of the bankthere, he has disappeared
in the shadows of the trees! You have got your friend, and
we are all safe!
The two men now made another great effort, pulled the
ark up swiftly to the grapnel, tripped it, and when the scow
had shot some distance, and lost its way, they let the anchor
drop again; then, for the first time since their meeting, they
ceased their efforts. As the floating house now lay several
hundred feet from the shore, and offered a complete
protection
against bullets, there was no longer any danger, or any
motive for immediate exertion.
The manner in which the two friends now recognized each
other, was highly characteristic. Chingachgook, a noble,
tall, handsome, and athletic young Indian warrior, first
examined
his rifle, with care, opening the pan, to make sure
the priming was not wet; and, assured of this important fact,
he next cast furtive but observant glances around him, at the
strange habitation, and at the two girls; still he spoke not,
and most of all, did he avoid the betrayal of a womanish
curiosity, by asking questions.
Judith and Hetty, said Deerslayer, with an untaught,
natural courtesy, this is the Mohican chief of whom you've
heard me speak; Chingachgook, as he is called, which
signifies
the Big Sarpent; so named for his wisdom, and
prudence
,
and cunning, and my 'arliest and latest friend. I
know'd it must be he, by the hawk's feather over the left
ear, most other warriors wearing 'em on the war-lock.
As Deerslayer ceased speaking, he laughed heartily,
excited
13*
more perhaps by the delight of having got his friend
safe at his side, under circumstances so trying, than by any
conceit that happened to cross his fancy, and exhibiting this
outbreaking of feeling in a manner that was a little
remarkable
,
since his merriment was not accompanied by any
noise. Although Chingachgook both understood and spoke
English, he was unwilling to communicate his thoughts in it,
like most Indians; and when he had met Judith's cordial shake
of the hand, and Hetty's milder salute, in the courteous
manner
that became a chief, he turned away, apparently to await
the moment when it might suit his friend to enter into an
explanation of his future intentions, and to give a narrative
of what had passed since their separation. The other
understood
his meaning, and discovered his own mode of
reasoning
in the matter, by addressing the girls.
This wind will soon die away altogether, now the sun
is down, he said, and there is no need of rowing ag'in
it. In half an hour, or so, it will either be a flat calm, or
the air will come off from the south shore, when we will
begin
our journey back ag'in to the castle; in the meanwhile,
the Delaware and I will talk over matters, and get correct
idees of each other's notions, consarning the course we ought
to take.
No one opposed this proposition, and the girls withdrew
into the cabin to prepare the evening meal, while the two
young men took their seats on the head of the scow, and
began to converse. The dialogue was in the language of
the Delawares. As that dialect, however, is but little
understood
,
even by the learned, we shall, not only on this, but
on all subsequent occasions, render such parts as it may be
necessary to give closely, into liberal English; preserving,
as far as possible, the idioms and peculiarities of the
respective
speakers, by way of presenting the pictures in the
most graphic forms to the minds of the readers.
It is unnecessary to enter into the details first related by
Deerslayer, who gave a brief narrative of the facts that are
already familiar to those who have read our pages. In
relating
these events, however, it may be well to say that the
speaker touched only on the outlines, more particularly
abstaining
from saying any thing about his encounter with,
and victory over the Iroquois, as well as to his own
exertions
in behalf of the deserted young women. When
Deerslayer
ended, the Delaware took up the narrative, in turn,
speaking sententiously, and with great dignity. His account
was both clear and short, nor was it embellished by any
incidents
that did not directly concern the history of his
departure
from the villages of his people, and his arrival in
the valley of the Susquehannah. On reaching the latter,
which was at a point only half a mile south of the outlet, he
had soon struck a trail, which gave him notice of the
probable
vicinity of enemies. Being prepared for such an
occurrence
,
the object of the expedition calling him directly into
the neighbourhood of the party of Iroquois that was known
to be out, he considered the discovery as fortunate, rather
than the reverse, and took the usual precautions to turn it to
account. First following the river to its source, and
ascertaining
the position of the rock, he met another trail, and
had actually been hovering for hours on the flanks of his
enemies, watching equally for an opportunity to meet his
mistress, and to take a scalp; and it may be questioned
which he most ardently desired. He kept near the lake,
and occasionally he ventured to some spot where he could
get a view of what was passing on its surface. The ark
had been seen and watched, from the moment it hove in
sight, though the young chief was necessarily ignorant that
it was to be the instrument of effecting the desired
juncture
with his friend. The uncertainty of its movements, and
the fact that it was unquestionably managed by white men,
led him to conjecture the truth, however, and he held
himself in readiness to get on board whenever a suitable
occasion
might offer. As the sun drew near the horizon, he
repaired to the rock, where, on emerging from the forest, he
was gratified in finding the ark lying, apparently in
readiness
to receive him. The manner of his appearance, and
of his entrance into the craft, is known.
Although Chingachgook had been closely watching his
enemies for hours, their sudden and close pursuit, as he
reached the scow, was as much a matter of surprise to
himself
,
as it had been to his friend. He could only account
for it, by the fact of their being more numerous than he had
at first supposed, and by their having out parties, of the
existence
of which he was ignorant. Their regular, and
permanent
encampment, if the word permanent can be applied
to the residence of a party that intended to remain out, in
all probability, but a few weeks, was not far from the spot
where Hutter and Hurry had fallen into their hands, and,
as a matter of course, near a spring.
Well, Sarpent, asked Deerslayer, when the other had
ended his brief but spirited narrative, speaking always in
the Delaware tongue, which for the reader's convenience
only, we render into the peculiar vernacular of the speaker.
Well, Sarpent, as you've been scouting around these
Mingos, have you any thing to tell us of their capt
y
ves;
the father of these young women, and another, who, I
somewhat
conclude, is the lovyer of one of 'em.
Chingachgook has seen them. An old man, and a young
warriorthe falling hemlock, and the tall pine.
You 're not so much out, Delaware; you 're not so much
out. Old Hutter is decaying, of a sartainty, though many
solid blocks might be hewn out of his trunk yet; and, as for
Hurry Harry, so far as height, and strength, and
comeliness
go, he may be called the pride of the human forest.
Were the men bound, or, in any manner, suffering torture?
I ask on account of the young women; who, I dare to say,
would be glad to know.
It is not so, Deerslayer. The Mingos are too many
to cage their game. Some watch; some sleep; some scout;
some hunt. The pale-faces are treated like brothers to-day;
to-morrow they will lose their scalps.
Yes, that's red natur', and must be submitted to!
Judith
and Hetty, here's comforting tidings for you, the
Delaware
telling me that neither your father nor Hurry Harry
is in suffering; but, bating the loss of liberty, as well off, as
we are ourselves. Of course they are kept in the camp;
otherwise they do much as they please.
I rejoice to hear this, Deerslayer, returned Judith, and
now we are joined by your friend, I make no manner of
question that we shall find an opportunity to ransom the
prisoners. If there are any women in the camp, I have
articles of dress that will catch their eyes; and, should the
worst come to the worst, we can open the good chest, which,
I think will be found to hold things that may tempt the
chiefs.
Judith, said the young man, looking up at her with a
smile, and an expression of earnest curiosity, that, spite of
the growing obscurity, did not escape the watchful looks of
the girl, can you find it in your heart, to part with your
own finery, to release prisoners; even though one be your
own father, and the other is your sworn suitor and lovyer?
The flush on the face of the girl arose in part from
resentment
,
but more perhaps from a gentler and novel
feeling
,
that, with the capricious way wardness of taste, had been
rapidly rendering her more sensitive to the good opinion of
the youth who questioned her, than to that of any other
person. Suppressing the angry sensation, with instinctive
quickness, she answered with a readiness and truth, that
caused her sister to draw near to listen, though the obtuse
intellect of the latter was far from comprehending the
workings
of a heart as treacherous, as uncertain, and as
impetuous
in its feelings, as that of the spoiled and flattered
beauty.
Deerslayer, answered Judith, after a moment's pause;
I shall be honest with
you
. I confess, that the time
has
been when what you call finery, was to me the dearest thing
on earth; but I begin to feel differently. Though Hurry
Harry is naught to me, nor ever can be, I would give all I
own to set him free. If I would do this, for blustering,
bullying
,
talking Hurry, who has nothing but good looks to
recommend him, you may judge what I would do for my
own father.
This sounds well, and is according to woman's gifts.
Ah 's me! The same feelin's is to be found among the
young women of the Delawares. I've known 'em, often
and often, sacrifice their vanity to their hearts. 'T is as it
should be't is as it should be I suppose, in both colours.
Woman was created for the feelin's, and is pretty much
ruled by feelin'!
Would the savages let father go, if Judith and I gave
them all our best things? demanded Hetty, in her innocent,
mild, manner.
Their women might interfere, good Hetty; yes, their
women might interfere with such an ind in view. But, tell
me, Sarpent, how is it as to squaws among the knaves;
have they many of their own women in the camp?
the tree tops, and the rippling of a stream from a full,
sparkling
,
nat
y
ve fountain of pure fresh water; unless, indeed,
he continued, dropping his head for an instant in a
thoughtful
manner; unless, indeed, it be the open mouth of a
sartain
hound, when I'm on the track of a fat buck. As for
unsartain dogs, I care little for their cries, seein' they are
as likely to speak when the deer is not in sight, as when
it is.
Judith walked slowly and pensively away, nor was there
any of her ordinary calculating coquetry, in the light
tremulous
sigh, that, unconsciously to herself, arose to her lips.
On the other hand, Hetty listened with guileless attention;
though it struck her simple mind as singular, that the young
man should prefer the melody of the woods, to the songs of
girls, or even to the laugh of innocence and joy.
Accustomed
,
however, to defer, in most things, to her sister, she
soon followed Judith into the cabin, where she took a seat,
and remained pondering intensely over some occurrence, or
resolution, or opinion, which was a secret to all but herself.
Left alone, Deerslayer and his friend resumed their
discourse
.
Has the young pale-face hunter been long on this
lake? demanded the Delaware, after courteously waiting
for the other to speak first.
Only since yesterday noon, Sarpent; though that has
been long enough to see and do much.
The gaze that the Indian fastened on his companion was
so keen, that it seemed to mock the gathering darkness of
the night. As the other furtively returned his look, he saw
the two black eyes glistening on him, like the balls of the
panther, or those of the penned wolf. He understood the
meaning of this glowing gaze, and answered evasively, as
he fancied would best become the modesty of a white man's
gifts.
'T is as you suspect, Sarpent; yes, 't is somewhat
that-a-way
.
I
have
fell in with the inimy, and I suppose it may
be said I've fou't them, too.
An exclamation of delight and exultation escaped the
Indian
;
and then, laying his hand eagerly on the arm of his
friend, he asked if there were any scalps taken.
That I
will
maintain, in the face of all the Delaware
tribe, old Tamenund, and your father, the great Uncas, as
well as the rest, is ag'in white gifts!
My
scalp is on my
head, as you can see, Sarpent, and that was the only scalp
that was in danger, when one side was altogether Christian
and white.
Did no warrior fall?Deerslayer did not get his name,
by being slow of sight, or clumsy with the rifle!
In that particular, chief, you 're nearer reason, and
therefore nearer being right. I may say one Mingo fell.
A chief! demanded the other, with startling
vehemence
.
Nay, that's more than I know, or can say. He was
artful, and treacherous, and stout-hearted, and may well have
gained popularity enough with his people to be named to
that rank. The man fou't well, though his eye was'n't
quick enough for one who had had his schooling in your
company, Delaware.
My brother and friend struck the body?
That was uncalled for, seeing that the Mingo died in
my arms. The truth may as well be said, at once; he
fou't like a man of red gifts, and I fou't like a man with
gifts of my own colour. God gave me the victory; I
could'nt fly in the face of his providence by forgetting my
birth and natur'. White he made me, and white I must
live and die.
Good! Deerslayer is a pale-face, and has pale-face
hands. A Delaware will look for the scalp, and hang it on
a pole, and sing a song in his honour, when we go back to
our people. The honour belongs to the tribe; it must not
be lost.
This is easy talking, but 't will not be as easy doing.
The Mingo's body is in the hands of his fri'nds, and, no
doubt, is hid in some hole, where Delaware cunning will
never be able to get at the scalp.
The young man then gave his friend a succinct, but clear
account of the event of the morning, concealing nothing of
any moment, and yet touching on every thing modestly, and
with a careful attention to avoid the Indian habit of
boasting
.
Chingachgook again expressed his satisfaction at the
honour won by his friend, and then both arose, the hour
having arrived when it became prudent to move the ark
further from the land.
It was now quite dark; the heavens having become
clouded
,
and the stars hid. The north wind had ceased, as was
usual, with the setting of the sun, and a light air arose from
the south. This change favouring the design of Deerslayer,
he lifted his grapnel, and the scow immediately and quite
perceptibly began to drift more into the lake. The sail was
set, when the motion of the craft increased to a rate not
much less than two miles in the hour. As this superseded
the necessity of rowingan occupation that an Indian
would not be likely to desireDeerslayer, Chingachgook
and Judith seated themselves in the stern of the scow, where
the first governed its movements by holding the oar. Here
they discoursed on their future movements, and on the
means that ought to be used in order to effect the liberation
of their friends.
In this dialogue Judith held a material part; the
Delaware
readily understanding all she said, while his own
replies
and remarks, both of which were few and pithy, were
occasionally rendered into English by his friend. Judith
rose greatly in the estimation of her companion, in the half
hour that followed. Prompt of resolution and firm of
purpose
,
her suggestions and expedients partook of her spirit
and sagacity, both of which were of a character to find
favour with men of the frontier. The events that had
occurred
since their meeting, as well as her isolated and
dependent
situation, induced the girl to feel towards
Deerslayer
like the friend of a year, instead of an acquaintance
of a day; and so completely had she been won by his
guileless
truth of character and of feelingpure novelties in our
sex, as respected her own experiencethat his peculiarities
had excited her curiosity, and created a confidence that had
never been awakened by any other man. Hitherto she had
been compelled to stand on the defensive, in her intercourse
with men,with what success was best known to herself;
but here had she been suddenly thrown into the society, and
under the protection of a youth, who evidently as little
contemplated
evil towards herself, as if he had been her brother.
The freshness of his integrity, the poetry and truth of his
feelings, and even the quaintness of his forms of speech, all
Vol. I.14
had their influence, and aided in awakening an interest that
she found as pure as it was sudden and deep. Hurry's fine
face and manly form had never compensated for his
boisterous
and vulgar turn; and her intercourse with the officers
had prepared her to make comparisons under which even
his great natural advantages suffered. But this very
intercourse
with the officers who occasionally came upon the
lake to fish and hunt, had an effect in producing her
present
sentiments towards the young stranger. With them,
while her vanity had been gratified, and her self-love
strongly awakened, she had many causes deeply to regret
the acquaintanceif not to mourn over it, in secret sorrow
for it was impossible for one of her quick intellect not
to perceive how hollow was the association between superior
and inferior, and that she was regarded as the plaything of
an idle hour, rather than as an equal and a friend, by even
the best intentioned and least designing of her scarlet-clad
admirers. Deerslayer, on the other hand, had a window
in his breast, through which the light of his honesty was
ever shining; and even his indifference to charms that so
rarely failed to produce a sensation, piqued the pride of the
girl, and gave him an interest that another, seemingly more
favoured by nature, might have failed to excite.
In this manner half an hour passed, during which time
the ark had been slowly stealing over the water, the
darkness
thickening around it; though it was easy to see that
the gloom of the forest at the southern end of the lake, was
getting to be distant, while the mountains that lined the sides
of the beautiful basin were overshadowing it, nearly from
side to side. There was, indeed, a narrow stripe of water,
in the centre of the lake, where the dim light that was still
shed from the heavens fell upon its surface, in a line
extending
north and south; and along this faint tracka sort
of inverted milky-way, in which the obscurity was not
quite as dense as in other placesthe scow held her course,
he who steered well knowing that it led in the direction he
wished to go. The reader is not to suppose, however, that
any difficulty could exist as to the course. This would have
been determined by that of the air, had it not been possible
to distinguish the mountains, as well as by the dim opening
to the south, which marked the position of the valley in that
quarter, above the plain of tall trees, by a sort of lessened
obscurity; the difference between the darkness of the forest,
and that of the night, as seen only in the air. The
peculiarities
at length caught the attention of Judith and the
Deerslayer, and the conversation ceased, to allow each to
gaze at the solemn stillness and deep repose of nature.
`T is a gloomy night, observed the girl, after a pause
of several minutes. I hope we may be able to find the
castle.
Little fear of our missing
that,
if we keep this path,
in the middle of the lake, returned the young man.
Natur'
has made us a road here, and, dim as it is, there'll be
little difficulty in following it.
Do you hear nothing, Deerslayer? It seemed as if the
water was stirring quite near us!
Sartainly something
did
move the water, oncommon
like; it must have been a fish. Them creatur's prey upon
each other like men, and animals on the land; one has
leaped into the air, and fallen back hard, into his own
element
.
'T is of little use, Judith, for any to strive to get
out of their elements, since it's natur' to stay in 'em; and
natur' will have its way. Ha!
that
sounds like a paddle,
used with more than common caution!
At this moment the Delaware bent forward, and pointed
significantly into the boundary of gloom, as if some object
had suddenly caught his eye. Both Deerslayer and Judith
followed the direction of his gesture, and each got a view
of a canoe at the same instant. The glimpse of this
startling
neighbour was dim, and, to eyes less practised, it might
have been uncertain; though to those in the ark, the object
was evidently a canoe, with a single individual in it; the
latter standing erect and paddling. How many lay
concealed
in its bottom, of course could not be known. Flight,
by means of oars, from a bark canoe impelled by vigorous
and skilful hands, was utterly impracticable, and each of
the men seized his rifle, in expectation of a conflict.
I can easily bring down the paddler, whispered
Deerslayer
,
but we'll first hail him, and ask his ar'n'd. Then
raising his voice, he continued in a solemn manner, Hold!
If you come nearer, I must fire, though contrary to my
wishes; and then sartain death will follow. Stop paddling,
and answer!
Fire, and slay a poor, defenceless girl, returned a soft
tremulous female voice, and God will never forgive you!
Go your way, Deerslayer, and let me go mine.
Hetty! exclaimed the young man and Judith in a
breath; and the former sprang instantly to the spot where he
had left the canoe they had been towing. It was gone, and
he understood the whole affair. As for the fugitive,
frightened
at the menace, she ceased paddling, and remained
dimly visible, resembling a spectral outline of a human
form, standing on the water. At the next moment, the sail
was lowered, to prevent the ark from passing the spot
where the canoe lay. This last expedient, however, was
not taken in time; for the momentum of so heavy a craft,
and the impulsion of the air, soon set her by; bringing
Hetty directly to windward, though still visible, as the
change in the positions of the two boats now placed her in
that species of milky-way which has been mentioned.
What can this mean, Judith? demanded Deerslayer.
Why has your sister taken the canoe, and left us?
You know she is feeble-minded, poor girl! and she has
her own ideas of what ought to be done. She loves her
father more than most children love their parentsand
then
Then, what, gal? This is a trying moment; one in
which truth must be spoken!
Judith felt a generous and womanly regret at betraying
her sister, and she hesitated ere she spoke again. But once
more urged by Deerslayer, and conscious herself of all the
risks the whole party was running by the indiscretion of
Hetty, she could refrain no longer.
Then, I fear, poor, weak-minded Hetty has not been
altogether able to see the vanity, and madness, and folly,
that lie hid behind the handsome face and fine form of Hurry
Harry. She talks of him, in her sleep, and sometimes
betrays
the inclination in her waking moments.
You think, Judith, that your sister is now bent on some
mad scheme to serve her father and Hurry, which will, in
all likelihood, give them ript
y
les, the Mingos, the mastership
of a canoe?
Such, I fear, will turn out to be the fact, Deerslayer.
Poor Hetty has hardly sufficient cunning to outwit a
savage
.
All this while, the canoe, with the form of Hetty, erect in
one end of it, was dimly perceptible; though the greater
drift of the ark, rendered it, at each instant, less and less
distinct. It was evident no time was to be lost, lest it should
altogether disappear. The rifles were now laid aside, as
useless; and then the two men seized the oars, and began to
sweep the head of the scow round, in the direction of the
canoe. Judith, accustomed to the office, flew to the other
end of the ark, and placed herself at what might be called
the helm. Hetty took the alarm, at these preparations,
which could not be made without noise, and started off like
a bird, that had been suddenly put up by the approach of
unexpected danger.
As Deerslayer and his companion rowed with the energy
of those who felt the necessity of straining every nerve, and
Hetty's strength was impaired by a nervous desire to escape,
the chase would have quickly terminated in the capture of
the fugitive, had not the girl made several short and
unlooked-for
deviations in her course. These turnings gave
her time, and they had also the effect of gradually bringing
both canoe and ark within the deeper gloom, cast by the
shadows from the hills. They also gradually increased the
distance between the fugitive and her pursuers, until Judith
called out to her companions to cease rowing, for she had
completely lost sight of the canoe.
When this mortifying announcement was made, Hetty
was actually so near as to understand every syllable her
sister uttered; though the latter had used the precaution of
speaking as low as circumstances would allow her to do,
and to make herself heard. Hetty stopped paddling at the
same moment, and waited the result with an impatience that
was breathless, equally from her late exertions, and her
desire
to land. A dead silence immediately fell on the lake;
during which the three in the ark were using their senses
differently, in order to detect the position of the canoe.
Judith
leant forward to listen, in the hope of catching some
sound that might betray the direction in which her sister
was stealing away; while her two companions brought their
14*
eyes, as near as possible, to a level with the water, in order
to detect any object that might be floating on its surface.
All was vain, however, for neither sound, nor sight,
rewarded
their efforts. All this time, Hetty, who had not the
cunning to sink into the canoe, stood erect, a finger pressed
on her lips, gazing in the direction in which the voices had
been heard, resembling a statue of profound and timid
attention
.
Her ingenuity had barely sufficed to enable her
to seize the canoe, and to quit the ark, in the nioseless
manner
related; and then it appeared to be momentarily
exhausted
.
Even the doublings of the canoe had been as
much the consequence of an uncertain hand, and of nervous
agitation, as of any craftiness, or calculation.
The pause continued several minutes; during which
Deerslayer
and the Delaware conferred together, in the language
of the latter. Then the oars dipped, again, and the ark
moved away, rowing with as little noise as possible. It
steered westward, a little southerly, or in the direction of the
encampment of the enemy. Having reached a point, at no
great distance from the shore, and where the obscurity was
intense, on account of the proximity of the land, it lay there
near an hour, in waiting for the expected approach of Hetty;
who, it was thought, would make the best of her way to that
spot, as soon as she believed herself relieved from the danger
of pursuit. No success rewarded this little blockade,
however
;
neither appearance nor sound denoting the passage of
the canoe. Disappointed at this failure, and conscious of
the importance of getting possession of the fortress, before
it could be seized by the enemy, Deerslayer now took his way
towards the castle, with the apprehension that all his
foresight
in securing the canoes, would be defeated, by this
unguarded
and alarming movement on the part of the
feebleminded
Hetty.
CHAPTER X.
But who in this wild wood
May credit give to either eye, or ear?
From rocky precipice or hollow cave,
'Midst the confused sound of rustling leaves,
And crackling boughs, and cries of nightly birds,
Returning seeming answer!
Joanna Baillie
.
Fear
, as much as calculation, had induced Hetty to cease
paddling, when she found that her pursuers did not know in
which direction to proceed. She remained stationary, until
the ark had pulled in near the encampment, as has been
related
in the preceding chapter; when she resumed the
paddle
,
and with cautious strokes made the best of her way
towards
the western shore. In order to avoid her pursuers,
however, who, she rightly suspected, would soon be rowing
along that shore themselves, the head of the canoe was
pointed so far north, as to bring her to land on a point that
thrust itself into the lake, at the distance of near a league
from the outlet. Nor was this altogether the result of a
desire
to escape; for, feeble-minded as she was, Hetty Hutter
had a good deal of that instinctive caution, which so often
keeps those whom God has thus visited from harm. She
was perfectly aware of the importance of keeping the canoes
from falling into the hands of the Iroquois; and long
familiarity
with the lake had suggested one of the simplest
expedients
,
by which this great object could be rendered
compatible
with her own purpose.
The point in question, was the first projection that offered
on that side of the lake, where a canoe, if set adrift with a
southerly air, would float clear of the land; and where it
would be no great violation of probabilities to suppose it
might even hit the castle; the latter lying above it, almost
in a direct line with the wind. Such then was Hetty's
intention
;
and she landed on the extremity of the gravelly
point, beneath an overhanging oak, with the express
intention
of shoving the canoe off from the shore, in order that it
might drift up towards her father's insulated abode. She
knew, too, from the logs that occasionally floated about the
lake, that did it miss the castle, and its appendages, that the
wind would be likely to change before the canoe could reach
the northern extremity of the lake, and that Deerslayer
might have an opportunity of regaining it, in the morning,
when no doubt he would be earnestly sweeping the surface
of the water, and the whole of its wooded shores, with the
glass. In all this, too, Hetty was less governed by any
chain of reasoning, than by her habits; the latter often
supplying
the defects of mind, in human beings, as they
perform
the same office for animals of the inferior classes.
The girl was quite an hour finding her way to the point;
the distance and the obscurity equally detaining her; but
she was no sooner on the gravelly beach, than she prepared
to set the canoe adrift, in the manner mentioned. While in
the act of pushing it from her, she heard low voices, that
seemed to come from among the trees behind her. Startled
at this unexpected danger, Hetty was on the point of
springing
into the canoe again, in order to seek safety in flight,
when she thought she recognized the tones of Judith's
melodious
voice. Bending forward, so as to catch the sounds
more directly, they evidently came from the water; and
then she understood that the ark was approaching from the
south, and so close in with the western shore, as necessarily
to cause it to pass the point, within twenty yards of the spot
where she stood. Here, then, was all she could desire; the
canoe was shoved off into the lake, leaving its late occupant
alone on the narrow strand.
When this act of self-devotion was performed, Hetty did
not retire. The foliage of the overhanging trees and bushes
would have almost concealed her person, had there been
light; but in that obscurity, it was utterly impossible to
discover
any object thus shaded, at the distance of a few feet.
Flight, too, was perfectly easy, as twenty steps would
effectually
bury her in the forest. She remained, therefore,
watching
with intense anxiety, the result of her expedient,
intending
to call the attention of the others to the canoe, with her
voice, should they appear to pass without observing it. The
ark approached under its sail, again; Deerslayer standing
in its bow, with Judith near him, and the Delaware at the
helm. It would seem that, in the bay below, it had got too
close to the shore, in the lingering hope of intercepting Hetty;
for, as it came nearer, the latter distinctly heard the
directions
that the young man forward, gave to his companion,
in order to clear the point.
Lay her head more off the shore, Delaware, said
Deerslayer
,
for the third time, speaking in English, that his fair
companion might understand his words; lay her head
well off shore. We have got embayed here, and needs keep
the mast clear of the trees. Judith, there's a canoe!
The last words were uttered with great earnestness, and
Deerslayer's hand was on his rifle, ere they were fairly out
of his mouth. But the truth flashed on the mind of the
quick-witted girl, and she instantly told her companion that
the boat
must
be that in which her sister had fled.
Keep the scow straight, Delaware; steer as straight as
your bullet flies when sent ag'in a buck; there,I have it.
The canoe was seized, and immediately secured again to
the side of the ark. At the next moment the sail was
lowered
,
and the motion of the ark arrested, by means of the
oars.
Hetty! called out Judith, concern, even affection
betraying itself in her tones; are you within hearing,
sister
for
God's sake answer, and let me hear the sound of
your voice, again! Hetty!dear Hetty.
I'm here, Judithhere, on the shore, where it will be
useless to follow me; as I will hide in the woods.
Oh! Hetty, what is't you do! Remember 't is drawing
near midnight, and that the woods are filled with savages
and wild beasts!
Neither will harm a poor half-witted girl, Judith. God
is as much with me, here, as he would be in the ark, or in
the hut. I am going to help my father, and poor Hurry
Harry; who will be tortured and slain, unless some one
cares for them.
We all care for them, and intend to-morrow to send
them a flag of truce, to buy their ransom. Come back then,
sister; trust to us, who have better heads than you, and who
will do all we can for father.
I know your head is better than mine, Judith, for mine
is very weak, to be sure; but, I must go to father and poor
Hurry. Do you and Deerslayer keep the castle, sister;
leave me in the hands of God.
God is with us all, Hettyin the castle, or on the shore
father as well as ourselves; and it is sinful not to trust to
his goodness. You can do nothing in the dark; will lose
your way in the forest, and perish for want of food.
God will not let that happen to a poor child that goes
to serve her father, sister. I must try and find the
savages
.
Come back, for this night only; in the morning, we
will put you ashore, and leave you to do as you may think
right.
You
say
so, Judith, and you
think
so; but you would
not. Your heart would soften, and you'd see tomahawks
and scalping-knives in the air. Besides, I've got a thing to
tell the Indian chief, that will answer all our wishes; and
I'm afraid I may forget it, if I don't tell it to him at once.
You'll see that he will let father go, as soon as he hears
it!
Poor Hetty! What can
you
say to a ferocious savage,
that will be likely to change his bloody purpose!
That which will frighten him, and make him let father
go, returned the simple-minded girl, positively. You'll
see, sister; you'll see, how soon it will bring him to, like a
gentle child!
Will you tell
me,
Hetty, what you intend to say?
asked Deerslayer; I know the savages well, and can form
some idee how far fair words will be likely, or not, to work
on their bloody natur's. If it's not suited to the gifts of a
red-skin, 't will be of no use; for reason goes by gifts, as
well as conduct.
Well, then, answered Hetty, dropping her voice to a
low, confidential tone; for the stillness of the night, and the
nearness of the ark, permitted her to do this, and still to be
heard. Well, then, Deerslayer, as you seem a good and
honest young man, I will tell
you
. I mean not to say a
word to any of the savages, until I get face to face with their
head chief, let them plague me with as many questions as
they please; noI'll answer none of them, unless it be to
tell them to lead me to their wisest man. Then, Deerslayer,
I'll tell him that God will not forgive murder, and thefts;
and that if father and Hurry did go after the scalps of the
Iroquois, he must return good for evil, for so the Bible
commands
,
else he will go into everlasting punishment. When
he hears this, and feels it to be true, as feel it he must; how
long will it be before he sends father, and Hurry, and me,
to the shore, opposite the castle; telling us all three to go
our way in peace?
The last question was put in a triumphant manner; and
then the simple-minded girl laughed at the impression she
never doubted that her project had made on her auditors.
Deerslayer was dumb-founded at this proof of guileless
feebleness
of mind; but Judith had suddenly bethought her of a
means of counteracting this wild project, by acting on the
very feelings that had given it birth. Without adverting to
the closing question, or the laugh, therefore, she hurriedly
called to her sister by name, as one suddenly impressed
with the importance of what she had to say. But no answer
was given to the call.
By the snapping of twigs, and the rustling of leaves, Hetty
had evidently quitted the shore, and was already burying
herself in the forest. To follow would have been bootless,
since the darkness, as well as the dense cover that the woods
everywhere afforded, would have rendered her capture next
to impossible; and there was also the never-ceasing danger
of falling into the hands of their enemies. After a short and
melancholy discussion, therefore, the sail was again set, and
the ark pursued its course towards its habitual moorings;
Deerslayer silently felicitating himself on the recovery of
the canoe, and brooding over his plans for the morrow. The
wind rose as the party quitted the point, and in less than an
hour they reached the castle. Here all was found, as it had
been left; and the reverse of the ceremonies had to be taken,
in entering the building, that had been used on quitting it.
Judith occupied a solitary bed that night, bedewing the
pillow
with her tears, as she thought of the innocent and
hitherto
neglected creature, who had been her companion, from
childhood; and bitter regrets came over her mind, from
more causes than one, as the weary hours passed away,
making it nearly morning before she lost her recollection in
sleep. Deerslayer and the Delaware took their rest in the
ark, where we shall leave them enjoying the deep sleep of
the honest, the healthful and fearless, to return to the girl
we have last seen in the midst of the forest.
When Hetty left the shore, she took her way
unhesitatingly
into the woods, with a nervous apprehension of being
followed. Luckily, this course was the best she could have
hit on to effect her own purpose, since it was the only one
that led her from the point. The night was so intensely
dark, beneath the branches of the trees, that her progress
was very slow, and the direction she went altogether a
matter
of chance, after the first few yards. The formation of
the ground, however, did not permit her to deviate far from
the line in which she desired to proceed. On one hand, it
was soon bounded by the acclivity of the hill; while the lake,
on the other, served as a guide. For two hours did this
single-hearted and simple-minded girl toil through the mazes
of the forest; sometimes finding herself on the brow of
the bank that bounded the water, and at others struggling
up an ascent that warned her to go no farther in that
direction
,
since it necessarily ran at right angles to the course
on which she wished to proceed. Her feet often slid from
beneath her, and she got many falls, though none to do her
injury; but, by the end of the period mentioned, she had
become so weary as to want strength to go any farther.
Rest was indispensable; and she set about preparing a bed,
with the readiness and coolness of one to whom the
wilderness
presented no unnecessary terrors. She knew that wild
beasts roamed through all the adjacent forest, but animals
that preyed on the human species were rare, and of
dangerous
serpents there were literally none. These facts had been
taught her by her father; and whatever her feeble mind
received at all, it received so confidingly as to leave her no
uneasiness from any doubts, or scepticism. To her the
sublimity of the solitude in which she was placed, was
soothing, rather than appalling; and she gathered a bed of
leaves, with as much indifference to the circumstances that
would have driven the thoughts of sleep entirely from the
minds of most of her sex, as if she had been preparing her
place of nightly rest, beneath the paternal roof.
As soon as Hetty had collected a sufficient number of
the dried leaves to protect her person from the damps of the
ground, she kneeled beside the humble pile, clasped her
raised hands in an attitude of deep devotion, and in a soft,
low, but audible voice, repeated the Lord's prayer. This
was followed by those simple and devout verses, so familiar
to children, in which she recommended her soul to God,
should it be called away to another state of existence, ere
the return of morning. This duty done, she lay down and
disposed herself to sleep. The attire of the girl, though
suited to the season, was sufficiently warm for all ordinary
purposes; but the forest is ever cool, and the nights of that
elevated region of country, have always a freshness about
them, that renders clothing more necessary than is commonly
the case in the summers of a low latitude. This had been
foreseen by Hetty, who had brought with her a coarse heavy
mantle, which, when laid over her body, answered all the
useful purposes of a blanket. Thus protected, she dropped
asleep, in a few minutes, as tranquilly as if watched over by
the guardian care of that mother, who had so recently been
taken from her for everaffording, in this particular, a
most striking contrast between her own humble couch, and
the sleepless pillow of her sister.
Hour passed after hour, in a tranquillity as undisturbed
and a rest as sweet, as if angels, expressly commissioned
for that object, watched around the bed of Hetty Hutter.
Not once did her soft eyes open, until the grey of the dawn
came struggling through the tops of the trees, falling on
their lids, and, united to the freshness of a summer's
morning
,
giving the usual summons to awake. Ordinarily, Hetty
was up ere the rays of the sun tipped the summits of the
mountains; but on this occasion her fatigue had been so
great, and her rest was so profound, that the customary
warnings failed of their effect. The girl murmured in her
sleep, threw an arm forward, smiled as gently as an infant
in its cradle, but still slumbered. In making this
unconscious
gesture, her hand fell on some object that was warm,
and, in the half unconscious state in which she lay, she
connected the circumstance with her habits. At the next
moment, a rude attack was made on her side, as if a
rooting
animal were thrusting its snout beneath, with a desire
to force her position; and then, uttering the name of
Judith
,
she awoke. As the startled girl arose to a sitting
Vol. I.15
attitude, she perceived that some dark object sprang from
her, scattering the leaves and snapping the fallen twigs in
its haste. Opening her eyes, and recovering from the first
confusion and astonishment of her situation, Hetty
perceived
a cub, of the common American brown bear,
balancing
itself on its hinder legs, and still looking towards her,
as if doubtful whether it would be safe to trust itself near
her person again. The first impulse of Hetty, who had
been mistress of several of these cubs, was to run and seize
the little creature as a prize, but a loud growl warned her
of the danger of such a procedure. Recoiling a few steps,
the girl looked hurriedly round, and perceived the dam,
watching
her movements, with fiery eyes, at no great distance.
A hollow tree, that had once been the home of bees,
having
recently fallen, the mother, with two more cubs, was
feasting on the dainty food that this accident had placed
within her reach; while the first kept a jealous eye on the
situation of its truant and reckless young.
It would exceed all the means of human knowledge to
pretend to analyze the influences that govern the acts of the
lower animals. On this occasion, the dam, though
proverbially
fierce when its young is thought to be in danger,
manifested no intention to attack the girl. It quitted the
honey, and advanced to a place within twenty feet of her,
where it raised itself on its hinder legs, and balanced its
body in a sort of angry, growling discontent, but
approached
no nearer. Happily, Hetty did not fly. On the
contrary
,
though not without terror, she knelt with her face
towards the animal, and with clasped hands and uplifted
eyes, repeated the prayer of the previous night. This act
of devotion was not the result of alarm; but it was a duty
she never neglected to perform ere she slept, and when the
return of consciousness awoke her to the business of the
day. As the girl arose from her knees, the bear dropped
on its feet again, and collecting its cubs around her,
permitted
them to draw their natural sustenance. Hetty was
delighted with this proof of tenderness in an animal that
has but a very indifferent reputation for the gentler feelings;
and as a cub would quit its mother to frisk and leap about
in wantonness, she felt a strong desire again to catch it up
in her arms, and play with it. But admonished by the
growl, she had self-command sufficient not to put this
dangerous
project in execution; and, recollecting her errand
among the hills, she tore herself away from the group, and
proceeded on her course, along the margin of the lake, of
which she now caught glimpses again through the trees.
To her surprise, though not to her alarm, the family of
bears arose and followed her steps, keeping a short distance
behind her; apparently watching every movement, as if
they had a near interest in all she did.
In this manner, escorted by the dam and cubs, the girl
proceeded nearly a mile, thrice the distance she had been able
to achieve in the darkness, during the same period of time.
She then reached a brook that had dug a channel for itself
into the earth, and went brawling into the lake, between
steep and high banks, covered with trees. Here, Hetty
performed
her ablutions; then drinking of the pure
mountain-water
,
she went her way, refreshed and lighter of heart,
still attended by her singular companions. Her course now
lay along a broad and nearly level terrace, which stretched
from the top of the bank that bounded the water, to a low
acclivity that rose to a second and irregular platform above.
This was at a part of the valley where the mountains ran
obliquely, forming the commencement of a plain that spread
between the hills, southward of the sheet of water. Hetty
knew, by this circumstance, that she was getting near to
the encampment, and had she not, the bears would have
given her warning of the vicinity of human beings.
Snuffing
the air, the dam refused to follow any further, though
the girl looked back and invited her to come by childish
signs, and even by direct appeals made in her own sweet
voice. It was while making her way slowly through some
bushes, in this manner, with averted face and eyes riveted
on the immovable animals, that the girl suddenly found her
steps arrested by a human hand, that was laid lightly on
her shoulder.
Where go? said a soft female voice, speaking
hurriedly
,
and in concern. Indianred-mansavagewicked
warriorthat-a-way.
This unexpected salutation alarmed the girl no more than
the presence of the fierce inhabitants of the woods. It took
her a little by surprise, it is true, but she was in a measure
prepared for some such meeting; and the creature who
stopped her, was as little likely to excite terror as any who
ever appeared in the guise of an Indian. It was a girl, not
much older than herself, whose smile was sunny as
Judith's
in her brightest moments, whose voice was melody
itself, and whose accents and manner had all the rebuked
gentleness that characterizes the sex among a people who
habitually treat their women as the attendants and servitors
of the warriors. Beauty among the women of the
aboriginal
Americans, before they have become exposed to the
hardships
of wives and mothers, is by no means uncommon. In
this particular, the original owners of the country were not
unlike their more civilized successors;
nature
appearing to
have bestowed that delicacy of mien and outline that forms
so great a charm in the youthful female, but of which they
are so early deprived; and that too, as much by the habits
of domestic life, as from any other cause.
The girl who had so suddenly arrested the steps of Hetty,
was dressed in a calico mantle, that effectually protected all
the upper part of her person, while a short petticoat of blue
cloth edged with gold lace, that fell no lower than her knees,
leggings of the same, and moccasins of deer-skin, completed
her attire. Her hair fell in long dark braids down her
shoulders and back, and was parted above a low smooth
forehead, in a way to soften the expression of eyes that were
full of archness and natural feeling. Her face was oval,
with delicate features; the teeth were even and white, while
the mouth expressed a melancholy tenderness, as if it wore
this peculiar meaning in intuitive perception of the fate of
a being who was doomed from birth to endure a woman's
sufferings, relieved by a woman's affections. Her voice, as
has been already intimated, was soft as the sighing of the
night air, a characteristic of the females of her race, but
which was so conspicuous in herself as to have procured for
her the name of Wah-ta!-Wah; which rendered into
English
means Hist-oh!-Hist.
In a word, this was the betrothed of Chingachgook; who
having succeeded in lulling their suspicions, was permitted
to wander around the encampment of her captors. This
indulgence was in accordance with the general policy of the
red-man, who well knew, moreover, that her trail could have
been followed, in the event of flight. It will also be
remembered
that the Iroquois, or Hurons, as it would be better to
call them, were entirely ignorant of the proximity of her
lover; a fact, indeed, that she did not know herself.
It is not easy to say which manifested the most
self-possession
at this unexpected meeting; the pale-face, or the
red-girl
.
But, though a little surprised, Wah-ta!-Wah was the
most willing to speak, and far the readier in foreseeing
consequences
,
as well as in devising means to avert them. Her
father, during her childhood, had been much employed as a
warrior, by the authorities of the colony; and dwelling for
several years near the forts, she had caught a knowledge of
the English tongue, which she spoke, in the usual,
abbreviated
manner of an Indian, but fluently, and without any of
the ordinary reluctance of her people.
Where go? repeated Wah-ta!-Wah, returning the
smile of Hetty, in her own gentle, winning manner;
wicked
warrior, that-a-way
good
warrior, far off.
What's your name? asked Hetty, with the simplicity
of a child.
Wah-ta!-Wah. I no Mingogood DelawareYengeese
friend. Mingo very cruel, and love scalp, for blood
Delaware
love him, for honour. Come here, where no eyes.
Wah-ta!-Wah now led her companion towards the lake,
descending the bank so as to place its overhanging trees and
bushes between them and any probable observers; nor did
she stop until they were both seated, side by side, on a
fallen log, one end of which actually lay buried in the
water.
Why
you come for? the young Indian then eagerly
inquired;
where
you come from?
Hetty told her tale in her own simple and truth-loving
manner. She explained the situation of her father, and
stated her desire to serve him, and, if possible, to procure his
release.
Why your fader come to Mingo camp in night? asked
the Indian girl, with a directness, which, if not borrowed
from the other, partook largely of its sincerity. He know
it war-time, and he no boyhe no want beardno want to
be told Iroquois carry tomahawk, and knife, and rifle. Why
15*
he come night time, seize
me
by hair, and try to scalp
Delaware
girl?
You! said Hetty, almost sickening with horror; did
he seize
you
did he try to scalp
you?
Why no? Delaware scalp sell for much as Mingo
scalp. Governor no tell difference. Wicked t'ing for
paleface
to scalp. No his gifts, as the good Deerslayer alway
tell me.
And do
you
know the Deerslayer? said Hetty,
colouring
with delight and surprise, forgetting her regrets at the
moment, in the influence of this new feeling. I know him,
too. He is now in the ark, with Judith, and a Delaware,
who is called the Big Serpent. A bold and handsome
warrior
is this Serpent, too!
Spite of the rich deep colour that nature had bestowed on
the Indian beauty, the tell-tale blood deepened on her
cheeks, until the blush gave new animation and intelligence
to her jet-black eyes. Raising a finger in an attitude of
warning, she dropped her voice, already so soft and sweet,
nearly to a whisper, as she continued the discourse.
Chingachgook! returned the Delaware girl, sighing out
the harsh name, in sounds so softly guttural, as to cause it
to reach the ear in melody. His father, Uncasgreat chief
of the Mahicanninext to old Tamenund! More as
warrior
,
not so much grey hair, and less at council-fire.
You
know Serpent?
He joined us last evening, and was in the ark with me,
for two or three hours before I left it. I'm afraid, Hist
Hetty could not pronounce the Indian name of her new
friend, but having heard Deerslayer give her this familiar
appellation, she used it, without any of the ceremony of
civilized life; I'm afraid, Hist, he has come after scalps,
as well as my poor father and Hurry Harry!
Why he should'n't, ha? Chingachgook red warrior,
very redscalp make his honourbe sure he take him.
Then, said Hetty, earnestly, he will be as wicked as
any other. God will not pardon in a red-man, what he will
not pardon in a white man.
No true, returned the Delaware girl, with a warmth,
that nearly amounted to passion; no true, I tell you!
The Manitou smile and please when he see young warrior
come back from the war-path, with two, ten, hundred scalp
on a pole! Chingachgook father take scalp, grandfather take
scalpall old chief take scalp; and Chingachgook take as
many scalp as he can carry, himself!
Then, Hist, his sleep, of nights, must be terrible to think
of! No one can be cruel, and hope to be forgiven.
No cruelplenty forgiven, returned Wah-ta!-Wah,
stamping her little foot on the stony strand, and shaking her
head in a way to show how completely feminine feeling, in
one of its aspects, had gotten the better of feminine feeling
in another. I tell you, Serpent brave; he go home, this
time, with four, yes,
two
scalp.
And is that his errand, here? Did he really come all
this distance, across mountains, and valley, rivers and
lakes, to torment his fellow-creatures, and do so wicked a
thing?
This question at once appeased the growing ire of the
half-offended Indian beauty. It completely got the better of
the prejudices of education, and turned all her thoughts to a
gentler and more feminine channel. At first, she looked
around her, suspiciously, as if distrusting eaves-droppers;
then she gazed wistfully into the face of her attentive
companion
;
after which this exhibition of girlish coquetry and
womanly feeling, terminated by her covering her face with
both her hands, and laughing in a strain that might well be
termed the melody of the woods. Dread of discovery,
however
,
soon put a stop to this
nave
exhibition of feeling, and
removing her hands, this creature of impulses gazed again
wistfully into the face of her companion, as if inquiring how
far she might trust a stranger with her secret. Although
Hetty had no claim to her sister's extraordinary beauty,
many thought her countenance the most winning of the two.
It expressed all the undisguised sincerity of her character,
and it was totally free from any of the unpleasant physical
accompaniments, that so frequently attend mental imbecility.
It is true that one accustomed to closer observation than
common, might have detected the proofs of her feebleness
of intellect in the language of her sometimes vacant eyes;
but they were signs that attracted sympathy by their total
want of guile, rather than any other feeling. The effect on
Hist, to use the English and more familiar translation of the
name, was favourable; and yielding to an impulse of
tenderness
,
she threw her arms around Hetty, and embraced her
with an outpouring emotion, so natural, that it was only
equalled by its warmth.
You
good, whispered the young Indian; you good,
I know; it so long since Wah-ta!-Wah have a frienda
sisterany body to speak her heart to! you Hist friend;
don't I say trut'?
I never had a friend, answered Hetty, returning the
warm embrace with unfeigned earnestness; I 've a sister,
but no friend. Judith loves me, and I love Judith; but
that's natural, and as we are taught in the Bible; but I
should
like to have a
friend!
I'll be your friend, with all
my heart; for I like your voice, and your smile, and your
way of thinking in every thing, except about the scalps
No t'ink more of himno say more of scalp,
interrupted
Hist, soothingly; you pale-face, I red-skin; we
bring up different fashion. Deerslayer and Chingachgook
great friend, and no the same colour; Hist andwhat your
name, pretty pale-face?
I am called Hetty, though when they spell the name in
the Bible, they always spell it, Esther.
What that make?no good, no harm. No need to
spell name at all. Moravian try to make Wah-ta!-Wah
spell, but no won't let him. No good for Delaware girl to
know too muchknow more than warrior some time; that
great shame. My name Wah-ta!-Wahthat say Hist, in
your tongue; you call him, HistI call him, Hetty.
These preliminaries settled to their mutual satisfaction,
the two girls began to discourse of their several hopes and
projects. Hetty made her new friend more fully acquainted
with her intentions in behalf of her father; and, to one in
the least addicted to prying into the affairs of others, Hist
would have betrayed her own feelings and expectations in
connection with the young warrior of her own tribe. Enough
was revealed on both sides, however, to let each party get a
tolerable insight into the views of the other, though enough
still remained in mental reservation, to give rise to the
following
questions and answers, with which the interview in
effect closed. As the quickest-witted, Hist, was the first with
her interrogatories. Folding an arm about the waist of
Hetty, she bent her head so as to look up playfully into the
face of the other; and, laughing, as if her meaning were to
be extracted from her looks, she spoke more plainly.
Hetty got broder, as well as fader? she said; why
no talk of broder, as well as fader?
I have no brother, Hist. I had one once, they say; but
he is dead many a year, and lies buried in the lake, by the
side of mother.
No got brodergot a young warrior; love him, almost
as much as fader, eh? Very handsome, and brave-looking;
fit to be chief, if he
good
as he
seem
to be.
It's wicked to love any man as well as I love my father,
and so I strive not to do it, Hist, returned the conscientious
Hetty, who knew not how to conceal an emotion by an
approach
to an untruth as venial as an evasion, though
powerfully
tempted by female shame to err; though I
sometimes
think wickedness will get the better of me, if Hurry
comes so often to the lake. I
must
tell you the truth, dear
Hist, because you ask me; but I should fall down and die
in the woods, if he knew it!
Why he no ask you, himself? Brave lookingwhy not
bold speaking? Young warrior ought to ask young girl; no
make young girl speak first. Mingo girls too shame for
that
.
This was said indignantly, and with the generous warmth
a young female of spirit would be apt to feel, at what she
deemed an invasion of her sex's most valued privilege. It
had little influence on the simple-minded, but also just-minded
Hetty; who, though inherently feminine in all her impulses,
was much more alive to the workings of her own heart, than
to any of the usages with which convention has protected
the sensitiveness of her sex.
Ask me
what?
the startled girl demanded, with a
suddenness
that proved how completely her fears had been
aroused. Ask me, if I like him as well as I do my own
father! Oh! I hope he will never put such a question to
me,
for I should have to answer, and that would
kill
me!
Nonono kill,
quite
almost, returned the other,
laughing in spite of herself. Make blush comemake
shame come, too; but he no stay great while; then feel
happier than ever. Young warrior must tell young girl he
want to make wife, else never can live in his wigwam.
Hurry don't want to marry menobody will ever want
to marry me, Hist.
How you can know? P'r'aps every body want to
marry you, and by-and-bye, tongue say what heart feel.
Why nobody want to marry you?
I am not full-witted, they say. Father often tells me
this; and so does Judith, sometimes, when she is vexed;
but I shouldn't so much mind them, as I did mother.
She
said so
once;
and then she cried as if her heart would
break; and, so, I
know
I'm not full-witted.
Hist gazed at the gentle, simple, girl, for quite a
minute
,
without speaking; when the truth appeared to flash
all at once on the mind of the young Indian maid. Pity,
reverence, and tenderness seemed struggling together in her
breast; and then, rising suddenly, she indicated a wish to
her companion that she would accompany her to the camp,
which was situated at no great distance. This unexpected
change, from the precaution that Hist had previously
manifested
a desire to use, in order to prevent being seen, to an
open exposure of the person of her friend, arose from the
perfect conviction that no Indian would harm a being whom
the Great Spirit had disarmed, by depriving it of its strongest
defence, reason. In this respect, nearly all unsophisticated
nations resemble each other; appearing to offer
spontaneously
,
by a feeling creditable to human nature, that
protection
by their own forbearance, which has been withheld by
the inscrutable wisdom of Providence. Wah-ta!-Wah,
indeed
,
knew that, in many tribes, the mentally imbecile and
the mad, were held in a species of religious reverence;
receiving
from the untutored inhabitants of the forest respect
and honours, instead of the contumely and neglect that it is
their fortune to meet with, among the more pretending and
sophisticated.
Hetty accompanied her new friend without apprehension
or reluctance. It was her wish to reach the camp; and,
sustained by her motives, she felt no more concern for the
consequences, than did her companion herself, now the latter
was apprised of the character of the protection that the
pale-face
maiden carried with her. Still, as they proceeded slowly
along a shore that was tangled with overhanging bushes,
Hetty continued the discourse, assuming the office of
interrogating
,
which the other had instantly dropped, as soon as
she ascertained the character of the mind to which her
questions
had been addressed.
But
you
are not half-witted, said Hetty; and there's
no reason why the Serpent should not marry you.
Hist prisoner, and Mingo got large ear. No speak of
Chingachgook when they by. Promise Hist that, good
Hetty.
I knowI know, returned Hetty, half-whispering, in
her eagerness to let the other see she understood the
necessity
of caution. I knowDeerslayer and the Serpent
mean to get you away from the Iroquois; and you wish me
not to tell the secret.
How you know? said Hist, hastily; vexed at the
moment
,
that the other was not even more feeble-minded than
was actually the case. How you know? Better not to
talk of any but fader and Hurry; Mingo understand
that;
he no understand
t'other
. Promise you no talk about what
you no understand.
But I
do
understand this, Hist; and so I
must
talk about
it. Deerslayer as good as told father all about it, in my
presence; and, as nobody told me not to listen, I overheard
it all, as I did Hurry and father's discourse about the
scalps.
Very bad for pale-faces to talk about scalps, and very
bad for young woman to hear over! Now you love Hist, I
know, Hetty, and so, among Indians, when love hardest
never talk most.
That's not the way among white people, who talk most
about them they love best. I suppose it's because I 'm only
half-witted that I don't see the reason why it should be so
different among red people.
That what Deerslayer call their gift. One gift to talk;
t'other gift to hold their tongue. Hold-tongue your gift,
among Mingos. If Serpent want to see Hist, so do Hetty
want to see Hurry. A good girl never tell secret of a
friend.
Hetty understood this appeal; and she promised the
Delaware girl not to make any allusion to the presence of
Chingachgook, or to the motive of his visit to the lake.
Maybe he get off Hurry and fader, as well as Hist, if let
him have his way, whispered Wah-ta!-Wah to her
companion
,
in a confiding, flattering way, just as they got near
enough to the encampment to hear the voices of several of
their own sex, who were apparently occupied in the usual
toils of women of their class. Think of that Hetty, and put
two, twenty finger on mouth. No get friends free without
Serpent do it.
A better expedient could not have been adopted, to secure
the silence and discretion of Hetty, than that which was now
presented to her mind. As the liberation of her father and
the young frontier-man was the great object of her
adventure
,
she felt the connection between it and the services of
the Delaware; and with an innocent laugh, she nodded her
head, and in the same suppressed manner, promised a due
attention to the wishes of her friend. Thus assured, Hist
tarried no longer, but immediately and openly led the way
into the encampment of her captors.
CHAPTER XI.
The great King of kings
Hath in the table of his law commanded,
That thou shalt do no murder.
Take heed; for he holds vengeance in his hand,
To hurl upon their heads that break his law.
Shakspeare
.
That
the party to which Hist compulsorily belonged was
not one that was regularly on the war-path, was evident by
the presence of females. It was a small fragment of a
tribe that had been hunting and fishing within the English
limits, where it was found by the commencement of
hostilities
,
and, after passing the winter and spring by living on
what was strictly the property of its enemies, it chose to
strike a hostile blow before it finally retired. There was
also deep Indian sagacity in the manuvre which had led
them so far into the territory of their foes. When the
runner
arrived who announced the breaking out of hostilities
between the English and Frencha struggle that was
certain
to carry with it all the tribes that dwelt within the
influence
of the respective belligerentsthis particular party
of the Iroquois were posted on the shores of the Oneida, a
lake that lies some fifty miles nearer to their own frontier
than that which is the scene of our tale. To have fled in
a direct line for the Canadas, would have exposed them to
the dangers of a direct pursuit; and the chiefs had
determined
to adopt the expedient of penetrating deeper into a
region that had now become dangerous, in the hope of being
able to retire in the rear of their pursuers, instead of
having
them on their trail. The presence of the women had
induced the attempt at this
ruse;
the strength of these
feebler members of the party being unequal to the effort of
escaping from the pursuit of warriors. When the reader
remembers the vast extent of the American wilderness, at
that early day, he will perceive that it was possible for even
a tribe to remain months undiscovered in particular portions
of it; nor was the danger of encountering a foe, the usual
precautions being observed, as great in the woods, as it is
on the high seas, in a time of active warfare.
The encampment being temporary, it offered to the eye
no more than the rude protection of a bivouac, relieved in
some slight degree by the ingenious expedients which
suggested themselves to the readiness of those who passed
their lives amid similar scenes. One fire, that had been
kindled against the roots of a living oak, sufficed for the
whole party; the weather being too mild to require it for
any purpose but cooking. Scattered around this centre of
attraction, were some fifteen or twenty low huts
perhaps
kennels would be a better wordinto which their
different
owners crept at night, and which were also intended
to meet the exigencies of a storm. These little huts were
made of the branches of trees, put together with some
ingenuity
,
and they were uniformly topped with bark that had
been stripped from fallen trees; of which every virgin forest
possesses hundreds, in all stages of decay. Of furniture,
they had next to none. Cooking utensils of the simplest
Vol. I.16
sort were lying near the fire; a few articles of clothing
were to be seen in, or around the huts; rifles, horns, and
pouches leaned against the trees, or were suspended from
the lower branches; and the carcases of two or three deer
were stretched to view on the same natural shambles.
As the encampment was in the midst of a dense wood,
the eye could not take in its
tout ensemble
at a glance; but
hut after hut started out of the gloomy picture, as one gazed
about him in quest of objects. There was no centre, unless
the fire might be so consideredno open area where the
possessors of this rude village might congregate; but all
was concealed, dark, covert and cunning, like its owners.
A few children strayed from hut to hut, giving the
spot a little the air of domestic life; and the suppressed
laugh, and low voices of the women occasionally broke in
upon the deep stillness of the sombre forest. As for the
men, they either ate, slept, or examined their arms. They
conversed but little, and then usually apart, or in groups
withdrawn from the females; whilst an air of untiring,
innate
watchfulness and apprehension of danger seemed to be
blended even with their slumbers.
As the two girls came near the encampment, Hetty
uttered
a slight exclamation, on catching a view of the person
of her father. He was seated on the ground, with his back
to a tree, and Hurry stood near him, indolently whittling a
twig. Apparently they were as much at liberty as any
others in or about the camp; and one unaccustomed to
Indian usages would have mistaken them for visiters,
instead
of supposing them to be captives. Wah-ta!-Wah led
her new friend quite near them, and then modestly
withdrew
,
that her own presence might be no restraint on her
feelings. But Hetty was not sufficiently familiar with
caresses, or outward demonstrations of fondness, to indulge
in any outbreaking of feeling. She merely approached and
stood at her father's side without speaking, resembling a
silent statue of filial affection. The old man expressed
neither
alarm, nor surprise, at her sudden appearance. In
these particulars, he had caught the stoicism of the Indians;
well knowing that there was no more certain mode of
securing
their respect than by imitating their self-command. Nor
did the savages themselves betray the least sign of emotion
at this sudden appearance of a stranger among them. In a
word, this arrival produced much less visible sensation,
though occurring under circumstances so peculiar, than
would be seen in a village of higher pretensions to
civilization
,
did an ordinary traveller drive up to the door of its
principal inn. Still, a few warriors collected, and it was
evident
by the manner in which they glanced at Hetty as they
conversed together, that she was the subject of their
discourse
,
and probable that the reasons of her unlooked-for
appearance were matters of discussion. This phlegm of
manner is characteristic of the North American Indian
some say of his white successor alsobut, in this case,
much should be attributed to the peculiar situation in which
the party was placed. The force in the ark, the presence
of Chingachgook excepted, was well known, no tribe or
body of troops was believed to be near, and vigilant eyes
were posted round the entire lake, watching, day and night,
the slightest movement of those whom it would not be
exaggerated
now to term the besieged.
Hutter was inwardly much moved by the conduct of
Hetty, though he affected so much indifference of manner.
He recollected her gentle appeal to him, before he left the
ark, and misfortune rendered that of weight, which might
have been forgotten amid the triumph of success. Then he
knew the simple, single-hearted fidelity of this child, and
understood why she had come, and the total disregard of
self that reigned in all her acts.
This is not well, Hetty, he said, deprecating the
consequences
to the girl herself, more than any other evil.
These are fierce Iroquois, and as little apt to forget an
injury, as a favour.
Tell me, father, returned the girl, looking furtively
about her, as if fearful of being overheard, did God let
you do the cruel errand on which you came? I want much
to know this, that I may speak to the Indians plainly, if he
did not.
You should not have come hither, Hetty; these brutes
will not understand your nature, or your intentions!
How was it, father? neither you, nor Hurry, seems to
have any thing that looks like scalps.
If that will set your mind at peace, child, I can answer
you, no. I had caught the young creatur' who came here
with you, but her screeches soon brought down upon me a
troop of the wild-cats, that was too much for any single
Christian to withstand. If that will do you any good, we
are as innocent of having taken a scalp this time, as I
make no doubt we shall also be innocent of receiving the
bounty.
Thank you for that, father! Now I can speak boldly
to the Iroquois, and with an easy conscience. I hope
Hurry
,
too, has not been able to harm any of the Indians?
Why, as to that matter, Hetty, returned the individual
in question, you 've put it pretty much in the nat
y
ve
character
of the religious truth. Hurry has not been
able,
and
that is the long and short of it. I 've seen many squalls,
old fellow, both on land and on the water, but never did I
feel one as lively and as snappish as that which come down
upon us, night afore last, in the shape of an Indian
hurrah-boys
!
Why, Hetty, you 're no great matter at a reason,
or an idee that lies a little deeper than common; but you're
human, and have some human notions;now, I 'll just ask
you to look at these circumstances. Here was old Tom,
your father, and myself, bent on a legal operation, as is to
be seen in the words of the law and the proclamation,
thinking
no harm; when we were set upon by critturs that were
more like a back of hungry wolves, than mortal savages
even, and there they had us tethered like two sheep, in less
time than it has taken me to tell you the story.
You are free now, Hurry, returned Hetty, glancing
timidly at the fine unfettered limbs of the young giant.
You have no cords, or withes, to pain your arms, or legs,
now.
Not I, Hetty. Natur' is natur', and freedom is natur',
too. My limbs have a free look, but that's pretty much
the amount of it, sin' I can't use them in the way I should
like. Even these trees have eyes; ay, and tongues,
too; for was the old man, here, or I, to start one single rod
beyond our gaol limits, sarvice would be put on the bail
afore we could `gird up our loins' for a race; and, like as
not, four or five rifle-bullets would be travelling after us,
carrying so many invitations to curb our impatience. There
isn't a gaol in the Colony as tight as this we are now in;
for I've tried the vartue of two or three on 'em, and I
know the mater'als they are made of, as well as the men
that made 'em; takin' down being the next step in schoolin'
to puttin' up, in all such fabrications.
Lest the reader should get an exaggerated opinion of
Hurry's demerits, from this boastful and indiscreet
revelation
,
it may be well to say that his offences were confined
to assaults and batteries, for several of which he had been
imprisoned, when, as he has just said, he often escaped by
demonstrating the flimsiness of the constructions in which
he was confined, by opening for himself doors, in spots
where the architects had neglected to place them. But
Hetty had no knowledge of gaols, and little of the nature
of crime, beyond what her unadulterated and almost
instinctive
perceptions of right and wrong taught her, and
this sally of the rude being who had spoken, was lost upon
her. She understood his general meaning, however, and
answered in reference to that alone.
It's so best, Hurry, she said. It is best father and
you should be quiet and peaceable, till I have spoken to the
Iroquois, when all will be well and happy. I don't wish
either of you to follow, but leave me to myself. As soon
as all is settled, and you are at liberty to go back to the
castle, I will come and let you know it.
Hetty spoke with so much simple earnestness, seemed so
confident of success, and wore so high an air of moral
feeling
and truth, that both the listeners felt more disposed to
attach an importance to her mediation, than might otherwise
have happened. When she manifested an intention to quit
them, therefore, they offered no obstacle, though they saw
she was about to join the group of chiefs who were
consulting
apart, seemingly on the manner and motive of her own
sudden appearance.
When Histfor so we love best to call herquitted her
companion, she strayed near one or two of the elder
warriors
,
who had shown her most kindness in her captivity,
the principal man of whom, had even offered to adopt her
as his child, if she would consent to become a Huron.
In taking this direction, the shrewd girl did so to invite
inquiry
.
She was too well trained in the habits of her
people
,
to obtrude the opinions of one of her sex and years on
16*
men and warriors; but nature had furnished a tact and
ingenuity that enabled her to attract the attention she
desired, without wounding the pride of those whom it was
her duty to defer to and respect. Even her affected
indifference
stimulated curiosity; and Hetty had hardly reached
the side of her father, before the Delaware girl was brought
within the circle of the warriors, by a secret but significant
gesture. Here she was questioned as to the presence of her
companion, and the motives that had brought her to the camp.
This was all that Hist desired. She explained the manner
in which she had detected the weakness of Hetty's reason,
rather exaggerating than lessening the deficiency in her
intellect; and then she related, in general terms, the object
of the girl in venturing among her enemies. The effect
was all that the speaker expected; her account investing
the person and character of their visiter with a sacredness
and respect, that she well knew would prove her protection.
As soon as her own purpose was attained, Hist withdrew
to a distance, where, with female consideration, and a
sisterly
tenderness, she set about the preparation of a meal,
that was to be offered to her new friend, as soon as the
latter
might be at liberty to partake of it. While thus
occupied
,
however, the ready girl in no degree relaxed in her
watchfulness; noting every change of countenance among
the chiefs, every movement of Hetty, and the smaller
occurrences
that could be likely to affect her own interests, or
that of her new friend.
As Hetty approached the chiefs, they opened their little
circle, with an ease and deference of manner, that would
have done credit to men of more courtly origin. A fallen
tree lay near, and the oldest of the warriors made a quiet
sign for the girl to be seated on it, taking his place at her
side, with the gentleness of a father. The others arranged
themselves around the two, with grave dignity; and then
the girl, who had sufficient observation to perceive that such
a course was expected of her, began to reveal the object of
her visit. The moment she opened her mouth to speak,
however, the old chief gave a gentle sign for her to forbear,
said a few words to one of his juniors, and then waited in
silent
patience until the latter had summoned Hist to the party.
This interruption proceeded from the chief's having
discovered
that there existed a necessity for an interpreter; few
of the Hurons present understanding the English language,
and they but imperfectly.
Wah-ta!-Wah was not sorry to be called upon to be present
at the interview, and least of all in the character in which she
was now wanted. She was aware of the hazards she ran,
in attempting to deceive one or two of the party; but was
none the less resolved to use every means that offered, and
to practise every artifice that an Indian education could
supply, to conceal the facts of the vicinity of her betrothed,
and of the errand on which he had come. One
unpractised
in the expedients and opinions of savage life, would not
have suspected the readiness of invention, the wariness of
action, the high resolution, the noble impulses, the deep
self-devotion
,
and the feminine disregard of self, where the
affections
were concerned, that lay concealed beneath the demure
looks, the mild eye, and the sunny smiles of this young
Indian beauty. As she approached them, the grim old
warriors
regarded her with pleasure; for they had a secret
pride in the hope of engrafting so rare a scion on the stock
of their own nation; adoption being as regularly practised,
and as distinctly recognized among the tribes of America,
as it ever had been among those nations that submit to the
sway of the civil law.
As soon as Hist was seated by the side of Hetty, the old
chief desired her to ask the fair young pale-face what had
brought her among the Iroquois, and what they could do to
serve her.
Tell them, Hist, who I amThomas Hutter's youngest
daughter; Thomas Hutter, the oldest of their two prisoners;
he who owns the castle and the ark, and who has the best
right to be thought the owner of these hills, and that lake,
since he has dwelt so long, and trapped so long, and fished
so long, among them. They'll know whom you mean by
Thomas Hutter, if you tell them
that
. And then tell them
that I've come here to convince them they ought not to
harm father and Hurry, but let them go in peace, and to
treat them as brothers, rather than as enemies. Now tell
them all this plainly, Hist, and fear nothing for yourself or
me; God will protect us.
Wah-ta!-Wah did as the other desired; taking care to
render the words of her friend as literally as possible into
the Iroquois tongue, a language she used with a readiness
almost equal to that with which she spoke her own. The
chiefs heard this opening explanation, with grave decorum;
the two who had a little knowledge of English, intimating
their satisfaction with the interpreter, by furtive but
significant
glances of the eyes.
And, now, Hist, continued Hetty, as soon as it was
intimated
to her that she might proceed; and, now, Hist, I
wish you to tell these red men, word for word, what I am
about to say. Tell them first, that father and Hurry came
here with an intention to take as many scalps as they could;
for the wicked governor and the province have offered
money
for scalps; whether of warriors, or women, men or
children; and the love of gold was too strong for their
hearts to withstand it. Tell them this, dear Hist, just as
you have heard it from me, word for word.
Wah-ta!-Wah hesitated about rendering this speech as
literally as had been desired; but detecting the intelligence
of those who understood English, and apprehending even a
greater knowledge than they actually possessed, she found
herself compelled to comply. Contrary to what a civilized
man would have expected, the admission of the motives and
of the errands of their prisoners, produced no visible effect,
on either the countenances or the feelings of the listeners.
They probably considered the act meritorious, and that
which neither of them would have hesitated to perform in his
own person, he would not be apt to censure in another.
And, now, Hist, resumed Hetty, as soon as she
perceived
that her first speeches were understood by the chiefs;
you can tell them more. They know that father and
Hurry did not succeed; and therefore they can bear them
no grudge for any harm that has been done. If they had
slain their children and wives, it would not alter the matter;
and I'm not certain that what I am about to tell them would
not have more weight had there been mischief done. But
ask them first, Hist, if they know there is a God, who reigns
over the whole earth, and is ruler and chief of all who live,
let them be red, or white, or what colour they may?
Wah-ta!-Wah looked a little surprised at this question;
for the idea of the Great Spirit is seldom long absent from
the mind of an Indian girl. She put the question, as
literally
as possible, however, and received a grave answer in
the affirmative.
This is right, continued Hetty, and my duty will
now be light. This Great Spirit, as you call our God, has
caused a book to be written, that we call a Bible; and in
this book have been set down all his commandments, and his
holy will and pleasure, and the rules by which all men are
to live, and directions how to govern the thoughts even, and
the wishes, and the will. Here, this is one of these holy
books, and you must tell the chiefs what I am about to read
to them from its sacred pages.
As Hetty concluded, she reverently unrolled a small
English Bible from its envelope of coarse calico; treating
the volume with the sort of external respect that a Romanist
would be apt to show to a religious relic. As she slowly
proceeded in her task, the grim warriors watched each
movement with riveted eyes; and when they saw the little
volume appear, a slight expression of surprise escaped one
or two of them. But Hetty held it out towards them, in
triumph
,
as if she expected the sight would produce a visible
miracle; and then, without betraying either surprise or
mortification
at the stoicism of the Indian, she turned eagerly to
her new friend, in order to renew the discourse.
This is the sacred volume, Hist, she said, and these
words, and lines, and verses, and chapters, all came from
God!
Why the Great Spirit no send book to Indian, too?
demanded
Hist, with the directness of a mind that was totally
unsophisticated.
Why? answered Hetty, a little bewildered by a
question
so unexpected. Why?Ah! you know the Indians
don't know how to read.
If Hist was not satisfied with this explanation, she did not
deem the point of sufficient importance to be pressed.
Simply bending her body, in gentle admission of the truth
of what she heard, she sat patiently awaiting the further
arguments
of the pale-face enthusiast.
You can tell these chiefs, that throughout this book, men
are ordered to forgive their enemies; to treat them as they
would brethren; and never to injure their fellow-creatures,
more especially on account of revenge, or any evil passion.
Do you think you can tell them this, so that they will
understand
it, Hist?
Tell him well enough; but he no very easy to
understand
.
Hist then conveyed the ideas of Hetty, in the best manner
she could, to the attentive Indians; who heard her words,
with some such surprise as an American of our own times
would be apt to betray at a suggestion that the great modern,
but vacillating ruler of things human, public opinion, might
be wrong. One or two of their number, however, having
met with missionaries, said a few words in explanation, and
then the group gave all its attention to the communications
that were to follow. Before Hetty resumed, she inquired
earnestly of Hist if the chiefs had understood her, and
receiving
an evasive answer, was fain to be satisfied.
I will now read to the warriors some of the verses that
it is good for them to know, continued the girl, whose
manner
grew more solemn and earnest as she proceeded; and
they will remember that they are the very words of the
Great Spirit. First, then, ye are commanded to `
Love thy
neighbour as thyself
.' Tell them
that,
dear Hist.
Neighbour for Indian, no mean pale-face, answered the
Delaware girl, with more decision than she had hitherto
thought it necessary to use. Neighbour mean Iroquois
for Iroquois, Mohican for Mohican, pale-face for pale-face.
No need tell chief any thing else.
You forget, Hist, these are the words of the Great Spirit,
and the chiefs must obey them as well as others. Here is
another commandment: `
Whosoever shall smite thee on the
right cheek, turn to him the other also
.
What that mean? demanded Hist, with the quickness
of lightning.
Hetty explained that it was an order not to resent injuries,
but rather to submit to receive fresh wrongs from the
offender
.
And hear this, too, Hist, she added,  `
Love your
enemies
,
bless them that curse you, do good to them that hate
you, and pray for them which despitefully use you and
persecute
you
.'
By this time Hetty had become excited; her eye gleamed
with the earnestness of her feelings, her cheeks flushed, and
her voice, usually so low and modulated, became stronger
and more impressive. With the Bible she had been early
made familiar by her mother; and she now turned from
passage to passage, with surprising rapidity, taking care to
cull such verses as taught the sublime lessons of Christian
charity and Christian forgiveness. To translate half she
said, in her pious earnestness, Wah-ta!-Wah would have
found impracticable, had she made the effort; but wonder
held her tongue-tied, equally with the chiefs; and the young,
simple-minded enthusiast, had fairly become exhausted with
her own efforts, before the other opened her mouth, again,
to utter a syllable. Then, indeed, the Delaware girl gave a
brief translation of the substance of what had been both read
and said, confining herself to one or two of the more striking
of the verses, those that had struck her own imagination as
the most paradoxical, and which certainly would have been
the most applicable to the case, could the uninstructed minds
of the listeners embrace the great moral truths they
conveyed
.
It will be scarcely necessary to tell the reader the effect
that such novel duties would be likely to produce among a
group of Indian warriors, with whom it was a species of
religious
principle never to forget a benefit, or to forgive an
injury. Fortunately, the previous explanations of Hist had
prepared the minds of the Hurons for something
extravagant
;
and most of that which to them seemed inconsistent
and paradoxical, was accounted for by the fact that the
speaker possessed a mind that was constituted differently
from those of most of the human race. Still there were one
or two old men who had heard similar doctrines from the
missionaries, and they felt a desire to occupy an idle
moment
by pursuing a subject that they found so curious.
This is the Good Book of the pale-faces, observed one
of these chiefs, taking the volume from the unresisting hand
of Hetty, who gazed anxiously at his face, while he turned
the leaves, as if she expected to witness some visible results
from the circumstance. This is the law by which my
white brethren profess to live?
Hist, to whom this question was addressed, if it might be
considered as addressed to any one in particular, answered
simply in the affirmative; adding that both the French of
the Canadas, and the Yengeese of the British provinces
equally admitted its authority, and affected to revere its
principles.
Tell my young sister, said the Huron, looking
directly
at Hist, that I will open my mouth and say a few
words.
The Iroquois chief go to speakmy pale-face friend
listen, said Hist.
I rejoice to hear it! exclaimed Hetty. God has
touched his heart, and he will now let father and Hurry
go!
This is the pale-face law, resumed the chief. It
tells him to do good to them that hurt him; and when his
brother asks him for his rifle, to give him the powder-horn,
too. Such is the pale-face law?
Not sonot so, answered Hetty earnestly, when these
words had been interpreted. There is not a word about
rifles in the whole book; and powder and bullets give offence
to the Great Spirit.
Why, then, does the pale-face use them? If he is
ordered
to
give
double to him that asks only for one thing,
why does he
take
double from the poor Indians, who ask
for
no
thing? He comes from beyond the rising sun,
with his book in his hand, and he teaches the red-man to
read it; but why does he forget, himself, all it says? When
the Indian gives, he is never satisfied; and now he offers
gold for the scalps of our women and children, though he
calls us beasts if we take the scalp of a warrior killed in
open war. My name is Rivenoak.
When Hetty had got this formidable question fairly
presented
to her mind in the translation, and Hist did her duty
with more than usual readiness, on this occasion, it scarcely
need be said that she was sorely perplexed. Abler heads
than that of this poor girl have frequently been puzzled by
questions of a similar drift; and it is not surprising, that
with all her own earnestness and sincerity, she did not know
what answer to make.
What shall I tell them, Hist? she asked imploringly;
I
know
that all I have read from the book is true; and yet
it wouldn't seem to be so, would it, by the conduct of those
to whom the book was given?
Give 'em pale-face reason, returned Hist, ironically;
that always good for one side; though he bad for t'other.
No, no, Hist, there can't be two sides to truthand
yet it does seem strange! I'm certain I have read the verses
right, and no one would be so wicked as to print the word
of God wrong.
That
can never be, Hist.
Well, to poor Indian girl, it seem every thing
can
be to
pale-faces; returned the other, coolly. One time 'ey say
white, and one time 'ey say black. Why, then,
never can
be?
Hetty was more and more embarrassed, until, overcome
with the apprehension that she had failed in her object, and
that the lives of her father and Hurry would be the forfeit
of some blunder of her own, she burst into tears. From
that moment the manner of Hist lost all its irony and cool
indifference, and she became the fond caressing friend again.
Throwing her arms around the afflicted girl, she attempted
to soothe her sorrows by the scarcely ever failing remedy
of female sympathy.
Stop cryno cry, she said, wiping the tears from the
face of Hetty, as she would have performed the same office
for a child, and stopping to press her, occasionally, to her
own warm bosom with the affection of a sister; why you
so trouble? You no make he book, if he be wrong; and
you no make he pale-face, if he wicked. There wicked
red-man
,
and wicked white manno colour all goodno
colour all wicked. Chiefs know
that
well enough.
Hetty soon recovered from this sudden burst of grief, and
then her mind reverted to the purpose of her visit, with all its
single-hearted earnestness. Perceiving that the
grim-looking
chiefs were still standing around her, in grave attention,
she hoped that another effort to convince them of the right
might be successful.
Listen, Hist, she said, struggling to suppress her sobs,
and to speak distinctly; tell the chiefs that it matters not
what the wicked doright is rightthe words of the
Great Spirit are the words of the Great Spiritand no one
can go harmless for doing an evil act, because another has
done it before him! `
Render good for evil,
' says this book;
Vol. I.17
and that is the law for the red-man as well as for the white
man.
Never hear such a law among Delaware, or among
Iroquois, answered Hist, soothingly. No good to tell
chiefs any such law as
that
. Tell 'em somet'ing they
believe
.
Hist was about to proceed, notwithstanding, when a tap
on the shoulder, from the finger of the oldest chief, caused
her to look up. She then perceived that one of the warriors
had left the group, and was already returning to it with
Hutter
and Hurry. Understanding that the two last were to
become parties in the inquiry, she became mute, with the
unhesitating obedience of an Indian woman. In a few
seconds the prisoners stood face to face with the principal
men of the captors.
Daughter, said the senior chief to the young Delaware,
ask this greybeard why he came into our camp?
The question was put by Hist, in her own imperfect
Engglish
,
but in a way that was easy to be understood. Hutter
was too stern and obdurate, by nature, to shrink from the
consequences of any of his acts, and he was also too
familiar
with the opinions of the savages not to understand that
nothing was to be gained by equivocation, or an unmanly
dread of their anger. Without hesitating, therefore, he
avowed the purpose with which he had landed, merely
justifying
it by the fact that the government of the province
had bid high for scalps. This frank avowal was received
by the Iroquois with evident satisfication, not so much,
however
,
on account of the advantage it gave them, in a moral
point of view, as by proving that they had captured a
man worthy of occupying their thoughts, and of becoming
a subject of their revenge. Hurry, when interrogated,
confessed
the truth, though he would have been more disposed
to concealment than his sterner companion, did the
circumstances
very well admit of its adoption. But he had tact
enough to discover that equivocation would be useless, at
that moment, and he made a merit of necessity by imitating
a frankness, which, in the case of Hutter, was the offspring
of habits of indifference, acting on a disposition that was
always ruthless and reckless of personal consequences.
As soon as the chiefs had received the answers to their
questions, they walked away in silence, like men who deemed
the matter disposed of, all Hetty's dogmas being thrown
away on beings trained in violence, from infancy to
manhood
.
Hetty and Hist were now left alone with Hutter and
Hurry, no visible restraint being placed on the movements
of either; though all four, in fact, were vigilantly and
unceasingly
watched. As respects the men, care was had to
prevent them from getting possession of any of the rifles
that lay scattered about, their own included; and there all
open manifestations of watchfulness ceased. But they, who
were so experienced in Indian practices, knew too well how
great was the distance between appearances and reality, to
become the dupes of this seeming carelessness. Although
both thought incessantly of the means of escape, and this
without concert, each was aware of the uselessness of
attempting
any project of the sort that was not deeply laid,
and promptly executed. They had been long enough in the
encampment, and were sufficiently observant to have
ascertained
that Hist, also, was a sort of captive; and, presuming
on the circumstance, Hutter spoke in her presence more
openly than he might otherwise have thought it prudent to
do; inducing Hurry to be equally unguarded by his
example
.
I'll not blame you, Hetty, for coming on this errand,
which was well meant, if not very wisely planned,
commenced
the father, seating himself by the side of his
daughter
,
and taking her hand; a sign of affection that this rude
being was accustomed to manifest to this particular child;
but preaching, and the Bible, are not the means to turn an
Indian from his ways. Has Deerslayer sent any message;
or has he any scheme by which he thinks to get us free?
Ay, that's the substance of it! put in Hurry; if you
can help us, gal, to half a mile of freedom, or even a good
start of a short quarter, I'll answer for the rest. Perhaps
the old man may want a little more, but for one of my height
and years,
that
will meet all objections.
Hetty looked distressed, turning her eyes from one to the
other; but she had no answer to give to the question of the
reckless Hurry.
Father, she said, neither Deerslayer nor Judith knew
of my coming, until I had left the ark. They are afraid the
Iroquois will make a raft, and try to get off to the hut, and
think more of defending
that,
than of coming to aid you.
Nonono, said Hist hurriedly, though in a low
voice, and with her face bent towards the earth, in order to
conceal from those whom she knew to be watching them the
fact of her speaking at all. No, no, no, Deerslayer
different
man. He no t'ink of defending 'self, with a friend in
danger. Help one another, and all get to hut.
This sounds well, old Tom, said Hurry, winking and
laughing, though he too used the precaution to speak low.
Give me a ready-witted squaw for a fri'nd, and though I'll
not downright defy an Iroquois, I think I would defy the
devil.
No talk loud, said Hist; some Iroquois got Yengeese
tongue, and all got Yengeese ear.
Have we a friend in you, young woman? inquired
Hutter, with an increasing interest in the conference. If
so, you may calculate on a solid reward; and nothing will
be easier than to send you to your own tribe, if we can once
fairly get you off with us to the castle. Give us the ark,
and the canoes, and we can command the lake, spite of all
the savages in the Canadas. Nothing but artillery could
drive us out of the castle, if we can get back to it.
S'pose 'ey come ashore to take scalp? retorted Hist,
with cool irony, at which the girl appeared to be more
expert
than is common for her sex.
Ay, aythat was a mistake; but there is little use in
lamentations, and less still, young woman, in flings.
Father, said Hetty, Judith thinks of breaking open
the big chest, in hopes of finding something in
that
which
may buy your freedom of the savages.
A dark look came over Hutter, at the announcement of
this fact, and he muttered his dissatisfaction in a way to
render it intelligible to all present.
What for no break open chest? put in Hist. Life
sweeter than old chestscalp sweeter than old chest. If
no tell darter to break him open, Wah-ta!-wah no help him
to run away.
Ye know not what ye askye are but silly girls, and
the wisest way, for ye both, is to speak of what ye
understand
,
and to speak of nothing else. I little like this cold
neglect of the savages, Hurry; it's a proof that they think
of something serious, and, if we are to do any thing, we
must do it soon. Can we count on this young woman,
think you?
Listen, said Hist, quickly, and with an earnestness
that proved how much her feelings were concerned;
Wah-ta
!-wah
no Iroquoisall over Delawaregot Delaware
heartDelaware feeling. She prisoner, too. One
prisoner
help t'other prisoner. No good to talk more, now.
Darter stay with fatherWah-ta!-wah come and see friend
all look right
then
tell what he do.
This was said in a low voice, but distinctly, and in a
manner to make an impression. As soon as it was uttered,
the girl arose and left the group, walking composedly
towards
the hut she occupied, as if she had no further interest
in what might pass between the three pale-faces.
CHAPTER XII.
She speaks much of her father; says she hears
There's tricks i'the world; and hems, and beats her heart;
Spurns enviously at straws; speaks things in doubt,
That carry but half sense; her speech is nothing,
Yet the unsuspected use of it doth move
The hearers to collection;
Shakspeare
.
We
left the occupants of the castle and the ark, buried in
sleep. Once or twice, in the course of the night, it is true,
Deerslayer, or the Delaware, arose and looked out upon the
tranquil lake, when, finding all safe, they returned to their
pallets, and slept like men who were not easily deprived of
their natural rest. At the first signs of the dawn, the
former
arose, however, and made his personal arrangements
for the day; though his companion, whose nights had not
been tranquil, or without disturbance, of late, continued on his
blanket until the sun had fairly risen. Judith, too, was later
than common, that morning, for the earlier hours of the
17*
night had brought her little of either refreshment or sleep.
But ere the sun had shown himself over the eastern hills,
these, too, were up and afoot; even the tardy, in that region,
seldom remaining on their pallets after the appearance of
the great luminary.
Chingachgook was in the act of arranging his forest toilet,
when Deerslayer entered the cabin of the ark, and threw
him a few coarse, but light summer vestments, that belonged
to Hutter.
Judith hath given me them for your use, chief, said
the latter, as he cast the jacket and trousers at the feet of
the Indian; for it's ag'in all prudence and caution to be
seen in your war-dress and paint. Wash off all them fiery
streaks from your cheeks, put on these garments, and here
is a hat, such as it is, that will give you an awful oncivilized
sort of civilization, as the missionaries call it. Remember
that Hist is at hand, and what we do for the maiden, must
be done while we are doing for others. I know its ag'in
your gifts and your natur' to wear clothes, unless they are
cut and carried in a red man's fashion, but make a vartue
of necessity, and put these on, at once, even if they do rise
a little in your throat.
Chingachgook, or the Serpent, eyed the vestments with
strong disgust; but he saw the usefulness of the disguise, if
not its absolute necessity. Should the Iroquois discover a
red-man in or about the castle, it might, indeed, place them
more on their guard, and give their suspicions a direction
towards
their female captive. Any thing was better than a
failure
,
as it regarded his betrothed, and, after turning the
different
garments round and round, examining them with a species
of grave irony, affecting to draw them on in a way that
defeated
itself, and otherwise manifesting the reluctance of a
young savage to confine his limbs in the usual applicances
of civilized life, the chief submitted to the directions of his
companion, and finally stood forth, so far as the eye could
detect, a red-man in colour alone. Little was to be
apprehended
from this last peculiarity, however, the distance from
the shore, and the want of glasses, preventing any very close
scrutiny, and Deerslayer, himself, though of a brighter and
fresher tint, had a countenance that was burnt by the sun
to a hue scarcely less red than that of his Mohican
companion
.
The awkwardness of the Delaware, in his new
attire, caused his friend to smile more than once that day,
but he carefully abstained from the use of any of those jokes
which would have been bandied among white men on such
an occasion; the habits of a chief, the dignity of a warrior
on his first path, and the gravity of the circumstances in
which they were placed, uniting to render so much levity
out of season.
The meeting, at the morning meal, of the three islanders,
if we may use the term, was silent, grave and thoughtful.
Judith showed, by her looks, that she had passed an unquiet
night, while the two men had the future before them, with its
unseen and unknown events. A few words of courtesy
passed between Deerslayer and the girl, in the course of the
breakfast, but no allusion was made to their situation. At
length Judith, whose heart was full, and whose novel
feelings
disposed her to entertain sentiments more gentle and
tender than common, introduced the subject, and this in a
way to show how much of her thoughts it had occupied, in
the course of the last sleepless night.
It would be dreadful, Deerslayer, the girl abruptly
exclaimed
,
should any thing serious befal my father and
Hetty! We cannot remain quietly here, and leave them in
the hands of the Iroquois, without bethinking us of some
means of serving them.
I'm ready, Judith, to sarve them, and all others who
are in trouble, could the way to do it be p'inted out. It's
no trifling matter to fall into red-skin hands, when men set
out on an a'r'n'd like that which took Hutter and Hurry
ashore; that I know as well as another; and I wouldn't
wish my worst inimy in such a strait, much less them with
whom I've journeyed, and eat, and slept. Have you any
scheme, that you would like to have the Sarpent and me,
indivour to carry out?
I know of no other means to release the prisoners, than
by bribing the Iroquois. They are not proof against
presents
;
and we might offer enough, perhaps, to make them
think it better to carry away what to them will be rich gifts,
than to carry away poor prisoners; if, indeed, they should
carry them away at all!
This is well enough, Judith; yes, it's well enough, if
the inimy is to be bought, and we can find articles to make
the purchase with. Your father has a convenient lodge, and
it is most cunningly placed; though it doesn't seem
over-stock'd
with riches that will be likely to buy his ransom.
There's the piece he calls Killdeer, might count for
something
,
and I understand there's a keg of powder about, which
might be a make-weight, sartain; and yet two able-bodied
men are not to be bought off for a triflebesides
Besides what? demanded Judith, impatiently, observing
that the other hesitated to proceed, probably from a
reluctance
to distress her.
Why, Judith, the Frenchers offer bounties as well as
our own side; and the price of two scalps would purchase a
keg of powder, and a rifle; though I'll not say one of the
latter altogether as good as Killdeer, there, which your
father
va'nts as oncommon, and onequalled, like. But fair
powder, and a pretty sartain rifle; and then the red-men are
not the expartest in fire-arms, and don't always know the
difference atwixt that which is ra'al, and that which is
seeming
.
This is horrible! muttered the girl, struck by the
homely manner in which her companion was accustomed to
state his facts. But you overlook my own clothes,
Deerslayer
;
and they, I think, might go far with the women of
the Iroquois.
No doubt they would; no doubt they would, Judith,
returned the other, looking at her keenly, as if he would
ascertain
whether she were really capable of making such a
sacrifice. But, are you sartain, gal, you could find it in
your heart, to part with your own finery for such a purpose?
Many is the man who has thought he was valiant till danger
stared him in the face; I've known them, too, that
consaited
they were kind and ready to give away all they had to
the poor, when they've been listening to other people's
hard-heartedness
;
but whose fists have clench'd as tight as the
riven hickory, when it came to downright offerings of their
own. Besides, Judith, you're handsomeoncommon in
that way, one might obsarve, and do no harm to the truth;
and they that have beauty, like to have that which will adorn
it. Are you sartain you could find it in your heart to part
with your own finery?
The soothing allusion to the personal charms of the girl,
was well-timed, to counteract the effect produced by the
distrust
that the young man expressed of Judith's devotion to
her filial duties. Had another said as much as Deerslayer,
the compliment would most probably have been overlooked,
in the indignation awakened by the doubts; but even the
unpolished
sincerity, that so often made this simple-minded
hunter bare his thoughts, had a charm for the girl; and,
while she coloured, and for an instant her eyes flashed fire,
she could not find it in her heart to be really angry with one
whose very soul seemed truth and manly kindness. Look
her reproaches she did; but conquering the desire to retort,
she succeeded in answering in a mild and friendly manner.
You must keep all your favourable opinions for the
Delaware girls, Deerslayer, if you seriously think thus of
those of your own colour, she said, affecting to laugh.
But,
try
me; if you find that I regret either riband or
feather, silk or muslin, then may you think what you please
of my heart, and say what you think.
That's justice! The rarest thing to find on 'arth, is a
truly just man. So says Tamenund, the wisest prophet of
the Delawares; and so all must think, that have occasion to
see, and talk, and act among mankind. I love a just man,
Sarpent; his eyes are never covered with darkness towards
his inimies, while they are all sunshine and brightness
towards
his fri'nds. He uses the reason that God has given
him, and he uses it with a feelin' of his being ordered to look
at, and to consider things as they
are,
and not as he
wants
them to be. It's easy enough to find men who
call
themselves
just; but it's wonderful oncommon to find them that
are the thing, in fact. How often have I seen Indians, gal,
who believed they were lookin' into a matter agreeable to
the will of the Great Spirit, when, in truth, they were only
striving to act up to their own will and pleasure, and this,
half of the time, with a temptation to go wrong that could
no more be seen by themselves, than the stream that runs in
the next valley, can be seen by us through yonder
mountain
;
though any looker-on might have discovered it, as
plainly as we can discover the parch that are swimming
around this hut.
Very true, Deerslayer, rejoined Judith, losing every
trace of displeasure in a bright smile; very true; and I
hope to see you act on this love of justice, in all matters in
which I am concerned. Above all, I hope you will judge
for yourself, and not believe every evil story that a
prating idler, like Hurry Harry, may have to tell, that goes
to touch the good name of any young woman who may not
happen to have the same opinions of his face and person
that the blustering gallant has of himself.
Hurry Harry's idees do not pass for gospel with me,
Judith
;
but even worse than he may have eyes and ears,
returned
the other gravely.
Enough of this! exclaimed Judith, with flashing eye,
and a flush that mounted to her temples; and more of my
father and his ransom. 'T is as you say, Deerslayer; the
Indians will not be likely to give up their prisoners, without
a heavier bribe than my clothes can offer, and father's rifle
and powder. There is the chest.
Ay, there is the chist, as you say, Judith; and when the
question gets to be between a secret and a scalp, I should
think most men would prefar keeping the last. Did your
father ever give you any downright command consarning
that chist?
Never. He has always appeared to think its locks, and
its steel bands, and its strength, its best protection.
'T is a rare chist, and altogether of curious build,
returned
Deerslayer, rising and approaching the thing in
question
,
on which he seated himself, with a view to examine it
with greater ease. Chingachgook, this is no wood that
comes of any forest that you or I have ever trailed through!
'T isn't the black walnut; and yet it's quite as comely, if
not more so, did the smoke and the treatment give it fair
play.
The Delaware drew near, felt of the wood, examined its
grain, endeavoured to indent the surface with a nail, and
passed his hand curiously over the steel bands, the heavy
padlocks, and the other novel peculiarities of the massive
box.
Nonothing like this grows in these regions, resumed
Deerslayer; I've seen all the oaks, both the maples, the
elms, the bass-wood, all the walnuts, the butternuts, and
every tree that has a substance and colour, wrought into
some form or other; but never have I before seen such a
wood as this! Judith, the chist itself, would buy your
father's freedom; or Iroquois cur'osity isn't as strong as
red-skin cur'osity, in general; especially in the matter of
woods.
The purchase might be cheaper made, perhaps,
Deerslayer
.
The chest is full, and it would be better to part with
half, than to part with the whole. Besides, fatherI know
not whybut, father values that chest highly.
He would seem to prize what it holds, more than the
chist itself, judging by the manner in which he treats the
outside, and secures the inside. Here are three locks,
Judith
;
is there no key?
I've never seen one; and yet key there must be, since
Hetty told us,
she
had often seen the chest opened.
Keys no more lie in the air, or float on the water, than
humans, gal; if there is a key, there must be a place in
which it is kept.
That is true, and it might not be difficult to find it, did
we dare to search!
This is for you, Judith; it is altogether for you. The
chist is your'n, or your father's; and Hutter is your father,
not mine. Cur'osity is a woman's, and not a man's failing;
and there you have got all the reasons before you. If the
chist has articles for ransom, it seems to me they would be
wisely used in redeeming their owner's life, or even in saving
his scalp; but that is a matter for your judgment, and not
for ourn. When the lawful owner of a trap, or a buck, or
a canoe, isn't present, his next of kin becomes his
riprisentat
y
ve, by all the laws of the woods. We therefore leave
you to say whether the chist shall, or shall not be opened.
I hope you do not believe I can hesitate, when my
father's
life's in danger, Deerslayer!
Why, it's pretty much putting a scolding ag'in tears
and mourning. It's not onreasonable to foretell that old
Tom may find fault with what you've done, when he sees
himself, once more, in his hut, here; but there's nothing
unusual
in men's falling out with what has been done for their
own good; I dare to say that even the moon would seem a
different thing from what it now does, could we look at it
from the other side.
Deerslayer, if we can find the key, I will authorize you
to open the chest, and to take such things from it, as you
may think will buy father's ransom.
First find the key, gal; we'll talk of the rest a'terwards.
Sarpent, you've eyes like a fly, and a judgment that's
seldom
out; can you help us, in calculating where Floating
Tom would be apt to keep the key of a chist that he holds to
be as private as this.
The Delaware had taken no part in the discourse, until
he was thus directly appealed to, when he quitted the chest,
which had continued to attract his attention, and cast about
him for the place in which a key would be likely to be
concealed
,
under such circumstances. As Judith and
Deerslayer
were not idle, the while, the whole three were soon
engaged in an anxious and spirited search. As it was
certain
that the desired key was not to be found in any of the
common drawers, or closets, of which there were several in
the building, none looked there, but all turned their inquiries
to those places that struck them as ingenious hiding-places,
and more likely to be used for such a purpose. In this
manner the outer room was thoroughly but fruitlessly
examined
;
when they entered the sleeping apartment of
Hutter
.
This part of the rude building was better furnished
than the rest of the structure; containing several articles that
had been especially devoted to the service of the deceased
wife of its owner; but as Judith had all the rest of the keys,
it was soon rummaged, without bringing to light the
particular
key desired.
They now entered the bed-room of the daughters.
Chingachgook
was immediately struck with the contrast between
the articles, and the arrangement, of that side of the room
that might be called Judith's, and that which more properly
belonged to Hetty. A slight exclamation escaped him, and
pointing in each direction, he alluded to the fact in a low
voice, speaking to his friend in the Delaware tongue.
As you think, Sarpent, answered Deerslayer; whose
remarks we always translate into English, preserving as
much as possible of the peculiar phraseology and manner of
the man. 'T is just so, as any one may see; and 'tis all
founded in natur'. One sister loves finery, some say,
over-much
;
while t'other is as meek and lowly as God ever
created
goodness and truth. Yet, after all, I dare say that
Judith has her vartues, and Hetty has her failin's.
And the `Feeble-Mind' has seen the chest opened?
inquired
Chingachgook, with curiosity in his glance.
Sartain; that much I've heard from her own lips; and,
for that matter, so have you. It seems her father doesn't
misgive
her
discretion, though he does that of his eldest
darter.
Then, the key is hid only from the Wild Rose? for so
Chingachgook had begun gallantly to term Judith, in his
private discourse with his friend.
That's it! That's just it! One he trusts, and the
other he doesn't. There's red and white in that, Sarpent;
all tribes and nations agreeing in trusting some, and refusing
to trust other some. It depends on character and
judgment
.
Where could a key be put, so little likely to be found by
the Wild Rose, as among coarse clothes?
Deerslayer started, and turning to his friend, with
admiration
expressed in every lineament of his face, he fairly
laughed, in his silent but hearty manner, at the ingenuity
and readiness of the conjecture.
Your name's well bestowed, Sarpentyes, 't is well
bestowed
!
Sure enough, where would a lover of finery be so
little likely to s'arch, as among garments as coarse and
unseemly
as these of poor Hetty. I dares to say, Judith's
delicate fingers haven't touched a bit of cloth as rough and
oncomely as that petticoat, now, since she first made
acquaintance
with the officers! Yet, who knows? the key
may be as likely to be on the same peg, as in any other
place. Take down the garment, Delaware, and let us see if
you are ra'ally a prophet.
Chingachgook did as desired, but no key was found. A
coarse pocket, apparently empty, hung on the adjoining peg,
and this was next examined. By this time, the attention of
Judith was called in that direction, and she spoke hurriedly,
and like one who wished to save unnecessary trouble.
These are only the clothes of poor Hetty, dear simple
girl! she said; nothing we seek, would be likely to be
there.
The words were hardly out of the handsome mouth of the
Vol. I.18
speaker, when Chingachgook drew the desired key from the
pocket. Judith was too quick of apprehension, not to
understand
the reason a hiding-place, so simple and exposed,
had been used. The blood rushed to her face, as much
with resentment, perhaps, as with shame; and she bit her
lip, though she continued silent. Deerslayer and his friend
now discovered the delicacy of men of native refinement,
neither smiling, or even by a glance betraying how
completely
he understood the motives and ingenuity of this
clever artifice. The former, who had taken the key from
the Indian, led the way into the adjoining room, and
applying
it to a lock, ascertained that the right instrument had
actually been found. There were three padlocks, each of
which, however, was easily opened by this single key.
Deerslayer removed them all, loosened the hasps, raised the
lid a little to make certain it was loose, and then he drew
back from the chest, several feet, signing to his friend to
follow.
This is a family chist, Judith, he said, and 't is like
to hold family secrets. The Sarpent and I will go into the
ark, and look to the canoes, and paddles, and oars; while
you can examine it by yourself, and find out whether any
thing that will be a make-weight in a ransom, is, or is not,
among the articles. When you've got through, give us a
call, and we'll all sit in council, together, touching the valie
of the articles.
Stop, Deerslayer, exclaimed the girl, as he was about
to withdraw; not a single thing will I touchI will not
even raise the lidunless you are present. Father and
Hetty have seen fit to keep the inside of this chest a secret
from me, and I am much too proud to pry into their hidden
treasures, unless it were for their own good. But, on no
account, will I open the chest alone. Stay with me, then;
I want witnesses of what I do.
I rather think, Sarpent, that the gal is right!
Confidence
and reliance beget security, but suspicion is like to
make us all wary. Judith has a right to ask us to be
present
;
and should the chist hold any of Master Hutter's
secrets
,
they will fall into the keeping of two as close-mouthed
young men as are to be found. We
will
stay with you,
Judithbut, first let us take a look at the lake and the shore,
for this chist will not be emptied in a minute.
The two men now went out on the platform, and
Deerslayer
swept the shore with the glass, while the Indian
gravely turned his eye on the water and the woods, in quest
of any sign that might betray the machinations of their
enemies
.
Nothing was visible, and assured of their temporary
security, the three collected around the chest, again, with
the avowed object of opening it.
Judith had held this chest, and its unknown contents, in a
species of reverence as long as she could remember.
Neither
her father, nor her mother, ever mentioned it in her
presence; and there appeared to be a silent convention, that
in naming the different objects that occasionally stood near it,
or even lay on its lid, care should be had to avoid any allusion
to the chest itself. Habit had rendered this so easy, and so
much a matter of course, that it was only quite recently the
girl had begun even to muse on the singularity of the
circumstance
.
But there had never been sufficient intimacy
between Hutter and his eldest daughter, to invite confidence.
At times, he was kind, but in general, with her more
especially
,
he was stern and morose. Least of all had his authority
been exercised in a way to embolden his child to venture on
the liberty she was about to take, without many misgivings
of the consequences, although the liberty proceeded from
a desire to serve himself. Then Judith was not altogether
free from a little superstition, on the subject of this chest,
which had stood a sort of tabooed relic before her eyes, from
childhood to the present hour. Nevertheless the time had
come, when it would seem that this mystery was to be
explained
,
and that under circumstances, too, which left her
very little choice in the matter.
Finding that both her companions were watching her
movements, in grave silence, Judith placed a hand on the
lid, and endeavoured to raise it. Her strength, however, was
insufficient, and it appeared to the girl, who was fully aware
that all the fastenings were removed, that she was resisted
in an unhallowed attempt, by some supernatural power.
I cannot raise the lid, Deerslayer, she said: had we
not better give up the attempt, and find some other means
of releasing the prisoners?
Not so, Judith; not so, gal. No means are as sartain
and easy, as a good bribe, answered the other. As for
the lid, 't is held by nothing but its own weight, which is
prodigious for so small a piece of wood, loaded with iron as
it is.
As Deerslayer spoke, he applied his own strength to the
effort, and succeeded in raising the lid against the timbers of
the house, where he took care to secure it, by a sufficient
prop. Judith fairly trembled, as she cast her first glance at
the interior; and she felt a temporary relief in discovering
that a piece of canvass, that was carefully tucked in, around
the edges, effectually concealed all beneath it. The chest
was apparently well stored, however, the canvass lying
within an inch of the lid.
Here 's a full cargo, said Deerslayer, eyeing the
arrangement
;
and we had needs go to work leisurely, and
at our ease. Sarpent, bring some stools, while I spread this
blanket on the floor, and then we 'll begin work orderly, and
in comfort.
The Delaware complied; Deerslayer civilly placed a stool
for Judith, took one himself, and commenced the removal of
the canvass covering. This was done deliberately, and in
as cautious a manner, as if it were believed that fabrics of a
delicate construction lay hidden beneath. When the canvass
was removed, the first articles that came in view were some
of the habiliments of the male sex. These were of fine
materials
,
and, according to the fashions of the age, were gay
in colours, and rich in ornaments. One coat, in particular,
was of scarlet, and had button-holes worked in gold thread.
Still it was not military, but was part of the attire of a
civilian
of condition, at a period when social rank was rigidly
respected in dress. Chingachgook could not refrain from an
exclamation of pleasure, as soon as Deerslayer opened this
coat, and held it up to view; for, notwithstanding all his
trained self-command, the splendour of the vestment was
too much for the philosophy of an Indian. Deerslayer
turned quickly, and he regarded his friend with momentary
displeasure, as this burst of weakness escaped him; and then
he soliloquized, as was his practice, whenever any strong
feeling suddenly got the ascendancy.
T is his gift!yes, 't is the gift of a red-skin to love
finery, and he is not to be blamed. This is an extr'ornary
garment, too; and extr'ornary things get up extr'ornary
feelin's. I think this will do, Judith, for the Indian heart is
hardly to be found in all America, that can withstand
colours like these, and glitter like that. If this coat was
ever made for your father, you've come honestly by the
taste for finery, you have.
That coat was never made for father, answered the
girl, quickly; it is much too long; while father is short
and square.
Cloth was plenty, if it was, and glitter cheap, answered
Deerslayer, with his silent, joyous laugh. Sarpent, this
garment was made for a man of your size, and I should like
to see it on your shoulders.
Chingachgook, nothing loth, submitted to the trial;
throwing
aside the coarse and thread-bare jacket of Hutter, to
deck his person in a coat that was originally intended for a
gentleman. The transformation was ludicrous; but as men
are seldom struck with incongruities in their own
appearance
,
any more than in their own conduct, the Delaware
studied this change in a common glass, by which Hutter was
in the habit of shaving, with grave interest. At that
moment
he thought of Hist, and we owe it to truth to say,
though it may militate a little against the stern character of
a warrior to own it, that he wished he could be seen by her,
in his present improved aspect.
Off with it, Sarpentoff with it, resumed the inflexible
Deerslayer; such garments as little become you, as they
would become me. Your gifts are for paint, and hawk's
feathers, and blankets, and wampum; and mine are for
doublets of skin, tough leggings, and sarviceable moccasins.
I say moccasins, Judith; for though white, living as I do, in
the woods, it's necessary to take to some of the pract
y
ces
of the woods, for comfort's sake, and cheapness.
I see no reason, Deerslayer, why one man may not
wear a scarlet coat, as well as another, returned the girl.
I wish I could see
you
in this handsome garment.
See me in a coat fit for a lord! Well, Judith, if you
wait till that day, you'll wait until you see me beyond
reason
and memory. Nonogal, my gifts are my gifts, and
I'll live and die in 'em, though I never bring down another
18*
deer, or spear another salmon. What have I done, that you
should wish to see
me
in such a flaunting coat, Judith!
Because I think, Deerslayer, that the false-tongued and
false-hearted young gallants of the garrison, ought not alone
to appear in fine feathers; but that truth and honesty have
their
claims to be honoured and exalted.
And what exaltification The reader will have
remarked
that Deerslayer had not very critically studied his
dictionaryAnd what exaltification would it be to me,
Judith, to be bedizzened and bescarleted, like a Mingo chief
that has just got his presents up from Quebec? Nono
I'm well as I am; and if not, I can be no better. Lay the
coat down on the blanket, Sarpent, and let us look further
into the chist.
The tempting garment, one surely that was never intended
for Hutter, was laid aside, and the examination proceeded.
The male attire, all of which corresponded with the coat in
quality, was soon exhausted, and then succeeded female. A
beautiful dress of brocade, a little the worse from negligent
treatment, followed; and this time open exclamations of
delight
escaped the lips of Judith. Much as the girl had been
addicted to dress, and favourable as had been her
opportunities
of seeing some little pretension in that way, among the
wives of the different commandants, and other ladies of the
forts, never before had she beheld a tissue, or tints to equal
those that were now so unexpectedly placed before her eyes.
Her rapture was almost childish; nor would she allow the
inquiry to proceed until she had attired her person in a robe
so unsuited to her habits and her abode. With this end, she
withdrew into her own room, where, with hands practised
in such offices, she soon got rid of her own neat gown of
linen, and stood forth in the gay tints of the brocade. The
dress happened to fit the fine, full, person of Judith, and
certainly it had never adorned a being better qualified by
natural gifts, to do credit to its really rich hues and fine
texture. When she returned, both Deerslayer and
Chingachgook
,
who had passed the brief time of her absence, in
taking a second look at the male garments, arose in surprise,
each permitting exclamations of wonder and pleasure to
escape
him, in a way so unequivocal as to add new lustre to
the eyes of Judith, by flushing her cheeks with a glow of
triumph. Affecting, however, not to notice the impression
she had made, the girl seated herself with the stateliness
of a queen, desiring that the chest might be looked into,
further.
I don't know a better way to treat with the Mingos,
gal, cried Deerslayer, than to send you ashore, as you
be, and to tell'em that a queen has arrived among'em!
They'll give up old Hutter, and Hurry, and Hetty, too, at
such a spectacle!
I thought your tongue too honest to flatter, Deerslayer,
returned the girl, gratified at this admiration more than she
would have cared to own. One of the chief reasons of
my respect for you, was your love for truth.
And 't is truth, and solemn truth, Judith, and nothing
else. Never did eyes of mine gaze on as glorious a lookin'
creatur', as you be yourself, at this very moment! I've
seen beauties in my time, too, both white and red; and them
that was renowned and talk'd of, far and near; but, never
have I beheld one that could hold any comparison with what
you are at this blessed instant, Judith; never.
The glance of delight which the girl bestowed on the
frank-speaking hunter, in no degree lessened the effect of
her charms; and as the humid eyes blended with it a look
of sensibility, perhaps Judith never appeared more truly
lovely, than at what the young man had called that blessed
instant. He shook his head, held it suspended a moment
over the open chest, like one in doubt, and then proceeded
with the examination.
Several of the minor articles of female dress came next,
all of a quality to correspond with the gown. These were
laid at Judith's feet, in silence, as if she had a natural claim
to their possession. One or two, such as gloves, and lace,
the girl caught up, and appended to her already rich attire,
in affected playfulness, but with the real design of decorating
her person as far as circumstances would allow. When
these two remarkable suits, male and female they might be
termed, were removed, another canvass covering separated
the remainder of the articles from the part of the chest which
they had occupied. As soon as Deerslayer perceived this
arrangement, he paused, doubtful of the propriety of
proceeding
any further.
Every man has his secrets, I suppose, he said, and
all men have a right to their enj'yment; we've got low
enough in this chist, in my judgment, to answer our wants,
and it seems to me we should do well by going no farther;
and by letting Master Hutter have to himself, and his own
feelin's, all that's beneath this cover.
Do you mean, Deerslayer, to offer these clothes to the
Iroquois, as ransom? demanded Judith, quickly.
Sartain. What are we prying into another man's chist
for, but to sarve its owner, in the best way we can. This
coat, alone, would be very apt to gain over the head-chief of
the ript
y
les; and if his wife or darter should happen to be
out with him, that there gownd would soften the heart of
any woman that is to be found atween Albany and
Montreal
.
I do not see that we want a larger stock in trade than
these two articles.
To you it may seem so, Deerslayer, returned the
disappointed
girl; but of what use could a dress like this be
to any Indian woman? She could not wear it among the
branches of the trees; the dirt and smoke of the wigwam
would soon soil it; and how would a pair of red arms
appear
,
thrust through these short, laced sleeves!
All very true, gal; and you might go on and say, it is
altogether out of time, and place, and season, in this region
at all. What is it to us how the finery is treated, so long as
it answers our wishes? I do not see that your father can
make any use of such clothes; and it's lucky he has things
that are of no valie to himself, that will bear a high price with
others. We can make no better trade for him, than to offer
these duds for his liberty. We'll throw in the light
frivol'ties
,
and get Hurry off in the bargain!
Then you think, Deerslayer, that Thomas Hutter has
no one in his familyno childno daughter, to whom this
dress may be thought becoming, and whom you could wish
to see in it, once and awhile, even though it should be at
long intervals, and only in playfulness?
I understand you, Judithyes, I now understand your
meaning; and I think I can say, your wishes. That you
are as glorious, in that dress, as the sun when it rises, or
sets, in a soft October day, I'm ready to allow; and that
you greatly become it, is a good deal more sartain than that
it becomes you. There's gifts in clothes, as well as in other
things. Now I do not think that a warrior on his first path,
ought to lay on the same awful paints as a chief that has
had his virtue tried, and knows from exper'ence he will not
disgrace his pretensions. So it is with all of us, red or
white. You are Thomas Hutter's darter, and that gownd
was made for the child of some governor, or a lady of high
station; and it was intended to be worn among fine
furniture
,
and in rich company. In my eyes, Judith, a modest
maiden never looks more becoming, than when becomingly
clad, and nothing is suitable that is out of character.
Besides
,
gal, if there's a creatur' in the colony that can afford
to do without finery, and to trust to her own good looks,
and sweet countenance, it's yourself.
I'll take off the rubbish this instant, Deerslayer, cried
the girl, springing up to leave the room; and never do I
wish to see it on any human being, again.
So it is with 'em all, Sarpent, said the other, turning
to his friend and laughing, as soon as the beauty had
disappeared
.
They like finery, but they like their nat
y
ve charms
most of all. I'm glad the gal has consented to lay aside her
furbelow, howsever, for it's ag'in reason for one of her class
to wear 'em; and then she
is
handsome enough, as I call it,
to go alone. Hist would show oncommon likely, too, in
such a gownd, Delaware!
Wah-ta!-Wah is a red-skin girl, Deerslayer, returned
the Indian; like the young of the pigeon, she is to be
known by her own feathers. I should pass by without
knowing her, were she dressed in such a skin. It's wisest
always to be so clad that our friends need not ask us for
our names. The `Wild Rose' is very pleasant, but she is
no sweeter for so many colours.
That's it!that's natur', and the true foundation for
love and protection. When a man stops to pick a wild
strawberry
,
he does not expect to find a melon; and when he
wishes to gather a melon, he's disapp'inted if it prove to be
a squash; though squashes
be
often brighter to the eye
than melons. That's it, and it means, stick to your gifts,
and your gifts will stick to you.
The two men had now a little discussion together,
touching
the propriety of penetrating any farther into the chest of
Hutter, when Judith re-appeared, divested of her robes, and
in her own simple, linen frock again.
Thank you, Judith, said Deerslayer, taking her kindly
by the hand; for I know it went a little ag'in the nat'ral
cravings of woman, to lay aside so much finery, as it might
be in a lump. But you're more pleasing to the eye as you
stand, you be, than if you had a crown on your head, and
jewels dangling from your hair. The question now is,
whether to lift this covering, to see what will be ra'ally the
best bargain we can make for Master Hutter; for we must
do as we think
he
would be willing to do, did he stand here
in our places.
Judith looked very happy. Accustomed as she was to
adulation, the humble homage of Deerslayer had given her
more true satisfaction, than she had ever yet received from
the tongue of man. It was not the terms in which this
admiration
had been expressed, for
they
were simple enough,
that produced so strong an impression; nor yet their novelty,
or their warmth of manner, nor any of those peculiarities
that usually give value to praise; but the unflinching truth
of the speaker, that carried his words so directly to the heart
of the listener. This is one of the great advantages of plain
dealing and frankness. The habitual and wily flatterer may
succeed until his practices recoil on himself; and like other
sweets, his aliment cloys by its excess; but he who deals
honestly, though he often necessarily offend, possesses a
power of praising that no quality but sincerity can bestow;
since his words go directly to the heart, finding their
support
in the understanding. Thus it was with Deerslayer
and Judith; so soon and so deeply did this simple hunter
impress all who knew him, with a conviction of his
unbending
honesty, that all he uttered in commendation was as
certain
to please, as all he uttered in the way of rebuke was
certain to rankle and excite enmity, where his character had
not awakened a respect and affection, that in another sense
rendered it painful. In after life, when the career of this
untutored being brought him in contact with officers of rank,
and others entrusted with the care of the interests of the
state, this same influence was exerted on a wider field; even
generals listening to his commendations with a glow of
pleasure, that it was not always in the power of their
official
superiors to awaken. Perhaps Judith was the first
individual
of his own colour, who fairly submitted to this
natural consequence of truth and fair-dealing, on the part of
Deerslayer. She had actually pined for his praise, and she
had now received it; and that in the form which was most
agreeable to her weaknesses and habits of thought. The
result will appear in the course of the narrative.
If we knew all that chest holds, Deerslayer, returned
the girl, when she had a little recovered from the immediate
effect produced by his commendations of her personal
appearance
;
we could better determine on the course we
ought to take.
That's not onreasonable, gal, though it's more a
paleface
than a red-skin gift, to be prying into other people's
secrets.
Curiosity is natural, and it is expected that all human
beings should have human failings. Whenever I've been
at the garrisons, I've found that most, in and about them,
had a longing to learn their neighbour's secrets.
Yes, and sometimes to fancy them, when they couldn't
find'em out! That's the difference atween an Indian
gentleman
,
and a white gentleman. The Sarpent, here, would
turn his head aside, if he found himself onknowingly lookin'
into another chief's wigwam; whereas, in the settlements,
while all pretend to be great people, most prove they've got
betters, by the manner in which they talk of their consarns.
I'll be bound, Judith, you wouldn't get the Sarpent, there,
to confess there was another in the tribe so much greater
than himself, as to become the subject of his idees, and to
empl'y his tongue in conversations about his movements,
and ways, and food, and all the other little matters that
occupy
a man when he's not empl'y'd in his greater duties.
He who does this, is but little better than a blackguard in
the grain, and them that encourages him, is pretty much of
the same kidney, let them wear coats as fine as they may,
or of what dye they please.
But this is not another man's wigwam; it belongs to my
father; these are his things, and they are wanted in his
service.
That's true, gal, that's true; and it carries weight with
it. Well, when all is before us, we may, indeed, best judge,
which to offer for the ransom, and which to withhold.
Judith was not altogether as disinterested in her feelings,
as she affected to be. She remembered that the curiosity of
Hetty had been indulged, in connection with this chest,
while her own had been disregarded; and she was not sorry
to possess an opportunity of being placed on a level with her
less gifted sister, in this one particular. It appearing to be
admitted all round, that the inquiry into the contents of the
chest ought to be pushed further, Deerslayer proceeded to
remove the second covering of canvass.
The articles that lay uppermost, when the curtain was
again raised on the secrets of the chest, were a pair of
pistols
,
curiously inlaid with silver. Their value would have
been considerable, in one of the towns, though as weapons,
in the woods, they were a species of arms seldom employed;
never, indeed, unless it might be by some officer from
Europe
,
who visited the colonies, as many were then wont to
do, so much impressed with the superiority of the usages of
London, as to fancy they were not to be laid aside on the
frontier of America. What occurred on the discovery of
these weapons, will appear, in the succeeding chapter.
CHAPTER XIII.
An oaken, broken, elbow chair;
A candle-cup without an ear;
A battered, shattered, ash bedstead;
A box of deal without a lid;
A pair of tongs, but out of joint;
A back-sword poker, without point;
A dish which might good meat afford once;
An Ovid, and an old Concordance.
Dean Swift's
Inventory
.
No sooner did Deerslayer raise the pistols, than he turned
to the Delaware, and held them up, for his admiration.
Child gun, said the Serpent, smiling, while he handled
one of the instruments as if it had been a toy.
Not it, Sarpent; not it. 'T is made for a man, and
would satisfy a giant, if rightly used. But stop; white men
are remarkable for their carelessness in putting away
fire-arms
,
in chists and corners. Let me look if care has been
given to these we'pons.
As Deerslayer spoke, he took the weapon from the hand
of his friend, and opened the pan. The last was filled with
priming, caked like a bit of cinder, by time, moisture, and
compression. An application of the ramrod showed that
both the pistols were charged, although Judith could testify
that they had probably lain for years in the chest. It is not
easy to portray the surprise of the Indian, at this discovery,
for he was in the practice of renewing his priming daily,
and of looking to the contents of his piece, at other short
intervals.
This is white neglect, said Deerslayer, shaking his
head, and scarce a season goes by, that some one in the
settlements doesn't suffer from it. It's extr'ornary too,
Judith
yes, it's downright extr'ornary, that the owner shall
fire his piece at a deer, or some other game, or perhaps at
an inimy, and twice out of three times he'll miss; but let
him catch an accident with one of these forgotten charges,
and he makes it sartain death to a child, or a brother, or a
fri'nd! Well, we shall do a good turn to the owner if we
fire these pistols for him; and as they're novelties to you
and me, Sarpent, we'll try our hands at a mark. Freshen
that priming, and I'll do the same with this, and then we'll
see who is the best man with a pistol; as for the rifle, that's
long been settled atween us.
Deerslayer laughed heartily, at his own conceit, and, in
a minute or two, they were both standing on the platform,
selecting some object in the ark for their target. Judith was
led by curiosity to their side.
Stand back, gal, stand a little back; these we'pons have
been long loaded, said Deerslayer, and some accident
may happen in the discharge.
Then
you
shall not fire them! Give them both to the
Delaware; or, it would be better to unload them, without
firing.
That's ag'in usageand some people say ag'in
manhood
;
though I hold to no such silly doctrine. We must
Vol. I.19
fire 'em, Judith; yes, we must fire 'em; though I foresee that
neither will have any great reason to boast of his skill.
Judith, in the main, was a girl of great personal spirit,
and her habits prevented her from feeling any of the terror
that is apt to come over her sex, at the report of fire-arms.
She had discharged many a rifle, and had even been known
to kill a deer, under circumstances that were favourable to
the effort. She submitted, therefore, falling a little back by
the side of Deerslayer, giving the Indian the front of the
platform to himself. Chingachgook raised the weapon
several
times, endeavoured to steady it by using both hands,
changed his attitude, from one that was awkward to another
still more so, and finally drew the trigger with a sort of
desperate
indifference, without having, in reality, secured any
aim at all. The consequence was, that instead of hitting
the knot, which had been selected for the mark, he missed
the ark altogether; the bullet skipping along the water like
a stone that was thrown by hand.
Well done, Sarpent  well done, cried Deerslayer,
laughing with his noiseless glee, you've hit the lake, and
that's an expl'ite, for some men! I know'd it, and as much
as said it, here, to Judith; for your short we'pons don't
belong
to red-skin gifts. You've hit the lake, and that's
better
than only hitting the air! Now, stand back, and let us
see what white gifts can do with a white we'pon. A pistol
isn't a rifle; but colour is colour.
The aim of Deerslayer was both quick and steady, and
the report followed almost as soon as the weapon rose. Still
the pistol hung fire, as it is termed, and fragments of it flew
in a dozen directions, some falling on the roof of the castle,
others in the ark, and one in the water. Judith screamed,
and when the two men turned anxiously towards the girl,
she was as pale as death, trembling in every limb.
She's wounded  yes, the poor gal's wounded, Sarpent,
though one couldn't foresee it, standing where she did.
We'll lead her into a seat, and we must do the best for her
that our knowledge and skill can afford.
Judith suffered herself to be supported to a seat, swallowed
a mouthful of the water that the Delaware offered her in a
gourd, and, after a violent fit of trembling, that seemed ready
to shake her fine frame to dissolution, she burst into tears.
The pain must be borne, poor Judith  yes, it must be
borne, said Deerslayer, soothingly; though I am far from
wishing you not to weep; for weeping often lightens galish
feelin's. Where can she be hurt, Sarpent? I see no signs
of blood, nor any rent of skin or garments.
I am uninjured, Deerslayer, stammered the girl through
her tears. It's fright  nothing more, I do assure you;
and, God be praised! no one, I find, has been harmed by
the accident.
This is extr'ornary! exclaimed the unsuspecting and
simple-minded hunter. I thought, Judith, you'd been above
settlement weaknesses, and that you was a gal not to be
frightened by the sound of a bursting we'pon. NoI didn't
think you so skeary!
Hetty
might well have been startled;
but you've too much judgment and reason to be frightened
when the danger's all over. They're pleasant to the eye,
chief, and changeful, but very unsartain in their feelin's!
Shame kept Judith silent. There had been no acting in
her agitation, but all had fairly proceeded from sudden and
uncontrollable alarm  an alarm that she found almost as
inexplicable to herself, as it proved to be to her companions.
Wiping away the traces of tears, however, she smiled again,
and was soon able to join in the laugh at her own folly.
And you, Deerslayer, she at length succeeded in
saying
,
are you, indeed, altogether unhurt? It seems almost
miraculous that a pistol should have burst in your hand, and
you escape without the loss of a limb, if not of life!
Such wonders ar'n't oncommon, at all, among
worn-out
arms. The first rifle they gave me play'd the same
trick, and yet I lived through it, though not as onharmless
as I've got out of this affair. Thomas Hutter is master of
one pistol less than he was this morning; but, as it happened
in trying to sarve him, there's no ground of complaint.
Now, draw near, and let us look further into the inside of
the chist.
Judith, by this time, had so far gotten the better of her
agitation as to resume her seat, and the examination went
on. The next article that offered was enveloped in cloth,
and, on opening it, it proved to be one of the mathematical
instruments that were then in use among seamen, possessing
the usual ornaments and fastenings, in brass. Deerslayer
and Chingachgook expressed their admiration and surprise
at the appearance of the unknown instrument, which was
bright and glittering, having apparently been well cared for.
This goes beyond the surveyors, Judith, Deerslayer
exclaimed, after turning the instrument several times in his
hands; I've seen all their tools, often, and wicked and
heartless enough are they, for they never come into the
forest but to lead the way to waste and destruction; but
none of them have as designing a look as this! I fear me,
after all, that Thomas Hutter has journeyed into the
wilderness
with no fair intentions towards its happiness. Did you
ever see any of the cravings of a surveyor about your
father
,
gal?
He is no surveyor, Deerslayer, nor does he know the
use of that instrument, though he seems to own it. Do you
suppose that Thomas Hutter ever wore that coat? It is as
much too large for him as this instrument is beyond his
learning.
That's it  that must be it, Sarpent; and the old fellow,
by some onknown means, has fallen heir to another man's
goods! They say he has been a mariner, and, no doubt,
this chist, and all it holds  Ha! what have we here?
This far out-does the brass and black wood of the tool!
Deerslayer had opened a small bag, from which he was
taking, one by one, the pieces of a set of chessmen. They
were of ivory, much larger than common, and exquisitely
wrought. Each piece represented the character or thing
after which it is named; the knights being mounted, the
castles stood on elephants, and even the pawns possessed
the heads and busts of men. The set was not complete,
and a few fractures betrayed bad usage; but all that was
left had been carefully put away and preserved. Even
Judith
expressed wonder, as these novel objects were placed
before her eyes, and Chingachgook fairly forgot his Indian
dignity in admiration and delight. The latter took up each
piece, and examined it with never-tiring satisfaction,
pointing
out to the girl the more ingenious and striking portions
of the workmanship. But the elephants gave him the
greatest
pleasure. The Hughs! that he uttered, as he passed
his fingers over their trunks, and ears, and tails, were very
distinct; nor did he fail to note the pawns, which were armed
as archers. This exhibition lasted several minutes, during
which time Judith and the Indian had all the rapture to
themselves
.
Deerslayer sat silent, thoughtful, and even gloomy,
though his eyes followed each movement of the two
principal
actors, noting every new peculiarity about the pieces as
they were held up to view. Not an exclamation of pleasure,
nor a word of commendation passed his lips. At length his
companions observed his silence, and then, for the first time
since the chessmen had been discovered, did he speak.
Judith, he asked earnestly, but with a concern that
amounted almost to tenderness of manner, did your
parents
ever talk to you of religion?
The girl coloured, and the flashes of crimson that passed
over her beautiful countenance, were like the wayward tints
of a Neapolitan sky in November. Deerslayer had given
her so strong a taste for truth, however, that she did not
waver in her answer, replying simply and with sincerity.
My
mother
did, often, she said; my father
never
. I
thought it made my mother sorrowful to speak of our prayers
and duties, but my father has never opened his mouth on
such matters, before or since her death.
That I can believe  that I can believe. He has no
God  no such God as it becomes a man of white skin to
worship, or even a red-skin. Them things are idols!
Judith started, and for a moment she seemed seriously
hurt. Then she reflected, and, in the end, she laughed.
And you think, Deerslayer, that these ivory toys are
my father's gods? I have heard of idols, and know what
they are.
Them are idols! repeated the other positively. Why
should your father keep 'em, if he doesn't worship 'em?
Would he keep his gods in a bag, and locked up in a
chest? No, no, Deerslayer; my poor father carries his god
with him, wherever he goes, and that is in his own cravings.
These things may really be idols  I think they are,
myself
,
from what I have heard and read of idolatry, but they
have come from some distant country, like all the other
articles, and have fallen into Thomas Hutter's hands when
he has been a sailor.
I'm glad of it  I am downright glad to hear it, Judith,
for I do not think I could have mustered the resolution to
19*
strive to help a white idolator out of his difficulties! The
old man is of my colour and nation, and I wish to sarve
him; but as one who denied all his gifts, in the way of
religion
,
it would have come hard to do so. That animal
seems to give you great satisfaction, Sarpent, though it's an
idolatrous head, at the best.
It is an elephant, interrupted Judith. I've often
seen pictures of such animals, at the garrisons; and mother
had a book in which there was a printed account of the
creature
.
Father burnt that, with all the other books, for he
said mother loved reading too well. This was not long
before mother died, and I've sometimes thought that the
loss hastened her end.
This was said equally without levity and without any
deep feeling. It was said without levity, for Judith was
saddened by her recollections, and yet she had been too
much accustomed to live for self, and for the indulgence of
her own vanities, to feel her mother's wrongs very heavily.
It required extraordinary circumstances to awaken a proper
sense of her situation, and to stimulate the better feelings of
this beautiful, but misguided girl; and these circumstances
had not yet occurred in her brief existence.
Elephant, or no elephant, 't is an idol, returned the
hunter, and not fit to remain in Christian keeping.
Good for Iroquois! said Chingachgook, parting with
one of the castles with reluctance, as his friend took it from
him to replace it in the bag. Elephon buy whole tribe
buy Delaware, almost!
Ay, that it would, as any one who comprehends
red-skin
natur' must know, answered Deerslayer; but the
man that passes false money, Sarpent, is as bad as he who
makes it. Did you ever know a just Indian that wouldn't
scorn to sell a coon-skin for the true marten, or to pass off a
mink for a beaver. I know that a few of these idols,
perhaps
one
of them elephants, would go far towards buying
Thomas Hutter's liberty, but it goes ag'in conscience to pass
such counterfeit money. Perhaps no Indian tribe,
here-away
,
is downright idolators, but there's some that come so
near it, that white gifts ought to be particular about
encouraging
them in their mistake.
If idolatry is a
gift,
Deerslayer, and
gifts
are what you
seem to think them, idolatry in such people can hardly be a
sin, said Judith, with more smartness than discrimination.
God grants no such gifts to any of his creatur's, Judith,
returned the hunter seriously.
He
must be adored, under
some name or other, and not creatur's of brass or ivory. It
matters not whether the Father of all is called God, or
Manitou
,
Deity or Great Spirit, he is none the less our common
Maker and Master; nor does it count for much whether the
souls of the just go to Paradise, or happy hunting-grounds,
since He may send each his own way, as suits his own
pleasure and wisdom; but it curdles my blood, when I find
human mortals so bound up in darkness and consait, as to
fashion the 'arth, or wood, or bonesthings made by their
own handsinto motionless, senseless effigies, and then fall
down before them, and worship 'em as a Deity!
After all, Deerslayer, these pieces of ivory may not be
idols at all. I remember, now, to have seen one of the
officers
at the garrison, with a set of fox and geese made in
some such a design as these; and here is something hard,
wrapped in cloth, that may belong to your idols.
Deerslayer took the bundle the girl gave him, and,
unrolling
it, he found the board within. Like the pieces, it
was large, rich, and inlaid with ebony and ivory. Putting
the whole in conjunction, the hunter, though not without
many misgivings, slowly came over to Judith's opinion, and
finally admitted that the fancied idols must be merely the
curiously carved men of some unknown game. Judith had
the tact to use her victory with great moderation; nor did
she once, even in the most indirect manner, allude to the
ludicrous mistake of her companion.
This discovery of the uses of the extraordinary-looking
little images, settled the affair of the proposed ransom. It
was agreed generallyand all understood the weaknesses
and tastes of Indiansthat nothing could be more likely to
tempt the cupidity of the Iroquois, than the elephants, in
particular. Luckily, the whole of the castles were among
the pieces, and these four tower-bearing animals it was
finally determined should be the ransom offered. The
remainder
of the men, and, indeed, all the rest of the articles
in the chest, were to be kept out of view, and to be resorted
to only as a last appeal. As soon as these preliminaries
were settled, every thing but those intended for the bribe
was carefully replaced in the chest, and all the covers were
`tucked in,' as they had been found; and it was quite
possible
,
could Hutter have been put in possession of the castle
again, that he might have passed the remainder of his days
in it, without even suspecting the invasion that had been
made on the privacy of the chest. The rent pistol would
have been the most likely to reveal the secret; but this was
placed by the side of its fellow, and all were pressed down
as beforesome half-a-dozen packages in the bottom of the
chest not having been opened at all. When this was done,
the lid was lowered, the padlocks replaced, and the key
turned. The latter was then replaced in the pocket from
which it had been taken.
More than an hour was consumed in settling the course
proper to be pursued, and in returning every thing to its
place. The pauses to converse were frequent; and Judith,
who experienced a lively pleasure in the open, undisguised
admiration with which Deerslayer's honest eye gazed at her
handsome face, found the means to prolong the interview,
with a dexterity that seems to be innate in female coquetry.
Deerslayer, indeed, appeared to be the first who was
conscious
of the time that had been thus wasted, and to call
the attention of his companions to the necessity of doing
something towards putting the plan of ransoming into
execution
.
Chingachgook had remained in Hutter's bed-room,
where the elephants were laid, to feast his eyes with the
images of animals so wonderful, and so novel. Perhaps an
instinct told him that his presence would not be as
acceptable
to his companions, as this holding himself aloof; for
Judith had not much reserve in the manifestations of her
preferences, and the Delaware had not got so far as one
betrothed without acquiring some knowledge of the
symptoms
of the master passion.
Well, Judith, said Deerslayer, rising, after the
interview
had lasted much longer than even he himself
suspected
,
't is pleasant convarsing with you, and settling all
these matters, but duty calls us another way. All this time,
Hurry and your father, not to say Hetty
The word was cut short in the speaker's mouth, for, at
that critical moment, a light step was heard on the platform,
or court-yard, a human figure darkened the door-way, and
the person last mentioned stood before him. The low
exclamation
that escaped Deerslayer and the slight scream of
Judith were hardly uttered, when an Indian youth, between
the ages of fifteen and seventeen, stood beside her. These
two entrances had been made with moccasined feet, and
consequently almost without noise; but, unexpected and
stealthy as they were, they had not the effect to disturb
Deerslayer's self-possession. His first measure was to
speak rapidly in Delaware to his friend, cautioning him to
keep out of sight, while he stood on his guard; the second,
was to step to the door to ascertain the extent of the
danger
.
No one else, however, had come; and a simple
contrivance
,
in the shape of a raft, that lay floating at the side
of the ark, at once explained the means that had been used
in bringing Hetty off. Two dead and dry, and
consequently
buoyant, logs of pine were bound together with pins and
withes, and a little platform of riven chestnut had been
rudely placed on their surfaces. Here Hetty had been
seated
,
on a billet of wood, while the young Iroquois had rowed
the primitive and slow-moving, but perfectly safe, craft, from
the shore. As soon as Deerslayer had taken a close
survey
of this raft, and satisfied himself nothing else was near,
he shook his head, and muttered in his soliloquizing way
This comes of prying into another man's chist! Had
we been watchful, and keen-eyed, such a surprise could
never have happened; and getting this much from a boy,
teaches us what we may expect when the old warriors set
themselves fairly about their sarcumventions. It opens the
way, howsever, to a treaty for the ransom, and I will hear
what Hetty has to say.
Judith, as soon as her surprise and alarm had a little
abated, discovered a proper share of affectionate joy, at the
return of her sister. She folded her to her bosom, and
kissed her, as had been her wont in the days of their
childhood
and innocence. Hetty herself was less affected, for
to her there was no surprise, and her nerves were sustained
by the purity and holiness of her purpose. At her sister's
request she took a seat, and entered into an account of her
adventures since they had parted. Her tale commenced
just as Deerslayer returned, and he also became an
attentive
listener, while the young Iroquois stood near the door,
seemingly as indifferent to what was passing, as one of its
posts.
The narrative of the girl was sufficiently clear, until she
reached the time where we left her in the camp, after the
interview with the chiefs, and at the moment when Hist
quitted her, in the abrupt manner already stated. The
sequel of the story may be told in her own language.
When I read the texts to the chiefs, Judith, you could
not have seen that they made any changes on their minds,
she said, but if seed is planted, it
will
grow. God
planted
the seeds of all the trees
Ay, that did hethat did he, muttered Deerslayer;
and a goodly harvest has followed.
God planted the seeds of all the trees, continued Hetty,
after a moment's pause, and you see to what a height and
shade they have grown! So it is with the bible. You may
read a verse this year, and forget it, and it will come back
to you a year hence, when you least expect to
remember
it.
And did you find any thing of this, among the savages,
poor Hetty?
Yes, Judith, and sooner, and more fully than I had even
hoped. I did not stay long with father and Hurry, but went
to get my breakfast with Hist. As soon as we had done,
the chiefs came to us, and
then
we found the fruits of the
seed that had been planted. They said what I had read
from the good book was rightit
must
be rightit sounded
right;
like a sweet bird singing in their ears; and they told
me to come back and say as much to the great warrior who
had slain one of their braves; and to tell it to you, and to
say how happy they should be to come to church here, in
the castle, or to come out in the sun, and hear me read
more of the sacred volumeand to tell you that they wish
you would lend them some canoes, that they can bring
father and Hurry, and their women to the castle, that we
might all sit on the platform there, and listen to the singing
of the pale-face Manitou.There, Judith; did you ever
know of any thing that so plainly shows the power of the
bible, as
that!
If it were true't would be a miracle, indeed, Hetty. But
all this is no more than Indian cunning and Indian treachery,
striving to get the better of us by management, when they
find it is not to be done by force.
Do you doubt the Bible, sister, that you judge the
savages
so harshly!
I do not doubt the Bible, poor Hetty, but I much doubt
an Indian and an Iroquois. What do you say to this visit,
Deerslayer?
First let me talk a little with Hetty, returned the party
appealed to; was this raft made after you had got your
breakfast, gal; and did you walk from the camp to the shore
opposite to us, here?
Oh! no, Deerslayer. The raft was ready made, and
in the watercould that have been by a miracle, Judith!
Yesyesan Indian miracle, rejoined the hunter.
They're expart enough in them sort of miracles. And
you found the raft ready made to your hands, and in the
water, and in waiting like for its cargo?
It was all as you say. The raft was near the camp,
and the Indians put me on it, and had ropes of bark, and
they dragged me to the place opposite to the castle, and then
they told that young man to row me off, here.
And the woods are full of the vagabonds, waiting to
know what is to be the upshot of the miracle. We
comprehend
this affair, now, Judith, and I'll first get rid of this
young Canadian blood-sucker, and then we'll settle our own
course. Do you and Hetty leave us together, first bringing
me the elephants, which the Sarpent is admiring; for 't will
never do to let this loping deer be alone a minute, or he'll
borrow a canoe without asking.
Judith did as desired, first bringing the pieces, and retiring
with her sister into their own room. Deerslayer had
acquired
some knowledge of most of the Indian dialects of that
region, and he knew enough of the Iroquois to hold a
dialogue
in the language. Beckoning to the lad, therefore, he
caused him to take a seat on the chest, when he placed two
of the castles suddenly before him. Up to that moment, this
youthful savage had not expressed a single intelligible
emotion
,
or fancy. There were many things, in and about the
place, that were novelties to him, but he had maintained his
self-command with philosophical composure. It is true,
Deerslayer had detected his dark eye scanning the defences
and the arms, but the scrutiny had been made with such an
air of innocence, in such a gaping, indolent, boyish manner,
that no one but a man who had himself been taught in a
similar school, would have even suspected his object. The
instant, however, the eyes of the savage fell upon the
wrought ivory, and the images of the wonderful, unknown
beasts, surprise and admiration got the mastery of him. The
manner in which the natives of the South Sea Islands first
beheld the toys of civilized life, has been often described;
but the reader is not to confound it with the manner of an
American Indian, under similar circumstances. In this
particular
case, the young Iroquois, or Huron, permitted an
exclamation
of rapture to escape him, and then he checked
himself, like one who had been guilty of an indecorum.
After
this, his eyes ceased to wander, but became riveted on
the elephants, one of which, after a short hesitation, he even
presumed to handle. Deerslayer did not interrupt him for
quite ten minutes; knowing that the lad was taking such note
of the curiosities, as would enable him to give the most
minute
and accurate description of their appearance, to his
seniors, on his return. When he thought sufficient time had
been allowed to produce the desired effect, the hunter laid a
finger on the naked knee of the youth, and drew his
attention
to himself.
Listen, he said; I want to talk with my young friend
from the Canadas. Let him forget that wonder for a
minute.
Where t'other pale brother? demanded the boy, looking
up, and letting the idea that had been most prominent in his
mind, previously to the introduction of the chess-men, escape
him involuntarily.
He sleepsor if he isn't fairly asleep, he is in the room,
where the men do sleep, returned Deerslayer. How did
my young friend know there was another?
See him from the shore. Iroquois have got long eyes
see beyond the cloudssee the bottom of the great spring!
Well, the Iroquois are welcome. Two pale-faces are
prisoners in the camp of your fathers, boy.
The lad nodded, treating the circumstance with great
aptant
.
Vol. I.20
Deerslayer seated himself on a stool, and watched the
progress of the ambassador; sometimes closely scanning the
whole line of shore, as far as eye could reach, and then
placing an elbow on a knee, he remained a long time with
his chin resting on the hand.
During the interview between Deerslayer and the lad, a
different scene took place in the adjoining room. Hetty had
inquired for the Delaware, and being told why and where he
remained concealed, she joined him. The reception which
Chingachgook gave his visiter was respectful and gentle.
He understood her character; and, no doubt, his disposition
to be kind to such a being was increased by the hope of
learning some tidings of his betrothed. As soon as the girl
entered, she took a seat, and invited the Indian to place
himself
near her, and then she continued silent, as if she thought
it decorous for him to question her, before she consented to
speak on the subject she had on her mind. But, as
Chingachgook
did not understand this feeling, he remained
respectfully
attentive to any thing she might be pleased to tell
him.
You are Chingachgookthe Great Serpent of the
Delawares
,
ar'n't you? the girl at length commenced, in her
own simple way, losing her self-command in the desire to
proceed, but anxious first to make sure of the individual.
Chingachgook, returned the Delaware, with grave
dignity
.
That say Great Sarpent, in Deerslayer tongue.
Well, that is my tongue. Deerslayer, and father, and
Judith, and I, and poor Hurry Harrydo you know Henry
March, Great Serpent? I know you don't, however, or
he
would have spoken of
you,
too.
Did any tongue name Chingachgook, Drooping-Lily?
for so the chief had named poor Hetty. Was his name
sung by a little bird among the Iroquois?
Hetty did not answer at first; but, with that indescribable
feeling that awakens sympathy and intelligence among the
youthful and unpractised of her sex, she hung her head, and
the blood suffused her cheek, ere she found her tongue. It
would have exceeded her stock of intelligence to explain this
embarrassment; but, though poor Hetty could not reason on
every emergency, she could always feel. The colour slowly
receded from her cheek, and the girl looked up archly at
the Indian, smiling with the innocence of a child, mingled
with the interest of a woman.
My sister, the Drooping-Lily, hear such bird!
Chingachgook
added, and this with a gentleness of tone and
manner
,
that would have astonished those who sometimes heard
the discordant cries that often came from the same throat;
these transitions from the harsh and guttural, to the soft and
melodious, not being infrequent in ordinary Indian dialogues.
My sister's ears were openhas she lost her tongue?
You
are
Chingachgookyou
must
be; for there is no
other red man here, and she thought Chingachgook would
come.
Chin-gach-gook, pronouncing the name slowly, and
dwelling on each syllable; Great Sarpent, Yengeese*
tongue.
Chin-gach-gook, repeated Hetty, in the same deliberate
manner. Yes, so Hist called it, and you
must
be the
chief.
Wah-ta!-Wah, added the Delaware.
Wah-ta!-Wah, or Hist-oh!-Hist. I think Hist prettier
than Wah, and so I call her Hist.
Wah! very sweet, in Delaware ears!
You make it sound differently from me. But, never
mind; I
did
hear the bird you speak of sing, Great
Serpent
.
Will my sister say words of song? What she sing most
how she lookoften she laugh?
She sang Chin-gach-gook oftener than any thing else;
and she laughed heartily, when I told how the Iroquois
waded into the water after us, and couldn't catch us. I hope
these logs haven't ears, Serpent!
No fear logs; fear sister next room. No fear Iroquois;
Deerslayer stuff his eyes and ears, with strange beast.
I understand you, Serpent, and I understood Hist.
Sometimes I think I'm not half as feeble-minded as they
say I am. Now, do you look up at the roof, and I'll tell
you all. But you frighten me, you look so eager, when I
speak of Hist.
The Indian controlled his looks, and affected to comply
with the simple request of the girl.
Hist told me to say, in a very low voice, that you
mustn't trust the Iroquois in any thing. They are more
artful
than any Indians she knows. Then she says that there
is a large bright star, that comes over the hill, about an hour
after dark,(Hist had pointed out the planet Jupiter, without
knowing it)and just as that star comes in sight, she will
be on the point where I landed last night, and that you
must come for her, in a canoe.
GoodChingachgook understand well enough, now;
but he understand better, if my sister sing to him, ag'in.
Hetty repeated her words, more fully explaining what star
was meant, and mentioning the part of the point where he
was to venture ashore. She now proceeded in her own
unsophisticated
way to relate her intercourse with the Indian
maid, and to repeat several of her expressions and opinions,
that gave great delight to the heart of her betrothed. She
particularly renewed her injunctions to be on their guard
against treachery; a warning that was scarcely needed,
however
,
as addressed to men as wary as those to whom it was
sent. She also explained, with sufficient clearnessfor on
all such subjects the mind of the girl seldom failed herthe
present state of the enemy, and the movements they had
made since morning. Hist had been on the raft with her,
until it quitted the shore; and was now somewhere in the
woods, opposite to the castle, and did not intend to return
to the camp, until night approached; when she hoped to be
able to slip away from her companions, as they followed the
shore on their way home, and conceal herself on the point.
No one appeared to suspect the presence of Chingachgook,
thought it was necessarily known that an Indian had entered
the ark, the previous night, and it was suspected that he had
since appeared in and about the castle, in the dress of a
pale-face. Still some little doubt existed on the latter point;
for, as this was the season when white men might be
expected
to arrive, there was some fear that the garrison of
the castle was increasing by these ordinary means. All this
had Hist communicated to Hetty while the Indians were
dragging them along shore; the distance, which exceeded six
miles, affording abundance of time.
Hist don't know, herself, whether they suspect her or
not, or, whether they suspect
you;
but she hopes neither is
the case. And now, Serpent, since I have told you so much
from your betrothed, continued Hetty, unconsciously taking
one of the Indian's hands, and playing with the fingers, as
a child is often seen to play with those of a parent; you
must let me tell you something from myself. When you
marry Hist, you must be kind to her, and smile on her, as
you do now on me; and not look cross, as some of the chiefs
do at their squaws. Will you promise this?
Alway good to Wah!too tender to twist hard; else
she break.
Yes, and smile, too; you don't know how much a girl
craves smiles from them she loves. Father scarce smiled
on me once, while I was with himand, Hurryyes
Hurry talked loud, and laughed; but I don't think
he
smiled
once either. You know the difference between a smile and
a laugh?
Laugh, best. Hear Wah! laugh, think bird sing!
I know that; her laugh
is
pleasant, but
you
must smile.
And then, Serpent, you mustn't make her carry burthens
and hoe corn, as so many Indians do; but treat her more
as the pale-faces treat their wives.
Wah-ta!-Wah no pale-facegot red skin; red heart,
red feelin's. All red; no pale-face.
Must
carry papoose.
Every woman is willing to carry her child, said Hetty,
smiling; and there is no harm in
that
. But you must love
Hist, and be gentle, and good to her; for she is gentle and
good herself.
Chingachgook gravely bowed, and then he seemed to
20*
think this part of the subject might be dismissed. Before
there was time for Hetty to resume her communications, the
voice of Deerslayer was heard calling on his friend, in the
outer room. At this summons the Serpent arose to obey,
and Hetty joined her sister.
CHAPTER XIV.
`A stranger animal,' cries one,
`Sure never lived beneath the sun;
A lizard's body, lean and long,
A fish's head, a serpent's tongue,
Its foot, with triple claw disjoined;
And what a length of tail behind!'
Merrick
.
The
first act of the Delaware, on rejoining his friend, was
to proceed gravely to disencumber himself of his civilized
attire, and to stand forth an Indian warrior again. The
protest of Deerslayer was met by his communicating the
fact that the presence of an Indian in the hut, was known to
the Iroquois, and that his maintaining the disguise would be
more likely to direct suspicions to his real object, than if he
came out openly as a member of a hostile tribe. When the
latter understood the truth, and was told that he had been
deceived in supposing the chief had succeeded in entering
the ark undiscovered, he cheerfully consented to the change,
since further attempt at concealment was useless. A gentler
feeling than the one avowed, however, lay at the bottom of
the Indian's desire to appear as a son of the forest. He had
been told that Hist was on the opposite shore; and nature so
far triumphed over all distinctions of habit, and tribes, and
people, as to reduce this young savage warrior to the level
of a feeling which would have been found in the most
refined
inhabitant of a town, under similar circumstances.
There was a mild satisfaction in believing that she he loved
could see him; and as he walked out on the platform, in his
scanty, native attire, an Apollo of the wilderness, a hundred
of the tender fancies that fleet through lovers' brains, beset
his imagination and softened his heart.
All this was lost on Deerslayer, who was no great adept
in the mysteries of Cupid, but whose mind was far more
occupied
with the concerns that forced themselves on his
attention
,
than with any of the truant fancies of love. He
soon recalled his companion, therefore, to a sense of their
actual condition, by summoning him to a sort of council of
war, in which they were to settle their future course. In the
dialogue that followed, the parties mutually made each other
acquainted with what had passed in their several interviews.
Chingachgook was told the history of the treaty about the
ransom; and Deerslayer heard the whole of Hetty's
communications
.
The latter listened with generous interest to
his friend's hopes, and promised cheerfully all the assistance
he could lend.
'T is our main ar'n'd, Sarpent, as you know; this
battling
for the castle and old Hutter's darters, coming in as a
sort of accident. YesyesI'll be act
y
ve in helping little
Hist, who's not only one of the best and handsomest maidens
of the tribe, but the
very
best and handsomest. I've always
encouraged you, chief, in that liking; and it's proper, too,
that a great and ancient race like your'n shouldn't come to
an end. If a woman of red skin and red gifts, could get to
be near enough to me to wish her for a wife, I'd s'arch for
just such another, but that can
never
be; no, that can
never
be. I'm glad Hetty has met with Hist, howsever, for though
the first is a little short of wit and understanding, the last
has enough for both. Yes, Sarpent, laughing heartily,
put'em together, and two smarter gals isn't to be found in
all York colony!
I will go to the Iroquois camp, returned the Delaware,
gravely. No one knows Chingachgook but Wah!, and
a treaty for lives and scalps should be made by a chief!
Give me the strange beasts, and let me take a canoe.
Deerslayer dropped his head, and played with the end of
a fish-pole in the water, as he sate dangling his legs over the
edge of the platform, like a man who was lost in thought,
by the sudden occurrence of a novel idea. Instead of
directly
answering the proposal of his friend, he began to
sotiloquize
;
a circumstance, however, that in no manner
rendered
his words more true, as he was remarkable for saying
what he thought, whether the remarks were addressed to
himself, or to any one else.
Yesyes, he said, this must be what they call love!
I've heard say that it sometimes upsets reason altogether,
leaving a young man as helpless, as to calculation and
caution
,
as a brute beast. To think that the Sarpent should be
so lost to reason, and cunning, and wisdom! We must,
sartainly, manage to get Hist off, and have'em married as
soon as we get back to the tribe, or this war will be of no
more use to the chief, than a hunt a little oncommon and
extr'ornary. Yesyeshe'll never be the man he was,
till this matter is off his mind, and he comes to his senses,
like all the rest of mankind. Sarpent, you can't be in
airnest, and therefore I shall say but little to your offer. But
you're a chief, and will soon be sent out on the war-path at
the head of parties, and I'll just ask if you'd think of putting
your forces into the inimy's hands, afore the battle is
fou't?'
Wah! ejaculated the Indian.
AyWah!I know well enough it's Wah!, and
altogether
Wah! Ra'ally, Sarpent, I'm consarned and
mortified
about you! I never heard so weak an idee come from
a chief, and he, too, one that's already got a name for being
wise, young and inexper'enced as he is. Canoe you shan't
have, so long as the v'ice of fri'ndship and warning can
count for any thing.
My pale-face friend is right. A cloud came over the
face of Chingachgook, and weakness got into his mind,
while his eyes were dim. My brother has a good memory
for good deeds, and a weak memory for bad. He will
forget
.
Yes, that's easy enough. Say no more about it chief;
but if another of them clouds blow near you, do your
endivour to get out of its way. Clouds are bad enough in
the weather; but when they come to the reason, it gets to be
serious. Now, sit down by me here, and let us calculate
our movements a little, for we shall soon either have a truce
and a peace, or we shall come to an act
y
ve, and bloody war.
You see the vagabonds can make logs serve their turn, as
well as the best raftsmen on the rivers; and it would be no
great expl'ite for them to invade us in a body. I've been
thinking of the wisdom of putting all old Tom's stores into the
ark, of barring and locking up the castle, and of taking to
the ark, altogether. That is moveable, and by keeping the
sail up, and shifting places, we might worry through a great
many nights, without them Canada wolves finding a way
into our sheep-fold.
Chingachgook listened to this plan, with approbation. Did
the negotiation fail, there was now little hope that the night
would pass without an assault; and the enemy had sagacity
enough to understand, that, in carrying the castle, they
would probably become masters of all it contained, the
offered
ransom included, and still retain the advantages they
had hitherto gained. Some precaution of the sort appeared
to be absolutely necessary; for now the numbers of the
Iroquois
were known, a night attack could scarcely be
successfully
met. It would be impossible to prevent the enemy from
getting possession of the canoes and the ark, and the latter
itself would be a hold in which the assailants would be as
effectually protected against bullets as were those in the
building. For a few minutes, both the men thought of
sinking
the ark in the shallow water, of bringing the canoes into
the house, and of depending altogether on the castle for
protection
.
But reflection satisfied them that, in the end, this
expedient would fail. It was so easy to collect logs on the
shore, and to construct a raft of almost any size, that it was
certain the Iroquois, now they had turned their attention to
such means, would resort to them seriously, so long as there
was the certainty of success by perseverance. After
deliberating
maturely, and placing all the considerations fairly
before
them, the two young beginners in the art of forest
warfare
,
settled down into the opinion, that the ark offered the
only available means of security. This decision was no
sooner come to, than it was communicated to Judith. The
girl had no serious objection to make, and then all four set
about the measures necessary to carrying the plan into
execution
.
The reader will readily understand that Floating Tom's
worldly goods were of no great amount. A couple of beds,
some wearing apparel, the arms and ammunition, a few
cooking utensils, with the mysterious, and but half-examined
chest, formed the principal items. These were all soon
removed
,
the ark having been hauled on the eastern side of the
building, so that the transfer could be made without being
seen from the shore. It was thought unnecessary to disturb
the heavier and coarser articles of furniture, as they were
not required in the ark, and were of but little value in
themselves
.
As great caution was necessary in removing the
different objects, most of which were passed out of a window
with a view to conceal what was going on, it required two
or three hours before all could be effected. By the
expiration
of that time, the raft made its appearance, moving from
the shore. Deerslayer immediately had recourse to the
glass, by the aid of which he perceived that two warriors
were on it, though they appeared to be unarmed. The
progress
of the raft was slow, a circumstance that formed one
of the great advantages that would be possessed by the scow,
in any future collision between them; the movements of the
latter being comparatively swift and light. As there was
time to make the dispositions for the reception of the two
dangerous visiters, every thing was prepared for them, long
before they had got near enough to be hailed. The Serpent
and the girls retired into the building, where the former stood
near the door, well provided with rifles; while Judith watched
the proceedings without through a loop. As for Deerslayer,
he had brought a stool to the edge of the platform, at the
point towards which the raft was advancing, and taken his
seat, with his rifle leaning carelessly between his legs.
As the raft drew nearer, every means possessed by the
party in the castle was resorted to, in order to ascertain if
their visiters had any fire-arms. Neither Deerslayer nor
Chingachgook could discover any; but Judith, unwilling to
trust to simple eye-sight, thrust the glass through the loop,
and directed it towards the hemlock boughs that lay between
the two logs of the raft, forming a sort of flooring, as well
as a seat for the use of the rowers. When the
heavy-moving
craft was within fifty feet of him, Deerslayer hailed the
Hurons, directing them to cease rowing, it not being his
intention
to permit them to land. Compliance, of course, was
necessary, and the two grim-looking warriors instantly
quitted their seats, though the raft continued slowly to
approach
,
until it had driven in much nearer to the platform.
Are ye chiefs? demanded Deerslayer, with dignity.
Are ye chiefs?or have the Mingos sent me warriors
without names, on such an ar'n'd? If so, the sooner ye
go back, the sooner the one will be likely to come that a
warrior
can talk with.
Hugh! exclaimed the elder of the two on the raft,
rolling his glowing eyes over the different objects that were
visible in and about the castle, with a keenness that showed
how little escaped him. My brother is very proud, but
Rivenoak (we use the literal translation of the term, writing
as we do in English) is a name to make a Delaware turn
pale.
That's true, or it's a lie, Rivenoak, as it may be; but
I am not likely to turn pale, seeing that I was born pale.
What's your ar'n'd, and why do you come among light
bark canoes, on logs that are not even dug out?
The Iroquois are not ducks, to walk on water! Let
the pale-faces give them a canoe, and they'll come in a
canoe.
That's more rational, than likely to come to pass. We
have but four canoes, and being four persons, that's only
one for each of us. We thank you for the offer, howsever,
though we ask leave not to accept it. You are welcome,
Iroquois, on your logs.
Thanksmy young pale-face warriorhe has got a
namehow do the chiefs call him?
Deerslayer hesitated a moment, and a gleam of pride and
human weakness came over him. He smiled, muttered
between
his teeth, and then looking up proudly, he said
Mingo, like all who are young and act
y
ve, I've been
known by different names, at different times. One of your
warriors whose spirit started for the happy-grounds of your
people, as lately as yesterday morning, thought I desarved
to be known by the name of Hawkeye; and this because
my sight happened to be quicker than his own, when it got
to be life or death, atween us.
Chingachgook, who was attentively listening to all that
passed, heard and understood this proof of passing
weakness
in his friend, and on a future occasion he questioned
him more closely concerning the whole transaction on the
point, where Deerslayer had first taken human life. When
he had got the whole truth, he did not fail to communicate
it to the tribe; from which time the young hunter was
universally
known among the Delawares, by an appellation so
honourably earned. As this, however, was a period
posterior
to all the incidents of this tale, we shall continue to call
the young hunter by the name under which he has been
first introduced to the reader. Nor was the Iroquois less
struck with the vaunt of the white man. He knew of the
death of his comrade, and had no difficulty in
understanding
the allusion; the intercourse between the conqueror and
his victim on that occasion, having been seen by several
savages on the shore of the lake, who had been stationed at
different points just within the margin of the bushes, to
watch the drifting canoes, and who had not time to reach
the scene of action ere the victor had retired. The effect
on this rude being of the forest, was an exclamation of
surprise
;
then such a smile of courtesy, and wave of the hand,
succeeded, as would have done credit to Asiatic diplomacy.
The two Iroquois spoke to each other, in low terms, and
both drew near the end of the raft that was closest to the
platform.
My brother, Hawkeye, has sent a message to the
Hurons
,
resumed Rivenoak, and it has made their hearts
very glad. They hear he has images of beasts with two
tails! Will he show them to his friends?
Inimies would be truer, returned Deerslayer; but
sound isn't sense, and does little harm. Here is one of the
images; I toss it to you under faith of treaties. If it's not
returned, the rifle will settle the p'int atween us.
The Iroquois seemed to acquiesce in the conditions, and
Deerslayer arose and prepared to toss one of the elephants
to the raft, both parties using all the precaution that was
necessary to prevent its loss. As practice renders men
expert
in such things, the little piece of ivory was soon
successfully
transferred from one hand to the other; and then
followed another scene on the raft, in which astonishment
and delight got the mastery of Indian stoicism. These two
grim old warriors manifested even more feeling, as they
examined
the curiously-wrought chess-man, than had been
betrayed by the boy; for, in the case of the latter, recent
schooling had interposed its influence; while the men, like
all who are sustained by well-established characters, were
not ashamed to let some of their emotions be discovered.
For a few minutes they apparently lost all consciousness of
their situation, in the intense scrutiny they bestowed on a
material so fine, work so highly wrought, and an animal so
extraordinary. The lip of the moose is, perhaps, the nearest
approach to the trunk of the elephant that is to be found in
the American forest; but this resemblance was far from
being sufficiently striking to bring the new creature within
the range of their habits and ideas, and the more they
studied
the image, the greater was their astonishment. Nor
did these children of the forest mistake the structure on the
back of the elephant for a part of the animal. They were
familiar with horses and oxen, and had seen towers in the
Canadas, and found nothing surprising in creatures of
burthen
.
Still, by a very natural association, they supposed
the carving meant to represent that the animal they saw
was of a strength sufficient to carry a fort on its back; a
circumstance that in no degree lessened their wonder.
Has my pale-face brother any more such beasts? at
last the senior of the Iroquois asked, in a sort of
petitioning
manner.
There's more where them came from, Mingo, was the
answer; one is enough, however, to buy off fifty scalps.
One of my prisoners is a great warriortall as a pine
strong as the mooseactive as a deerfierce as the panther!
Some day he'll be a great chief, and lead the army of King
George!
TuttutMingo; Harry Hurry is Harry Hurry, and
you'll never make more than a corporal of him, if you do
that. He's tall enough, of a sartainty; but that's of no
use, as he only hits his head ag'in the branches as he goes
through the forest. He's strong, too; but a strong body
isn't a strong head, and the king's generals are not chosen
for their sinews. He's swift, if you will, but a rifle-bullet
is swifter; and as for f'erceness, it's no great recommend
to a soldier; they that think they feel the stoutest, often
givin' out at the pinch. Nonoyou'll never make
Hurry's
Vol. I.21
scalp pass for more than a good head of curly hair,
and a rattlepate beneath it!
My old prisoner very wiseking of the lakegreat
warrior, wise counsellor!
Well, there's them that might gainsay all this, too,
Mingo. A very wise man wouldn't be apt to be taken in so
foolish a manner as befel Master Hutter; and if he gives
good counsel, he must have listened to bad, in all that affair.
There's only one king of this lake, and he's a long way
off, and isn't likely ever to see it. Floating Tom is some
such king of this region, as the wolf that prowls through
the woods, is king of the forest. A beast with two tails is
well worth two such scalps!
But my brother has another beast?He will give two,
holding up as many fingers, for old father?
Floating Tom is no father of mine, but he'll fare none
the worse for that. As for giving two beasts for his scalp,
and each beast with two tails, it is quite beyond reason.
Think yourself well off, Mingo, if you make a much worse
trade.
By this time the self-command of Rivenoak had got the
better of his wonder, and he began to fall back on his usual
habits of cunning, in order to drive the best bargain he
could. It would be useless to relate more than the substance
of the desultory dialogue that followed, in which the Indian
manifested no little management, in endeavouring to recover
the ground lost under the influence of surprise. He even
affected to doubt whether any original for the image of the
beast existed, and asserted that the oldest Indian had never
heard a tradition of any such animal. Little did either of
them imagine, at the time, that long ere a century elapsed,
the progress of civilization would bring even much more
extraordinary
and rare animals into that region, as curiosities to
be gazed at by the curious, and that the particular beast,
about which the disputants contended, would be seen laving
its sides and swimming in the very sheet of water on which
they had met. As is not uncommon on such occasions,
one of the parties got a little warm, in the course of the
discussion; for Deerslayer met all the arguments and
prevarications
of his subtle opponent, with his own cool
directness
of manner, and unmoved love of truth. What an
elephant was, he knew little better than the savage; but he
perfectly understood that the carved pieces of ivory must
have some such value in the eyes of an Iroquois, as a bag
of gold, or a package of beaver-skins, would in those of a
trader. Under the circumstances, therefore, he felt it to be
prudent not to concede too much at first, since there existed
a nearly unconquerable obstacle to making the transfers,
even after the contracting parties had actually agreed upon
the terms. Keeping this difficulty in view, he held the extra
chess-men in reserve, as a means of smoothing any
difficulty
in the moment of need.
At length the savage pretended that further negotiation
was useless, since he could not be so unjust to his tribe as
to part with the honour and emoluments of two excellent,
full-grown, male scalps, for a consideration so trifling as
two toys like those he had seenand he prepared to take
his departure. Both parties now felt as men are wont to
feel, when a bargain that each is anxious to conclude, is on
the eve of being broken off, in consequence of too much
pertinacity in the way of management. The effect of the
disappointment was very different, however, on the
respective
individuals. Deerslayer was mortified, and filled with
regret; for he not only felt for the prisoners, but he also
felt deeply for the two girls. The conclusion of the treaty,
therefore, left him melancholy and full of regret. With the
savage, his defeat produced the savage desire of revenge.
In a moment of excitement, he had loudly announced his
intention to say no more; and he felt equally enraged with
himself and with his cool opponent, that he had permitted a
pale-face to manifest more indifference and self-command
than an Indian chief. When he began to urge his raft away
from the platform, his countenance lowered, and his eye
glowed, even while he affected a smile of amity and a
gesture
of courtesy, at parting.
It took some little time to overcome the
vis inerti
of the
logs, and while this was doing by the silent Indian, Rivenoak
stalked over the hemlock boughs that lay between the logs,
in sullen ferocity, eyeing keenly the while, the hut, the
platform
,
and the person of his late disputant. Once he spoke
in low, quick terms to his companion, and he stirred the
boughs with his feet, like an animal that is restive. At that
moment, the watchfulness of Deerslayer had a little abated,
for he sat musing on the means of renewing the
negotiation
without giving too much advantage to the other side.
It was perhaps fortunate for him that the keen and bright
eyes of Judith were as vigilant as ever. At the instant
when the young man was least on his guard, and his enemy
was the most on the alert, she called out, in a warning voice,
to the former, most opportunely giving the alarm.
Be on your guard, Deerslayer, the girl cried; I see
rifles, with the glass, beneath the hemlock brush, and the
Iroquois is loosening them with his feet!
It would seem that the enemy had carried their artifices
so far as to employ an agent who understood English. The
previous dialogue had taken place in his own language, but
it was evident, by the sudden manner in which his feet
ceased their treacherous occupation, and in which the
countenance
of Rivenoak changed from sullen ferocity to a smile
of courtesy, that the call of the girl was understood.
Signing
to his companion to cease his efforts to set the logs in
motion, he advanced to the end of the raft which was
nearest
to the platform, and spoke.
Why should Rivenoak and his brother leave any cloud
between them? he said. They are both wise, both brave,
and both generous; they ought to part friends. One beast
shall be the price of one prisoner.
And, Mingo, answered the other, delighted to renew
the negotiation on almost any terms, and determined to
clinch the bargain if possible by a little extra liberality,
you'll see that a pale-face knows how to pay a full price,
when he trades with an open heart, and an open hand.
Keep the beast that you had forgotten to give back to me,
as you was about to start, and which I forgot to ask for, on
account of consarn at parting in anger. Show it to your
chiefs. When you bring us our fri'nds, two more shall be
added to itand hesitating a moment in distrust of the
expediency of so great a concession, then, deciding in its
favourand, if we see them afore the sun sets, we may
find a fourth, to make up an even number.
This settled the matter. Every gleam of discontent
vanished
from the dark countenance of the Iroquois, and he
smiled as graciously, if not as sweetly, as Judith Hutter,
herself. The piece already in his possession was again
examined
,
and an ejaculation of pleasure showed how much
he was pleased with this unexpected termination of the
affair. In point of fact, both he and Deerslayer had
momentarily
forgotten what had become of the subject of their
discussion, in the warmth of their feelings; but such had
not been the case with Rivenoak's companion. This man
retained the piece, and had fully made up his mind, were it
claimed under such circumstances as to render its return
necessary, to drop it in the lake, trusting to his being able
to find it again, at some future day. This desperate
expedient
,
however, was no longer necessary; and, after
repeating
the terms of agreement, and professing to understand
them, the two Indians finally took their departure, moving
slowly towards the shore.
Can any faith be put in such wretches? asked Judith,
when she and Hetty had come out on the platform, and were
standing at the side of Deerslayer, watching the dull
movement
of the logs. Will they not rather keep the toy they
have, and send us off some bloody proofs of their getting
the better of us in cunning, by way of boasting? I've
heard of acts as bad as this.
No doubtJudith; no manner of doubt, if it wasn't
for Indian natur'. But I'm no judge of a red-skin, if that
two-tail'd beast doesn't set the whole tribe in some such
stir, as a stick raises in a beehive! Now, there's the
Sarpent
;
a man with narves like flint, and no more cur'osity
in every-day consarns, than is befitting prudence.Why he
was so overcome with the sight of the creatur', carved as it
is in bone, that I felt ashamed for him! That's just their
gifts, however, and one can't well quarrel with a man for
his gifts, when they are lawful. Chingachgook will soon
get over his weakness, and remember that he's a chief, and
that he comes of a great stock, and has a renowned name
to support and uphold; but, as for yonder scamps, there'll
be no peace among'em, until they think they've got
possession
of every thing of the natur' of that bit of carved
bone, that's to be found among Thomas Hutter's stores!
They only know of the elephants, and can have no
hopes about the other things.
That's true, Judith; still, covetousness is a craving
21 *
feelin'. They 'll say, if the pale-faces have these curious
beasts with two tails, who knows but they've got some with
three, or, for that matter, with four! That's what the
schoolmasters call nat'ral arithmetic, and 't will be sartain
to beset the feelin's of savages. They 'll never be easy,
till the truth is known.
Do you think, Deerslayer, inquired Hetty, in her
simple
and innocent manner, that the Iroquois won't let father
and Hurry go?  I read to them several of the very best
verses in the whole Bible, and you see what they have done,
already.
The hunter, as he always did, listened kindly and even
affectionately to Hetty's remarks: then he mused a moment
in silence. There was something like a flush on his cheek,
as he answered, after quite a minute had passed.
I don't know whether a white man ought to be ashamed,
or not, to own he can't read; but such is my case, Judith.
You are skilful, I find, in all such matters, while I have only
studied the hand of God, as it is seen in the hills and the
valleys, the mountain-tops, the streams, the forest, and the
springs. Much l'arning may be got in this way, as well as
out of books; and, yet, I sometimes think it is a white
man's gift to read! When I hear from the mouths of the
Moravians, the words of which Hetty speaks, they raise a
longing in my mind, and I think I
will
know how to read
'em myself; but the game in summer, and the traditions,
and lessons in war, and other matters, have always kept me
behindhand.
Shall I teach you, Deerslayer? asked Hetty, earnestly.
I'm weak-minded, they say, but I can read as well as
Judith
.
It might save your life, to know how to read the Bible
to the savages, and it will certainly save your soul; for
mother
told me
that
, again and again!
Thankee, Hetty  yes, thankee, with all my heart.
There are like to be too stirring times for much idleness;
but, after it 's peace, and I come to see you ag'in on this
lake, then I 'll give myself up to it, as if 'twas pleasure and
profit, in a single business. Perhaps I ought to be ashamed,
Judith, that 't is so; but truth is truth. As for these
Iroquois
,
'tisn't very likely they 'll forget a beast with two
tails, on account of a varse or two from the Bible. I rather
expect they 'll give up the prisoners, and trust to some
sarcumvention
,
or other, to get 'em back ag'in, with us and all
in the castle, and the ark, in the bargain. Howsever, we
must humour the vagabonds, first, to get your father and
Hurry out of their hands, and next, to keep the peace atween
us, until such time as the Sarpent there, can make out to
get off his betrothed wife. If there's any sudden outbreakin'
of anger and ferocity, the Indians will send off all their
women
and children to the camp, at once; whereas, by keeping
'em calm and trustful, we may manage to meet Hist, at the
spot she has mentioned. Rather than have the bargain fall
through, now, I 'd throw in half a dozen of them effigy
bow-and-arrow
men, such as we 've in plenty in the chist.
Judith cheerfully assented, for she would have resigned
even the flowered brocade, rather than not redeem her father,
and please Deerslayer.
The prospects of success were now so encouraging, as to
raise the spirits of all in the castle, though a due
watchfulness
on the movements of the enemy, was maintained.
Hour passed after hour, notwithstanding, and the sun had
once more begun to fall towards the summits of the western
hills, and yet no signs were seen of the return of the raft.
By dint of sweeping the shore with the glass, Deerslayer at
length discovered a place in the dense and dark woods,
where, he entertained no doubt, the Iroquois were assembled
in considerable numbers. It was near the thicket whence
the raft had issued, and a little rill that trickled into the lake
announced the vicinity of a spring. Here, then, the savages
were probably holding their consultation, and the decision
was to be made that went to settle the question of life or
death for the prisoners. There was one ground for hope in
spite of the delay, however, that Deerslayer did not fail to
place before his anxious companions. It was far more
probable
that the Indians had left their prisoners in the camp,
than that they had encumbered themselves, by causing them
to follow through the woods, a party that was out on a merely
temporary excursion. If such was the fact, it required
considerable
time to send a messenger the necessary distance,
and to bring the two white men to the spot where they were
to embark. Encouraged by these reflections, a new stock
of patience was gathered, and the declension of the sun was
viewed with less alarm.
The result justified Deerslayer's conjecture. Not long
before the sun had finally disappeared, the two logs were
seen coming out of the thicket, again; and, as it drew near,
Judith announced that her father and Hurry, both of them
pinioned, lay on the bushes in the centre. As before, the
Indians were rowing. The latter seemed to be conscious
that the lateness of the hour demanded unusual exertions,
and contrary to the habits of their people, who are ever
averse to toil, they laboured hard at the rude substitutes for
oars. In consequence of this diligence, the raft occupied its
old station, in about half the time that had been taken in the
previous visits.
Even after the conditions were so well understood, and
matters had proceeded so far, the actual transfer of the
prisoners was not a duty to be executed without difficulty.
The Iroquois were compelled to place great reliance on the
good faith of their foes, though it was reluctantly given, and
was yielded to necessity rather than to confidence. As soon
as Hutter and Hurry should be released, the party in the
castle numbered two to one, as opposed to those on the raft,
and escape by flight was out of the question, as the former
had three bark canoes, to say nothing of the defences of the
house and the ark. All this was understood by both
parties
,
and it is probable the arrangement never could have
been completed, had not the honest countenance and manner
of Deerslayer wrought their usual effect on Rivenoak.
My brother knows I put faith in
him
, said the latter, as
he advanced with Hutter, whose legs had been released to
enable the old man to ascend to the platform. One scalp
one more beast.
Stop, Mingo, interrupted the hunter, keep your
prisoner
a moment. I have to go and seek the means of
payment
.
This excuse, however, though true in part, was
principally
a fetch. Deerslayer left the platform, and entering
the house, he directed Judith to collect all the arms, and to
conceal them in her own room. He then spoke earnestly to
the Delaware, who stood on guard as before, near the
entrance
of the building, put the three remaining castles in his
pocket, and returned.
You are welcome back, to your old abode, Master
Hutter
,
said Deerslayer, as he helped the other up on the
platform, slily passing into the hand of Rivenoak, at the
same time, another of the castles. You 'll find your darters
right glad to see you; and here's Hetty come herself, to say
as much in her own behalf.
Here the hunter stopped speaking of his own accord, and
broke out into a hearty fit of his silent and peculiar laughter.
Hurry's legs were just released, and he had been placed on
his feet. So tightly had the ligatures been drawn, that the
use of his limbs was not immediately recovered, and the
young giant presented, in good sooth, a very helpless and a
somewhat ludicrous picture. It was this unusual spectacle,
particularly the bewildered countenance, that excited the
merriment of Deerslayer.
You look like a girdled pine in a clearin', Harry Hurry,
that is rocking in a gale, said Deerslayer, checking his
unseasonable
mirth, more from delicacy to the others, than from
any respect to the liberated captive. I 'm glad, howsever, to
see that you haven't had your hair dressed by any of the
Iroquois barbers, in your late visit to their camp.
Harkee, Deerslayer, returned the other, a little fiercely;
it will be prudent for you to deal less in mirth, and more
in friendship, on this occasion. Act like a Christian, for
once, and not like a laughing gal in a country school, when
the master's back is turned, and just tell me whether there's
any feet, or not, at the end of these legs of mine. I think I
can see them, but as for feelin', they might as well be down
on the banks of the Mohawk, as where they seem to be.
You 've come off whole, Hurry, and that 's not a little,
answered the other, secretly passing to the Indian the
remainder
of the stipulated ransom, and making an earnest
sign, at the same moment, for him to commence his retreat.
You 've come off whole, feet and all, and are only a little
numb, from a tight fit of the withes. Natur'll soon set the
blood in motion, and then you may begin to dance, to
celebrate
what I call a most wonderful and onexpected
deliverance
from a den of wolves.
Deerslayer released the arms of his friends, as each landed,
CHAPTER XV.
As long as Edwarde rules thys lande,
Ne quiet you wylle know;
Your sonnes and husbandes shall be slayne,
And brookes with bloode shall flowe.
You leave youre goode and lawfulle kynge,
Whenne ynne adversitye;
Like me, untoe the true cause stycke,
And for the true cause dye.
Chatterton
.
The
calm of evening was again in singular contrast,
while its gathering gloom was in as singular unison, with
the passions of men. The sun was set, and the rays of the
retiring luminary had ceased to gild the edges of the few
clouds that had sufficient openings to admit the passage of
its fading light. The canopy overhead was heavy and
dense, promising another night of darkness, but the
surface
of the lake was scarcely disturbed by a ripple. There
was a little air, though it scarce deserved to be termed wind.
Still, being damp and heavy, it had a certain force. The
party in the castle were as gloomy and silent as the scene.
The two ransomed prisoners felt humbled and dishonoured,
but their humility partook of the rancour of revenge. They
were far more disposed to remember the indignity with
which they had been treated during the last few hours of
their captivity, than to feel grateful for the previous
indulgence
.
Then that keen-sighted monitor conscience, by
reminding
them of the retributive justice of all they had
endured
,
goaded them, rather to turn the tables on their
enemies, than to accuse themselves. As for the others,
they were thoughtful equally from regret and joy.
Deerslayer
and Judith felt most of the former sensation, though
from very different causes, while Hetty for the moment was
perfectly happy. The Delaware had also lively pictures of
felicity in the prospect of so soon regaining his betrothed.
Under such circumstances, and in this mood, all were taking
the evening meal.
Old Tom! cried Hurry, bursting into a fit of boisterous
laughter, you look'd amazin'ly like a tethered bear, as
you was stretched on them hemlock boughs, and I only
wonder you didn't growl more. Well, it's over, and syth's
and lamentations won't mend the matter! There's the
blackguard Rivenoak, he that brought us off, has an
oncommon
scalp, and I'd give as much for it myself as the
Colony. Yes, I feel as rich as the governor, in these
matters
now, and will lay down with them doubloon for
doubloon
.
Judith, darling, did you mourn for me much, when
I was in the hands of the Philipsteins.
The last were a family of German descent on the
Mohawk
,
to whom Hurry had a great antipathy, and whom he
had confounded with the enemies of Judea.
Our tears have raised the lake, Harry March, as you
might have seen by the shore! returned Judith, with a
feigned levity that she was far from feeling. That Hetty
and I should have grieved for father, was to be expected; but
we fairly rained tears for you.
We
were
sorry for poor Hurry, as well as for father,
Judith! put in her innocent and unconscious sister.
True, girl, true; but we feel sorrow for everybody
that's in trouble, you know, returned the other in a quick,
admonitory manner, and a low tone. Nevertheless, we are
glad to see you, Master March, and out of the hands of the
Philipsteins, too.
Yes, they're a bad set, and so is the other brood of
'em, down on the river. It's a wonderment to me, how
you got us off, Deerslayer; and I forgive you the
interference
that prevented my doin' justice on that vagabond, for
this small service. Let us into the secret, that we may do
you the same good turn, at need. Was it by lying, or by
coaxing?
By neither, Hurry, but by buying. We paid a ransom
for you both, and that, too, at a price so high, you had well
be on your guard ag'in another capt
y
vement, lest our stock
of goods shouldn't hold out.
A ransom!  Old Tom has paid the fiddler, then, for
nothing of mine would have bought off the hair, much less
the skin. I didn't think men as keen set as them
vagabonds
,
would let a fellow up so easy, when they had him
fairly at a close hug, and floored. But money is money,
and somehow it's unnat'ral hard to withstand. Indian, or
white man, 'tis pretty much the same. It must be owned
Judith, there's a considerable of human natur' in mankind
ginirally, after all!
Hutter now rose, and signing to Deerslayer, he led him
to an inner room, where, in answer to his questions, he first
learned the price that had been paid for his release. The
old man expressed neither resentment nor surprise at the
inroad that had been made on his chest, though he did
manifest
some curiosity to know how far the investigation of its
contents had been carried. He also inquired where the key
had been found. The habitual frankness of Deerslayer
prevented any prevarication, and the conference soon
terminated
by the return of the two to the outer room, or that
which served for the double purpose of parlour and kitchen.
I wonder if it 's peace or war, between us and the
savages
!
exclaimed Hurry, just as Deerslayer, who had
paused for a single instant, listened attentively, and was
passing through the outer door without stopping. This
givin' up captives has a friendly look, and when men have
traded together, on a fair and honourable footing, they ought
to part fri'nds, for that occasion, at least. Come back,
Deerslayer, and let us have your judgment, for I 'm
beginnin'
to think more of you, since your late behaviour, than I
used to do.
There's an answer to your question, Hurry, since
you 're in such haste to come ag'in to blows.
As Deerslayer spoke, he threw on the table, on which the
other was reclining with one elbow, a sort of miniature fagot,
composed of a dozen sticks bound tightly together with a
deer-skin thong. March seized it eagerly, and holding it
close to a blazing knot of pine that lay on the hearth, and
which gave out all the light there was in the room,
ascertained
that the ends of the several sticks had been dipped in
blood.
If this isn't plain English, said the reckless frontier
man, it 's plain Indian! Here's what they call a
dicliration
of war, down at York, Judith. How did you come by
this defiance, Deerslayer?
Vol. I.  22
Fairly enough. It lay, not a minut' since, in what you
call Floatin' Tom's door yard.
How came it there? It never fell from the clouds,
Judith
,
as little toads sometimes do, and then it don't rain.
You must prove where it come from, Deerslayer, or we shall
suspect some design to skear them that would have lost their
wits long ago, if fear could drive 'em away.
Deerslayer had approached a window, and cast a glance
out of it, on the dark aspect of the lake. As if satisfied with
what he beheld, he drew near Hurry, and took the bundle
of sticks into his own hand, examining it attentively.
Yes, this is an Indian dicliration of war, sure enough,
he said, and it 's a proof how little you 're suited to be on
the path it has travelled, Harry March, that it has got here,
and you never the wiser, as to the means. The savages
may have left the scalp on your head, but they must have
taken off the
ears;
else you 'd have heard the stirring of the
water made by the lad as he come off ag'in, on his two logs.
His ar'n'd was to throw these sticks at our door, as much
as to say, we 've struck the war-pool since the trade, and
the next thing will be to strike
you
.
The prowling wolves! But hand me that rifle, Judith,
and I 'll send an answer back to the vagabonds through
their messenger.
Not while I stand by, Master March, coolly put in
Deerslayer, motioning for the other to forbear. Faith is
faith, whether given to a red-skin, or to a Christian. The
lad lighted a knot, and came off fairly, under its blaze, to
give us this warning; and no man here should harm him,
while empl'yed on such an ar'n'd. There 's no use in
words, for the boy is too cunning to leave the knot burning,
now his business is done, and the night is already too dark
for a rifle to have any sartainty.
That may be true enough, as to a gun, but there's
virtue
still in a canoe, answered Hurry, passing towards the
door with enormous strides, carrying a rifle in his hands.
The being doesn't live that shall stop me from following,
and bringing back that riptyle's scalp. The more on 'em
that you crush in the egg, the fewer there 'll be to dart at
you in the woods!
Judith trembled like the aspen, she scarce knew why
herself
,
though there was the prospect of a scene of violence;
for, if Hurry was fierce, and overbearing in the
consciousness
of his vast strength, Deerslayer had about him the
calm determination that promises greater perseverance, and
a resolution more likely to effect its object. It was the
stern, resolute eye of the latter, rather than the noisy
vehemence
of the first, that excited her apprehensions. Hurry
soon reached the spot where the canoe was fastened, but not
before Deerslayer had spoke in a quick, earnest voice to the
Serpent, in Delaware. The latter had been the first, in
truth, to hear the sounds of the oars, and he had gone upon
the platform, in jealous watchfulness. The light satisfied
him that a message was coming, and when the boy cast his
bundle of sticks at his feet, it neither moved his anger, nor
induced surprise. He merely stood at watch, rifle in hand,
to make certain that no treachery lay behind the defiance.
As Deerslayer now called to him, he stepped into the canoe,
and quick as thought removed the paddles. Hurry was
furious
when he found that he was deprived of the means of
proceeding. He first approached the Indian with loud
menaces
,
and even Deerslayer stood aghast at the probable
consequences. March shook his sledge-hammer fists, and
flourished his arms, as he drew near the Indian, and all
expected
he would attempt to fell the Delaware to the earth; one
of them, at least, was well aware that such an experiment
would be followed by immediate bloodshed. But even Hurry
was awed by the stern composure of the chief, and he, too,
knew that such a man was not to be outraged with
impunity
;
he, therefore, turned to vent his rage on Deerslayer,
where he foresaw no consequences so terrible. What might
have been the result of this second demonstration, if
completed
,
is unknown, since it was never made.
Hurry, said a gentle, soothing voice at his elbow, it's
wicked to be so angry, and God will not overlook it. The
Iroquois treated you well, and they didn't take
your
scalp,
though you and father wanted to take
theirs
.
The influence of mildness on passion is well known.
Hetty, too, had earned a sort of consideration, that had
never before been enjoyed by her, through the self-devotion
and decision of her recent conduct. Perhaps her established
mental imbecility, by removing all distrust of a wish to
control
,
aided her influence. Let the cause be as questionable
as it might, the effect was sufficiently certain. Instead of
throttling his old fellow-traveller, Hurry turned to the girl,
and poured out a portion of his discontent, if none of his
anger, in her attentive ears.
'Tis too bad, Hetty! he exclaimed; as bad as a
county gaol, or a lack of beaver, to get a creatur' into your
very trap, and then to see it get off. As much as six first
quality skins, in valie, has paddled off on them clumsy
logs, when twenty strokes of a well-turned paddle, would
overtake 'em. I say in valie, for as to the boy in the way
of natur', he is only a boy, and is worth neither more nor
less than one. Deerslayer, you've been ontrue to your
fri'nds in letting such a chance slip through my fingers as
well as your own.
The answer was given quietly, but with a voice as steady
as a fearless nature, and the consciousness of rectitude,
could make it. I should have been ontrue to the right,
had I done otherwise, returned the Deerslayer, steadily;
and neither you, nor any other man has authority to
demand
that much of me. The lad came on a lawful
business
,
and the meanest red-skin that roams the woods, would
be ashamed of not respecting his ar'n'd. But he's now far
beyond your reach, Master March, and there's little use in
talking, like a couple of women, of what can no longer be
helped.
So saying, Deerslayer turned away, like one resolved
to waste no more words on the subject, while Hutter pulled
Harry by the sleeve, and led him into the ark. There they
sat long in private conference. In the mean time, the
Indian
and his friend had their secret consultation; for,
though it wanted some three or four hours to the rising of
the star, the former could not abstain from canvassing his
scheme, and from opening his heart to the other. Judith,
too, yielded to her softer feelings, and listened to the whole
of Hetty's artless narrative of what occurred after she had
landed. The woods had few terrors for either of these
girls, educated as they had been, and accustomed as they
were to look out daily at their rich expanse, or to wander
beneath their dark shades; but the elder sister felt that she
would have hesitated about thus venturing alone into an
Iroquois camp. Concerning Hist, Hetty was not very
communicative
.
She spoke of her kindness, and gentleness,
and of the meeting in the forest; but the secret of
Chingachgook
was guarded with a shrewdness and fidelity, that many
a sharper-witted girl might have failed to display.
At length the several conferences were broken up by the
reappearance of Hutter on the platform. Here he
assembled
the whole party, and communicated as much of his
intentions as he deemed expedient. Of the arrangement
made by Deerslayer, to abandon the castle during the night,
and to take refuge in the ark, he entirely approved. It
struck him as it had the others, as the only effectual means
of escaping destruction. Now that the savages had turned
their attention to the construction of rafts, no doubt could
exist of their at least making an attempt to carry the
building
,
and the message of the bloody sticks sufficiently showed
their confidence in their own success. In short the old man
viewed the night as critical, and he called on all to get ready
as soon as possible, in order to abandon the dwelling,
temporarily
at least, if not for ever.
These communications made, every thing proceeded
promptly and with intelligence: the castle was secured in
the manner already described, the canoes were withdrawn
from the dock and fastened to the ark by the side of the
other; the few necessaries that had been left in the house,
were transferred to the cabin, the fire was extinguished, and
all embarked.
The vicinity of the hills, with their drapery of pines, had
the effect to render nights that were obscure, darker than
common on the lake. As usual, however, a belt of
comparative
light was stretched through the centre of the sheet,
while it was within the shadows of the mountains, that the
gloom rested most heavily on the water. The island, or
castle, stood in this belt of comparative light, but still the
night was so dark, as to cover the departure of the ark.
At the distance of an observer on the shore, her movements
could not be seen at all, more particularly as a back-ground
of dark hill-side filled up the perspective of every view that
was taken diagonally or directly across the water. The
prevalent wind on the lakes of that region, is west, but
owing to the avenues formed by the mountains, it is
frequently
22*
impossible to tell the true direction of the currents,
as they often vary within short distances, and brief
differences
of time. This is truer in light fluctuating puffs of air,
than in steady breezes; though the squalls of even the latter,
are familiarly known to be uncertain and baffling in all
mountainous regions and narrow waters. On the present
occasion, Hutter himself, (as he shoved the ark from her
berth, at the side of the platform,) was at a loss to pronounce
which way the wind blew. In common, this difficulty was
solved by the clouds, which, floating high above the hill
tops, as a matter of course obeyed the currents; but now
the whole vault of heaven seemed a mass of gloomy wall.
Not an opening of any sort was visible, and Chingachgook
was already trembling lest the non-appearance of the star
might prevent his betrothed from being punctual to her
appointment
.
Under these circumstances, Hutter hoisted his
sail, seemingly with the sole intention of getting away from
the castle, as it might be dangerous to remain much longer
in its vicinity. The air soon filled the cloth, and when the
scow was got under command, and the sail was properly
trimmed, it was found that the direction was southerly,
inclining
towards the eastern shore. No better course
offering
for the purposes of the party, the singular craft was
suffered to skim the surface of the water in this direction
for more than an hour, when a change in the currents of
the air drove them over towards the camp.
Deerslayer watched all the movements of Hutter and
Harry, with jealous attention. At first he did not know
whether to ascribe the course they held to accident, or to
design; but he now began to suspect the latter. Familiar
as Hutter was with the lake, it was easy to deceive one who
had little practice on the water; and let his intentions be
what they might, it was evident, ere two hours had elapsed,
that the ark had got over sufficient space to be within a
hundred rods of the shore, directly abreast of the known
position of the camp. For a considerable time previously
to reaching this point, Hurry, who had some knowledge of
the Algonquin language, had been in close conference with
the Indian, and the result was now announced by the latter
to Deerslayer, who had been a cold, not to say distrusted,
looker-on of all that passed.
My old father, and my young brother, the Big Pine,
for so the Delaware had named March,want to see
Huron scalps at their belts, said Chingachgook to his
friend. There is room for some on the girdle of the
Serpent
,
and his people will look for them when he goes back
to his village. Their eyes must not be left long in a fog,
but they must see what they look for. I know that my
brother has a white hand; he will not strike even the dead.
He will wait for us; when we come back, he will not hide
his face from shame for his friend. The great Serpent of
the Mohicans, must be worthy to go on the war-path with
Hawkeye.
Ay, ay, Sarpent, I see how it is; that name's to stick, and
in time, I shall get to be known by it instead of Deerslayer;
well, if such honours will come, the humblest of us all must
be willing to abide by 'em. As for your looking for scalps,
it belongs to your gifts, and I see no harm in it. Be
marciful
,
Sarpent, howsever; be marciful, I beseech of you. It
surely can do no harm to a red-skin's honour to show a little
marcy. As for the old man, the father of two young
women
,
who might ripen better feelin's in his heart, and Harry
March, here, who, pine as he is, might better bear the fruit
of a more christianized tree, as for
them
two, I leave 'em in
the hands of the white man's God. Wasn't it for the bloody
sticks, no man should go ag'in the Mingos this night, seein'
that it would dishonour our faith and characters; but them
that crave blood, can't complain if blood is shed at their
call. Still, Sarpent, you can be
marciful
. Don't begin your
career with the wails of women, and the cries of children.
Bear yourself so that Hist will smile, and not weep, when
she meets you. Go, then; and the Manitou presarve you!
My brother will stay here with the scow. Wah! will
soon be standing on the shore waiting, and Chingachgook
must hasten.
The Indian then joined his two co-adventurers, and first
lowering the sail, they all three entered a canoe, and left the
side of the ark. Neither Hutter nor March spoke to
Deerslayer
concerning their object, or the probable length of
their absence. All this had been confided to the Indian,
who had acquitted himself of the trust with characteristic
brevity. As soon as the canoe was out of sight, and that
occurred ere the paddles had given a dozen strokes,
Deerslayer
made the best dispositions he could to keep the ark
as nearly stationary as possible; and then he sat down in
the end of the scow, to chew the cud of his own bitter
reflections
.
It was not long, however, before he was joined
by Judith, who sought every occasion to be near him,
managing her attack on his affections with the address that
was suggested by native coquetry, aided by no little
practice
,
but which received much of its most dangerous power,
from the touch of feeling that threw around her manner,
voice, accents, thoughts and acts, the indescribable witchery
of natural tenderness. Leaving the young hunter exposed
to these dangerous assailants, it has become our more
immediate
business to follow the party in the canoe, to the shore.
The controlling influence that led Hutter and Hurry to
repeat their experiment against the camp, was precisely that
which had induced the first attempt, a little heightened,
perhaps
,
by the desire of revenge. But neither of these two
rude beings, so ruthless in all things that touched the rights
and interests of the red man, though possessing veins of
human feeling on other matters, was much actuated by any
other desire than a heartless longing for profit. Hurry
had felt angered at his sufferings, when first liberated, it is
true, but that emotion had soon disappeared in the habitual
love of gold, which he sought with the reckless avidity of a
needy spendthrift, rather than with the ceaseless longings
of a miser. In short, the motive that urged them both so
soon to go against the Hurons, was an habitual contempt
of their enemy, acting on the unceasing cupidity of
prodigality
.
The additional chances of success, however, had
their place in the formation of the second enterprise. It
was known that a large portion of the warriorsperhaps
allwere encamped for the night, abreast of the castle, and
it was hoped that the scalps of helpless victims would be the
consequence. To confess the truth, Hutter in particular
he who had just left two daughters behind himexpected to
find few besides women and children in the camp. This
fact had been but slightly alluded to in his communications
with Hurry, and with Chingachgook it had been kept
entirely
out of view. If the Indian thought of it all, it was
known only to himself.
Hutter steered the canoe; Hurry had manfully taken his
post in the bows, and Chingachgook stood in the centre.
We say stood, for all three were so skilled in the
management
of that species of frail bark, as to be able to keep
erect positions, in the midst of the darkness. The approach
to the shore was made with great caution, and the landing
was effected in safety. The three now prepared their arms,
and began their tiger-like approach upon the camp. The
Indian was on the lead, his two companions treading in his
footsteps, with a stealthy cautiousness of manner, that
rendered
their progress almost literally noiseless.
Occasionally
a dried twig snapped under the heavy weight of the
gigantic Hurry, or the blundering clumsiness of the old man;
but, had the Indian walked on air, his step could not have
seemed lighter. The great object was first to discover the
position of the fire, which was known to be the centre of the
whole position. At length the keen eye of Chingachgook
caught a glimpse of this important guide. It was
glimmering
at a distance among the trunks of trees. There was no
blaze, but merely a single smouldering brand, as suited the
hour; the savages usually retiring and rising with the
revolutions
of the sun.
As soon as a view was obtained of this beacon, the
progress
of the adventurers became swifter and more certain.
In a few minutes they got to the edge of the circle of little
huts. Here they stopped to survey their ground, and to
concert their movements. The darkness was so deep, as
to render it difficult to distinguish any thing but the glowing
brand, the trunks of the nearest trees, and the endless
canopy of leaves that veiled the clouded heaven. It was
ascertained, however, that a hut was quite near, and
Chingachgook
attempted to reconnoitre its interior. The
manner
in which the Indian approached the place that was
supposed
to contain enemies, resembled the wily advances of
the cat on the bird. As he drew near, he stooped to his
hands and knees, for the entrance was so low as to require
this attitude, even as a convenience. Before trusting his
head inside, however, he listened long to catch the
breathing
of sleepers. No sound was audible, and this human
Serpent thrust his head in at the door, or opening, as
another
serpent would have peered in on the nest. Nothing
rewarded the hazardous experiment; for, after feeling
cautiously
with a hand, the place was found to be empty.
The Delaware proceeded in the same guarded manner
to one or two more of the huts, finding all in the same
situation. He then returned to his companions, and
informed
them that the Hurons had deserted their camp. A
little further inquiry corroborated this fact, and it only
remained
to return to the canoe. The different manner in
which the adventurers bore the disappointment, is worthy
of a passing remark. The chief, who had landed solely
with the hope of acquiring renown, stood stationary, leaning
against a tree, waiting the pleasure of his companions. He
was mortified, and a little surprised, it is true; but he bore
all with dignity, falling back for support on the sweeter
expectations that still lay in reserve for that evening. It
was true, he could not now hope to meet his mistress with
the proofs of his daring and skill on his person, but he might
still hope to meet her; and the warrior, who was zealous
in the search, might always hope to be honoured. On
the other hand, Hutter and Hurry, who had been chiefly
instigated by the basest of all human motives, the thirst of
gain, could scarce control their feelings. They went
prowling
among the huts, as if they expected to find some
forgotten
child, or careless sleeper; and, again and again, did
they vent their spite on the insensible huts, several of which
were actually torn to pieces, and scattered about the place.
Nay, they even quarrelled with each other, and fierce
reproaches
passed between them. It is possible some serious
consequences might have occurred, had not the Delaware
interfered to remind them of the danger of being so
unguarded
,
and of the necessity of returning to the ark. This
checked the dispute, and in a few minutes they were
paddling
sullenly back to the spot where they hoped to find
that vessel.
It has been said that Judith took her place at the side of
Deerslayer, soon after the adventurers departed. For a
short time the girl was silent, and the hunter was ignorant
which of the sisters had approached him; but he soon
recognised
the rich, full-spirited voice of the elder, as her feelings
escaped in words.
This is a terrible life for women, Deerslayer! she
exclaimed
.
Would to Heaven, I could see an end of it!
The life is well enough, Judith, was the answer,
being pretty much as it is used, or abused. What would
you wish to see in its place?
I should be a thousand times happier to live nearer to
civilized beingswhere there are farms and churches, and
houses built as it might be by Christian hands; and where
my sleep at night would be sweet and tranquil! A dwelling
near one of the forts, would be far better than this dreary
place where we live!
Nay, Judith, I can't agree too lightly in the truth of all
this. If forts are good to keep off inimies, they sometimes
hold inimies of their own. I don't think 't would be for
your good, or the good of Hetty, to live near one; and if I
must
say what I think, I'm afeard you are a little too near,
as it is. Deerslayer went on, in his own steady, earnest
manner, for the darkness concealed the tints that had
coloured
the cheeks of the girl almost to the brightness of
crimson, while her own great efforts suppressed the sounds
of the breathing that almost choked her. As for farms,
they have their uses, and there's them that like to pass their
lives on 'em; but what comfort can a man look for in a
clearin', that he can't find in double quantities in the forest?
If air, and room, and light, are a little craved, the wind-rows
and the streams will furnish 'em, or here are the lakes for
such as have bigger longings in that way; but where are
you to find your shades, and laughing springs, and leaping
brooks, and vinerable trees, a thousand years old, in a
clearin'? You don't find
them,
but you find their disabled
trunks, marking the 'arth like head-stones in a grave-yard.
It seems to me that the people who live in such places, must
be always thinkin' of their own inds, and of univarsal decay;
and that, too, not of the decay that is brought about by time
and natur', but the decay that follows waste and violence.
Then as to churches, they are good, I suppose, else wouldn't
good men uphold 'em. But they are not altogether
necessary
.
They call 'em the temples of the Lord; but, Judith,
the whole 'arth is a temple of the Lord to such as have
the right minds. Neither forts nor churches make people
happier of themselves. Moreover, all is contradiction in
the settlements, while all is concord in the woods. Forts
and churches almost always go together, and yet they're
downright contradictions; churches being for peace, and
forts for war. No, nogive me the strong places of the
wilderness, which is the trees, and the churches, too, which
are arbours raised by the hand of natur'.
Woman is not made for scenes like these, Deerslayer;
scenes of which we shall have no end, as long as this war
lasts.
If you mean women of white colour, I rather think
you're not far from the truth, gal; but as for the females
of the red men, such visitations are quite in character.
Nothing would make Hist, now, the bargained wife of
yonder
Delaware, happier than to know that he is at this
moment
prowling around his nat'ral inimies, striving after a
scalp.
Surely, surely, Deerslayer, she cannot be a woman,
and not feel concern when she thinks the man she loves is
in danger!
She doesn't think of the danger, Judith, but of the
honour
;
and when the heart is desperately set on such
feelin's
,
why there is little room to crowd in fear. Hist is a kind,
gentle, laughing, pleasant creatur', but she loves honour, as
well as any Delaware gal I ever know'd. She's to meet
the Sarpent an hour hence, on the p'int where Hetty landed,
and no doubt she has her anxiety about it, like any other
woman; but she'd be all the happier did she know that
her lover was at this moment way-laying a Mingo for his
scalp.
If you really believe this, Deerslayer, no wonder you
lay so much stress on gifts. Certain am I, that no white
girl could feel any thing but misery while she believed her
betrothed in danger of his life! Nor do I suppose even
you, unmoved and calm as you ever seem to be, could be at
peace, if you believed
your
Hist in danger.
That's a different matter't is altogether a different
matter, Judith. Woman is too weak and gentle to be
intended
to run such risks, and man
must
feel for her. Yes,
I rather think that's as much red natur', as it's white.
But I have no Hist, nor am I like to have; for I hold it
wrong to mix colours, any way except in friendship, and
sarvices.
In that you are and feel as a white man should! As
for Hurry Harry, I do think it would be all the same to him,
whether his wife were a squaw, or a governor's daughter,
provided she was a little comely, and could help to keep his
craving stomach full.
You do March injustice, Judith; yes, you do. The
poor fellow dotes on
you,
and when a man has ra'ally set
his heart on such a creatur', it isn't a Mingo, or even a
Delaware gal, that'll be likely to unsettle his mind. You
may laugh at such men as Hurry, and I, for we're rough,
and unteached in the way of books and other knowledge;
but we've our good p'ints, as well as our bad ones. An
honest heart is not to be despised, gal, even though it be not
varsed in all the niceties that please a female fancy.
You,
Deerslayer!And
do
you
can
you, for an
instant
,
suppose I place
you
by the side of Harry March?
No, no. I am not so far gone in dullness as that. No one
man or womancould think of naming your honest
heart, manly nature, and simple truth, with the boisterous
selfishness, greedy avarice, and overbearing ferocity of
Henry March. The very best that can be said of him, is
to be found in his name of Hurry Skurry, which, if it means
no great harm, means no great good. Even my father,
following
his feelings with the other, as he is doing, at this
moment, well knows the difference between you. This I
know,
for he has said as much to me, in plain language.
Judith was a girl of quick sensibilities, and of impetuous
feelings; and, being under few of the restraints that curtail
the manifestations of maiden emotions, among those who
are educated in the habits of civilized life, she sometimes
betrayed the latter with a freedom that was so purely
natural
,
as to place it as far above the wiles of coquetry, as it
was superior to its heartlessness. She had now even taken
one of the hard hands of the hunter, and pressed it between
both her own, with a warmth and earnestness that proved
how sincere was her language. It was perhaps fortunate
that she was checked by the very excess of her feelings,
since the same power might have urged her on to avow
all
that her father had saidthe old man not having been
satisfied
Vol. I.23
with making a comparison favourable to Deerslayer,
as between the hunter and Hurry, but having actually, in
his blunt rough way, briefly advised his daughter to cast
off the latter entirely, and to think of the former as a
husband
.
Judith would not willingly have said this to any other
man, but there was so much confidence awakened by the
guileless simplicity of Deerslayer, that one of her nature
found it a constant temptation to overstep the bounds of
habit. She went no farther, however, immediately
relinquishing
the hand, and falling back on a reserve that was
more suited to her sex, and, indeed, to her natural modesty.
Thank'ee, Judith, thank'ee, with all my heart,
returned
the hunter, whose humility prevented him from placing
any flattering interpretation on either the conduct, or the
language of the girl. Thank'ee, as much as if it was all
true. Harry's sightlyyes, he's as sightly as the tallest
pine of these mountains, and the Sarpent has named him
accordingly; howsever, some fancy good looks, and some
fancy good conduct, only. Hurry has one advantage, and
it depends on himself whether he'll have the t'other or
Hark! that's your father's voice, gal, and he speaks like a
man who's riled at something.
God save us from any more of these horrible scenes!
exclaimed Judith, bending her face to her knees, and
endeavouring
to exclude the discordant sounds, by applying
her hands to her ears. I sometimes wish I had no father!
This was bitterly said, and the repinings which extorted
the words, were bitterly felt. It is impossible to say what
might next have escaped her, had not a gentle, low voice
spoken at her elbow.
Judith, I ought to have read a chapter to father and
Hurry! said the innocent, but terrified speaker, and
that
would have kept them from going again on such an errand.
Do you call to them, Deerslayer, and tell them I want them,
and that it will be good for them both, if they'll return, and
hearken to my words.
Ahs! mepoor Hetty, you little know the cravin's for
gold and revenge, if you believe they are so easily turned
aside from their longin's! But this is an uncommon
business
,
in more ways than one, Judith! I hear your father
and Hurry growling like bears, and yet no noise comes
from the mouth of the young chief. There's an end of
secresy, and yet his whoop, which ought to ring in the
mountains, accordin' to rule, in such sarcumstances, is
silent!
Justice may have alighted on him, and his death has
saved the lives of the innocent.
Not itnot itthe Sarpent is not the one to suffer, if
that
's to be the law. Sartainly there has been no onset,
and 't is most likely that the camp's deserted, and the men
are coming back disapp'inted. That accounts for the growls
of Hurry and the silence of the Sarpent.
Just at this instant a fall of a paddle was heard in the
canoe, for vexation had made March reckless; and
Deerslayer
felt convinced that his conjecture was true. The
sail being down, the ark had not drifted far, and ere many
minutes, he heard Chingachgook, in a low quiet tone,
directing
Hutter how to steer in order to reach it. In less
time than it takes to tell the fact, the canoe touched the
scow, and the adventurers entered the latter. Neither
Hutter
nor Hurry spoke of what had occurred. But the
Delaware
,
in passing his friend, merely uttered the words,
fire's out; which, if not literally true, sufficiently
explained
the truth to his listener.
It was now a question as to the course to be steered. A
short surly conference was held, when Hutter decided that
the wisest way would be to keep in motion, as the means
most likely to defeat any attempt at a surpriseannouncing
his own and March's intention to requite themselves for the
loss of sleep, during their captivity, by lying down. As
the air still baffled and continued light, it was finally
determined
to sail before it, let it come in what direction it might,
so long as it did not blow the ark upon the strand. This
point settled, the released prisoners helped to hoist the sail,
and then they threw themselves on two of the pallets,
leaving Deerslayer and his friend to look after the
movements
of the craft. As neither of the latter was disposed
to sleep, on account of the appointment with Hist, this
arrangement
was acceptable to all parties. That Judith and
Hetty remained up also, in no manner impaired the
agreeable
features of this change.
For some time the scow rather drifted than sailed along
the western shore, following a light southerly current of the
air. The progress was slownot exceeding a couple of
miles in the hourbut the two men perceived that it was
not only carrying them towards the point they desired to
reach, but at a rate that was quite as fast as the hour yet
rendered necessary. But little was said the while, even
by the girls; and that little had more reference to the
rescue
of Hist, than to any other subject. The Indian was
calm, to the eye; but as minute after minute passed, his
feelings
became more and more excited, until they reached a
state that might have satisfied the demands of even the
most exacting mistress. Deerslayer kept the craft as much
in the bays as was prudent, for the double purpose of
sailing
within the shadows of the woods, and of detecting any
signs of an encampment they might pass on the shore. In
this manner they had doubled one low point, and were
already in the bay that was terminated north by the goal
at which they aimed. The latter was still a quarter of a
mile distant, when Chingachgook came silently to the side
of his friend, and pointed to a place directly ahead. A
small fire was glimmering just within the verge of the
bushes that lined the shore, on the southern side of the
pointleaving no doubt that the Indians had suddenly
removed
their camp to the very place, or at least to the very
projection of land, where Hist had given them the
rendezvous
!
END OF THE FIRST VOLUME.